<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89123-0023 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-23-89.f2.A1022</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 13 / Monday, January 23, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">24 CFR Parts 14, 100, 103, 104, 105, 106, 109, 110, 115, and 121</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. R-89-1425; FR-2565]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Implementation of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>agency:</T2> Office of the Secretary and Office of the Assistant Secretaryfor Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity, HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>action:</T2> Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>summary:</T2> HUD is adopting regulations to implement the changesmade in Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 by the Fair HousingAmendments Act of 1988, which was enacted September 13, 1988 and will becomeeffective on March 12, 1989. Title VIII has prohibited discrimination inthe sale, rental, and financing of dwellings based on color, religion,sex, or national origin. The Fair Housing Amendments Act expands the coverageof Title VIII to prohibit discriminatory housing practices based on handicapand familial status, establishes an administrative and judicial enforcementmechanism for cases where discriminatory housing practices cannot be resolvedinformally, and provides for monetary penalties in cases where housingdiscrimination is found. The Fair Housing Amendments Act also establishesdesign and construction requirements for certain new multifamily dwellingsfor first occupancy on or after March 13, 1991 (30 months after the dateof enactment) and an exemption from the prohibitions against discriminationon the basis of familial status for certain housing for older persons.This final rule adopts new regulations describing the nature of conductmade unlawful with respect to the sale, rental and financing of dwellingsor in the provision of services and facilities in connection therewith(24 CFR Part 100); establishing procedures for the investigation of complaintsof discriminatory housing practices (24 CFR 103); and establishing proceduresfor administrative proceedings involving discriminatory housing practices(24 CFR Part 104). HUD is also revising existing regulations issued under Title VIII to reflectthe expanded coverage of Title VIII. In addition, HUD is amending the regulationsproviding for the recognition of substantially equivalent state and localfair housing laws (24 CFR Part 115) to provide for the new certificationprocedure established by the Fair Housing Amendments Act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>date:</T2> This rule will become effective on March 12, 1989. The incorporationby reference of the American National Standard for buildings and facilitiesproviding accessiblity and usability for physically handicapped people(ANSI A117.1-1986) is approved by the Director of the Federal Registeras of March 12, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>for further information contact:</T2> Harry L. Carey ((202) 755-5570,Office of the General Counsel, Department of Housing and Urban Development,451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC, 20410-0500. (The telephone numberset forth above is not a toll-free number.) The toll-free TDD number is1-800-543-8294. This rule will be available in braille and on tape for persons with visionimpairments in the Office of the Rules Docket Clerk, Room 10276, Departmentof Housing and Urban Development, at the above location.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>supplementary information:</T2> The information collection requirementscontained in this rule have been submitted to the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) for review under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980.The OMB control number, when assigned, will be announced in a separatenotice in the<T4> Federal Register</T4>. The public reporting burden for each of thesecollections of information is estimated to include the time for reviewingthe instructions, searching existing data sources, gathering and maintainingthe data needed, and completing and reviewing the collection of information.Information on the estimated public reporting burdens is provided underthe preamble heading,<T3> Other Matters.</T3> Send comments regarding these burden estimatesor any other aspect of these collections of information, including suggestionsfor reducing this burden, to the Department of Housing and Urban Development,Rules Docket Clerk, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Room 10276, Washington, DC20410; and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Officeof Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3601-3619) made itunlawful to discriminate in any aspect relating to the sale, rental orfinancing of dwellings or in the provision of brokerage services or facilitiesin connection with the sale or rental of a dwelling because of race, color,religion, sex, or national origin. Under the provisions of Title VIII,persons who believed that they had been subjected to, or were about tobe subjected to, a discriminatory housing practice could file a complaintwith the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development. Title VIII requiredthe Department of Housing and Urban Development to investigate each complaintand, where the Department determined to resolve the matters raised in acomplaint, to engage in informal efforts to conciliate the issues in thecomplaint. However, where these informal efforts to conciliate a case were unsuccessful,Title VIII did not provide the Secretary with any administrative mechanismfor redressing acts of discrimination against an individual. In addition,while the Secretary could refer a case involving a pattern or practiceof discrimination to the Attorney General for the initiation of a civilaction, Federal courts did not award individual relief to the victims ofdiscrimination in such cases. The Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-430, approved September13, 1988) was enacted to strengthen the administrative enforcement provisionof Title VIII, to add prohibitions against discrimination in housing onthe basis of handicap and familial status, and to provide for the awardof monetary damages where discriminatory housing practices are found. Theamended law, referred to as the Fair Housing Act, will become effectiveon March 12, 1989. The provisions in the Fair Housing Act describing the nature of conductwhich constitutes a discriminatory housing practice have been revised toextend the protections of the Fair Housing Act to persons with handicapsand to families with children. In this respect, sections 804, 805, and806 of the Fair Housing Act prohibit discrimination in any activities relatingto the sale or rental of dwellings, in the availability of residentialreal estate-related transactions, or in the provision of services and facilitiesin connection therewith because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. The Fair Housing Act also specifically makes it unlawful to refuse to permit,at the expense of the handicapped person, reasonable modifications to existingpremises occupied or to be occupied by such a person if such modificationsare necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the premises (section804(f)(3)(A)). With respect to rental housing, the Fair Housing Act providesthat a landlord may, where reasonable, condition permission for a modificationon the renter's agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to thecondition that existed before the modification, reasonalbe wear and tearexcepted. The Act also makes it unlawful to refuse to make reasonable accommodationsin rules, policies, practices, or services to afford a handicapped personequal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling. Further, the Fair Housing Act makes it unlawful to design and constructcertain multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991,in a manner that makes them inaccessible to persons with handicaps. Allpremises within such dwelling also are specifically required to containseveral features of adaptive design so that the dwelling is readily accessibleto and usable by persons with handicaps. With respect to the new protection for families with children, the FairHousing Act prohibits discrimination because of familial status (generally,the presence of children under 18 in a family) in the sale or rental ofhousing. However, the act provides an exemption from this prohibition forhousing which qualifies as ``housing for older persons''. Section 805 of the Fair Housing Act, as revised, prohibits discriminationrelated to ``residential real estate-related transactions'' rather thanmerely referring to ``financing''. In addition, the definition of the termresidential real estate-related transaction specifically indicates thatthe Fair Housing Act applies to the selling, brokering and appraising ofdwelling and to secondary mortgage market activities with respect to securitiesaffected or supported by dwellings, as well as to the making and purchasingof loans and other financial assistance for dwellings. The Act, however,does not prohibit a person engaged in the business of furnishing appraisalsfrom taking into consideration factors other than race, color, religion,national origin, sex, handicap, or familial status. Section 810 of the Fair Housing Act provides that any person who believesthat he or she has been, or will be, subjected to a discriminatory housingpractice because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin may file a complaint with the Secretary of Housing andUrban Development. The section also authorizes the Secretary of Housingand Urban Development to file complaint on the Secretary's own initiativeand to investigate housing practices in order to determine whether a complaintshould be filed. Complaints must be filed not later than one year afteran alleged discriminatory housing practice has occurred or terminated.Upon the filing of a complaint, the Secretary is required to notify anyrespondent named in the complaint of the acceptance of the complaint andthe discriminatory housing practice alleged in the complaint. The respondentmay file, not later than 10 days after receipt of the notice of a complaint,an answer to the complaint. The Secretary is required to make an investigationof the alleged discriminatory housing practice and to complete the investigationwithin 100 days after the filing of the complaint, unless it is impracticableto do so. At the end of each investigation, the Secretary is required to preparea final investigation report. Under section 810(d), the final investigationreport will be available to an aggrieved person or a respondent, upon request,at any time after the investigation is complete.Section 810(b) of the Act directs the Secretary, to the extent feasible,to engage in efforts to conciliate the matters raised in the complaintat any time after the filing of the complaint.Section 810(e) of the Act empowers the Secretary to authorize the AttorneyGeneral to file a civil action seeking appropriate preliminary or temporaryrelief pending final disposition of a complaint if, at any time after thefiling of such complaint, the Secretary concludes that such action is necessaryto carry out the purposes of the Act.Whenever a complaint alleges a discriminatory housing practice within aState or locality which has a Fair Housing law or ordinance which has beencertified by the Secretary as being substantially equivalent to the FairHousing Act, the Secretary must refer the complaint to the agency administeringsuch law or ordinance before taking any action with respect to the complaint.Except with the consent of a certified agency, or in other limited situationssuch as where a complaint is not being processed in a timely fashion orthe State or local law or ordinance is found no longer to be substantiallyequivalent, the Secretary may not take any further action with respectto complaints referred to such agencies.Section 810(f) of the Act permits the Secretary to certify an agency onlywhere the Secretary determines that the rights protected by the agency,the procedures followed by the agency, the remedies available to the agency,and the availability of judicial review of the agency's actions are substantiallyequivalent to those created in the Fair Housing Act.This section also provides that agencies which the Secretary has determinedadminister State and local fair housing laws which provide rights and remediesfor discriminatory housing practices that were substantially equivalentto those contained in Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968, or agencieswhich had been recognized for interim referral of complaints under TitleVIII, will be considered certified for a period not to exceed 48 monthsfor the purpose of referring complaints under the Fair Housing Act withrespect to matters for which they had been certified on the day beforethe date of enactment of the Fair Housing Act (<T3>i.e.</T3>, September 12, 1988).Section 810(g) of the Act requires the Secretary, in cases where the mattersraised in a complaint cannot be resolved by conciliation, to determine,based upon the facts, whether reasonable cause exists to believe a discriminatoryhousing practice has occurred or is about to occur. Such a finding mustbe made by the Secretary within 100 days after the filing of a complaintor within 100 days after the Secretary has commenced action on a complaintwhich had been referred to a certified agency, unless it is impracticableto do so. Where the Secretary makes a determination that reasonable causeexists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred oris about to occur, the Secretary must immediately issue a charge on behalfof the aggrieved person commencing a formal administrative proceeding beforean administrative law judge.Section 812(a) of the Act provides any complainant, aggrieved person, orrespondent with an opportunity to elect not to proceed before an administrativelaw judge but to move the case to an appropriate Federal district court.Such an election must be made within 20 days after the receipt of the serviceupon such person of the charge filed by the Secretary. Upon notificationthat a person has elected to proceed to Federal district court, the Secretarywill authorize the Attorney General to file a civil action on behalf ofthe aggrieved person. An action authorized by the Secretary must be broughtwithin 30 days after the election is made.Where no election is made, the case will be heard by an administrativelaw judge. Under section 812(c) of the Act, the Federal Rules of Evidencewill apply to the presentation of evidence in the same manner that theyapply to evidence presented in a civil action in Federal district court.Section 812(g) requires the administrative law judge to issue findingsof fact and conclusions of law within 60 days after the end of a hearing.Where the administrative law judge finds that a respondent has engagedin a discriminatory housing practice, the Fair Housing Act provides forthe issuance of an order for such relief as is appropriate, which may includeactual damages and injunctive or other equitable relief. In order to vindicatethe public interest, the order of an administrative law judge may assessa civil penalty against the respondent.The decision of the administrative law judge can be reviewed by the Secretary.However, this review must be completed within 30 days after the decisionis issued. Any final agency decision on the issue of discriminination issubject to review on appeal by the United States Courts of Appeals.The Fair Housing Amendments Act directs the Secretary of Housing and UrbanDevelopment to issue regulations implementing the Fair Housing Act. Section13 of the Fair Housing Amendments Act provides that ``[I]n consultationwith other appropriate Federal agencies, the Secretary shall, not laterthan the 180th day after the enactment of this Act, issue rules to implementtitle VIII as amended by this Act.'' That section also required the Secretaryto give notice and opportunity for comment with respect to such rules.On November 7, 1988, the Department published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 44992) a proposed rule to provide theinterpretation of the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development on thescope of the coverage provided and the nature of activities made unlawfulby the Fair Housing Act. The proposed rule also contained the procedureswhich would be applicable to the receipt and processing of complaints andthe initiation and conduct of formal enforcement proceedings.Specifically, the Department proposed to add the three new parts to SubtitleB of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The new Part 100 describedthe conduct made unlawful under the Fair Housing Act. The new Part 103set forth the procedures for the receipt, investigation and conciliationof complaints and for the issuance of charges commencing formal administrativeproceedings. The new Part 104 established rules for the conduct of administrativehearings before administrative law judges and provided rules of discoveryin connection with such administrative proceedings.It was further proposed that the existing departmental regulations authorizingthe Secretary to collect racial, sex and ethnic data in departmental programs,located at 24 CFR Part 100, be redesignated as 24 CFR Part 121. These regulationswere revised in the proposal to reflect the additional data requirementsfor HUD programs to meet the Department's responsibility to provide reportsto Congress and to make available to the public data on persons eligibleto participate and who are participating in HUD programs.The proposed rule also made revisions in four existing departmental regulationsimplementing the Fair Housing Act to reflect the expansion of the coverageof the law to include handicap and familial status. Those regulations are:Fair Housing Administrative Meetings under Title VIII of the Civil RightsAct of 1968 (24 CFR Part 106), Fair Housing Advertising (24 CFR Part 109),Fair Housing Poster (24 CFR Part 110) and Certification of SubstantiallyEquivalent Agencies (24 CFR Part 115). The proposal provided a 30-day period for the submission of comments bythe public, ending December 7, 1988. The Department received 6,425 publiccomments on the proposed rule by the end of the comment period. In addition,a substantial number of comments were received by the Department afterthe December 7 deadline. Even though those comments were not timely filed,they were reviewed to assure that any major issues raised were adequatelyaddressed in comments that were received by the deadline. Despite the extraordinary number of comments submitted (there were severalthousand comments just from mobile home owners and operators of mobilehome parks), each of the timely comments was read, and a list of all significantissues raised by those comments was compiled. All these issues were consideredin the development of this rule. In addition to consideration of public comments, HUD staff members metwith representatives of several major interest groups who requested anopportunity to elaborate on the views expressed in their written comments.These staff members (with responsibility for the development of this rule)met with representatives of the National Apartment Association, the Societyof Real Estate Appraisers, the American Institute of Real Estate Appraisers,the National Association of Home Builders, the Western Mobile Home Association,the Leadership Conference on Civil Rights, National Association for theAdvancement of Colored People, NAACP Legal Defense Fund, Children's DefenseFund, American Civil Liberties Union, Mental Health Law Project, and representativesof various other Fair Housing Organizations. In each instance, the organizationor organizations presented views identical to or consistent with positionstaken in previously submitted written comments. A record of each meetingwas made, including the names of persons attending, the date, and a briefsummary of the issues discussed. These meeting records appear in the Department'spublic comment file. The staff members also met with staff of the SenateJudiciary Committee. <ITAG tagnum="84">Part 100_Discriminatory Conduct Under the Fair Housing Act </ITAG>Part 100 is a new part titled ``Discriminatory Conduct Under The Fair HousingAct''. The new Part 100:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Indicates the conduct which is made unlawful under the Fair HousingAct; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Includes guidance as to the responsibility of persons to permit reasonablemodifications to dwellings and to make reasonable accommodations to rulesand practices for persons with handicaps and further provides informationas to the design and construction requirements applicable to certain newconstruction multifamily housing for first occupancy after March 13, 1991;and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Describes the requirements which must be met for housing to be exemptedfrom the prohibitions against discrimination based on familial status becauseit qualifies as housing for older persons.</ITAG>The comments received with respect to Subparts A, B, and C of Part 100raised several issues of general importance. Standard for Proving a Violation The proposed rulemaking indicated that the descriptions of unlawful conductcontained in this part generally mirrored the language of the statutoryprohibitions against discrimination under the Fair Housing Act. The proposedrule indicated that the specific prohibitions in each section of the regulationswere amplified by examples of unlawful conduct provided in those sections.The preamble to the proposed rule stated that many of the practices soidentified have been the subject of court decisions since the passage ofTitle VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968. The preamble further statedthat other examples reflect the interpretation of HUD based on its experiencesince 1968 in the investigation of complaints of discriminatory housingpractices. In addition, the preamble cautioned that the illustrations inPart 100 were only examples of the types of conduct made unlawful underthe Fair Housing Act. Although the Department viewed the illustrations of conduct unlawful underthe Fair Housing Act in Part 100 to be descriptive of the types of conductprohibited, several commenters suggested that, in some instances, the illustrationscould be read to suggest that the Department was using them to establishthe legal standards for determining liability in the adjudication of mattersunder the Fair Housing Act. Specifically, these commenters asserted that four illustrations in theproposed rule were susceptible to misinterpretation. With regard to andSection;andSection;100.70(c)(3), 100.75(c)(3) and 100.80(b)(3), they asserted that the useof the phrases ``in order to discourage'', ``in order to deny'' and ``inorder to preclude'' could be viewed as limiting the types of activitieswhich would constitute unlawful conduct. Similarly, these commenters assertedthat, in andSection; 170.70(d)(1), the phrase ``to encourage, permit or reward''could also imply that intentional discriminatory conduct was necessaryto establish that a discriminatory housing practice occurred. While theDepartment believes that the cited illustrations do not in any way implythe standard for determining the liability of persons, these regulationsare not designed to resolve the question of whether intent is or is notrequired to show a violation and in order to assure that there will beno confusion as to the scope of Part 100, the illustrations in andSection;100.70(c)(3), 100.75(c)(3) and 100.80(b)(3) have been revised. The illustrationin andSection; 100.70(d)(1) has been deleted from the final rule for thereasons discussed in the following section of this preamble. Affirmative Fair Housing Activities Several commenters suggested that the proposed rule did not address affirmativeefforts by localities to further the achievement of the goal of fair housingthrough the implementation of programs to promote integrated housing. Severalcommenters, including fair housing groups, persons and organizations involvedin promoting fair housing and a number of local governments, interpretedcertain illustrations of conduct made unlawful in the proposed rule asprohibiting the use of governmentally approved programs designed to promotegreater housing opportunities for persons. On the other hand, a comment from an association representing persons involvedin the sale and rental of dwellings urged that the proposed rule be revisedto make it clear that such practices are prohibited by the Fair HousingAct. The Department does not believe that the proposed rule could be interpretedto make affirmative marketing programs, designed to make available informationwhich broadens housing choices for persons, a violation of the Fair HousingAct. The Department of Housing and Urban Development, shortly after the enactmentof Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968, published regulations designedto promote greater opportunities for persons to participate in its housingprograms. These Affirmative Fair Housing Marketing Regulations (24 CFR200.600) implement the Department's policy of assuring that persons ofsimilar income levels in a housing market area have a like range of housingchoices available to them, regardless of race, color, religion, sex, ornational origin. The regulation provides for the development and implementation of an affirmativefair housing marketing plan. As part of this plan, participants in HUDhousing programs must carry out an affirmative program to attract buyersor tenants, regardless of sex, of all minority and majority groups to thehousing. In addition, the Department requires program participants to identifyany groups of persons who are not likely to be aware of the available housingand to undertake special marketing efforts designed to make such personsaware of the available housing and their ability to obtain it on a nondiscriminatorybasis.Nothing in the amendments to the Fair Housing Act or their legislativehistory would support a conclusion that Congress sought to make choice-broadeningactivities, such as the Department's Affirmative Fair Housing MarketingProgram, unlawful discriminatory housing practices.Beyond these activities, both groups of commenters recommended that thefinal rule should indicate whether other practices designed to promoteintegrated housing patterns are permissible under the Fair Housing Act.Generally, these ``pro-integrative'' programs involve practices which aredesigned and operated to provide incentives for persons to make housingchoices in a manner which results in the furtherance of integrated housingpatterns.The issue of programs designed to promote integrated housing patterns wasconsidered by the Congress in connection with an amendment to the FairHousing Amendments Act offered in the House which would have made it unlawfulto use any preferences in the provision of any dwelling based on race,color, religion, gender or national origin. Before the amendment was defeated,Congressman Don Edwards, one of the chief sponsors of the Fair HousingAmendments Act, agreed to hold hearings on the subject of pro-integrativeprograms. (See 134 Cong. Rec. H4903 (daily ed. June 29, 1988).)Very recently, on December 12, 1988, the House Committee on the JudiciarySubcommittee on Civil and Constitutional Rights held oversight hearingson Fair Housing. In this hearing, the subcommittee heard testimony concerningthe issues raised in pro-integration efforts. In fact, much of the testimonyinvolved activities which are the same as or similar to those referredto in the comments on the proposed rule.In view of the legislative history concerning pro-integration programsand the Congressional action in this area, the Department has determinedthat it would not be appropriate to address the issue of pro-integrationprograms in this final rule.Commenters pointed to several of the illustrations in the proposed rulewhich they believed could be read as indicating that the Department wouldview pro-integration activities as constituting unlawful conduct.The Department believes that the illustrations contained in the proposedrule accurately reflect the types of activities which, when they resultin choice limitations, would constitute unlawful conduct. However, in orderto assure that the Department's rule implementing the Fair Housing Actdoes not impact on the consideration of the scope of permissible affirmativeactivities to promote integration, the Department has removed the illustrationsthat the commenters asserted could be construed as impacting either positivelyor negatively on the Congressional evaluation. Specifically, the illustrationsin andSection;andSection; 100.60(b)(5), 100.65(b)(2), 100.70(c)(1), 100.70(d)(1)and (2), 100.120(b)(1), (3), (4), (5), 6, and (7), 100.130(b)(1) and (4)and 100.135(d)(1), (2), and (3) have been removed. Further, the Departmenthas rejected comments suggesting changes in andSection; 100.70(a), and theaddition of new illustrations in andSection;andSection; 100.70(c), 100.75(c),100.130(c), and 100.135(d) to indicate that pro-integration practices areunlawful.In addition, several commenters requested that the provisions of the proposedrule regarding unlawful advertising practices in andSection;100.50(b)(4)be revised. The language in this section has been changed to mirrow thelanguage contained in section 804(c) of the Fair Housing Act relating tounlawful advertising with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling.Protection of New Covered ClassesIn the preamble to the proposed rule, the Department indicated that itinterpreted the protections afforded to handicapped persons and familieswith children in the same manner as the protections provided to othersunder the Fair Housing Act. A number of commenters suggested that it wasunreasonable to assume that Congress intended to provide the same protectionsto the new classes of persons afforded protection under the amendments.One commenter supported this position by suggesting that it would be moreappropriate to utilize standards developed under the Equal Protection Clauseof the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution in determining the natureof the protections provided to handicapped persons and families with children.This commenter indicated that, under such a standard, classifications basedon race and sex would stand on a different footing from classificationsbased on handicap and familial status, and that differential treatmentof the handicapped or families with children in some particular contextscould be justified by a rational relationship to legitimate interests,even where similar differential treatment based on race or sex could notbe justified.While it is true that the Congress, in enacting Title VIII of the CivilRights Act of 1968, sought to assure that persons would be accorded equalprotection of the law, the Constitutional underpinnings of the law arealso rooted in the Commerce Clause.In a memorandum on the constitutionality of the Fair Housing Law, the Departmentof Justice set forth the support in the Commerce Clause for the legislation,stating:``Discrimination in housing affects this interstate commerce in severalways. The confinement of Negroes and other minority groups to older homesin ghettoes restricts the number of new homes which are built and consequentlyreduces the amount of building materials and residential financing whichmoves across state lines. Negroes, especially those in the professionsor in business, are less likely to change their place of residence to anotherstate when housing discrimination would force them to move their familiesinto ghettoes. The result is both to reduce the interstate movement ofindividuals and to hinder the efficient allocation of labor among the interstatecomponents of the economy.``The Commerce Clause grants Congress plenary power to protect interstatecommerce from adverse effects such as these. The power is not restrictedto goods or persons in transit. It extends to all activities which affectinterstate commerce, even if the goods or persons engaged in the activitiesare not then, or may never be, traveling in commerce. The power existseven when the effects upon which it is based are minor, or when taken individually,they would be insignificant. It is sufficient if the effects, taken asa whole, are present in measureable amounts. And it does not matter thatwhen Congress exercises its power under the Commerce Clause, its motivesare not solely to protect commerce. It can as validly act for moral reasons.''(footnotes omitted) 114 Cong. Rec. 2536-2537. (February 7, 1968)The Department believes that the legislative history of the Fair HousingAct and the development of fair housing law after the protections of thatlaw were extended in 1974 to prohibit discrimination because of sex (Congressamended sections 804, 805, and 806 by adding sex to the classes of personsprotected under Title VIII, see section 808(b)(1) of the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1974, Pub. L. 93-383) support the position that personswith handicaps and families with children must be provided the same protectionsas other classes of persons.Increased LiabilityA significant number of commenters asserted that providing protectionsto persons with handicaps and families with children would restrict theirability to establish reasonable rules relating to the availability andthe use of facilities provided in connection with dwellings. These commentersalso suggested that a regulation requiring full access of handicapped personsand children to all facilities provided in connection with dwellings, andrequiring the rental of dwellings on upper floors of a high-rise building,would result in increased tort liability.The Department does not believe that, in enacting the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct, the Congress sought to limit the ability of landlords or other propertymanagers to develop and implement reasonable rules and regulations relatingto the use of facilities associated with dwellings for the health and safetyof persons. However, there is no support for concluding that it is permissibleto exclude handicapped persons or families with children from dwellingson upper floors of a high-rise, based on the assertion that such dwellingsper se present a health or safety risk to such persons. Further, to permitsuch a practice would render meaningless the provisions of the law requiringthat all dwellings in buildings consisting of 4 or more units and havingone or more elevators be accessible to and usable by handicapped persons.A number of commenters also urged the Department, in its final rule, toprovide that a high-rise building could be exempted from the familial statusprovisions of the Act if it were certified that the high-rise buildingdid not provide a safe and healthy living environment for children. Insupport of this type of exemption, several commenters pointed to languagecontained in Section 201 of the Housing and Community Development Act of1977 which directed that the Secretary of HUD ``prohibit high-rise elevatorprojects for families with children unless there is no practicable alternative.''(See section 8(c)(1) of the Housing Act of 1937 (42 USC 1437f(c)(1)).).There is nothing in the Fair Housing Act to indicate that Congress in anyway sought to limit the ability of families with children to obtain dwellingsin a building other than those specifically exempted under the Act. Further,the department does not believe that the language in the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1977, requiring HUD approval of the use of high-riseprojects for providing housing for families with children would supporta provision in this final rule which would provide an exemption from coverageof the Fair Housing Act for such buildings. As a result, these commentshave not been adopted. However, there is nothing in the provisions of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct or its legislative history that indicates that Congress sought to imposeany new liability on the owners and managers of housing. This interpretationis supported by a colloquy between Senator Specter and Senator Kennedyregarding the issue of liability:<ITAG tagnum="21">Mr. Specter. It is my understanding that, as a result of this bill,a property owner does not assume a greater degree of vicarious liabilityas a result of injuries that may be caused by the tenants in the expandedcategories of protected classes established under this bill. I believeit would be useful for the manager to confirm that it is not the intentof Congress that property owners will incur greater vicarious tort liabilityas a result of this statute because of the physical or mental characteristicsof the tenants covered by this bill. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Mr. Kennedy. The Senator is correct. Congress does not intend to altervicarious or secondary State tort law through the provisions of this bill.There is no objective evidence to link concerns about increased liabilitywith any of the protected classes, and none should be assumed. Thus, weare stating, as a matter of clarification, that there is no relationshipbetween this bill and existing State vicarious and secondary liabilitytort laws. 134 Cong. Rec. S10549 (daily ed. Aug. 2, 1988). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_General </ITAG>Section 100.1 Authority. The Fair Housing Amendments Act authorizes the Secretary of Housing andUrban Development to issue regulations implementing the provisions of theFair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620). The regulations contained in Part100 are being issued under the Secretary's authority for the administrationand enforcement of the Fair Housing Act. Section 100.5 Scope. The Fair Housing Act provides, within constitutional limitations, for fairhousing throughout the United States. It provides that no person shall,on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin, be subjected to discrimination in the sale, rentalor advertising for sale or rental of dwellings, in the provision of brokerageservices, or in residential real estate-related transactions. Section 100.5(a)and (b) indicates that this part provides guidance as to the Department'sinterpretation of the coverage of the Fair Housing Act regarding discriminationrelated to the sale or rental of dwellings, the provision of services inconnection therewith, and the availability of real estate-related transactions.Section 100.10 Exemptions. The Fair Housing Act exempts certain types of housing from the coverageof the law. Section 807 of the Fair Housing Act provides that, under certaincircumstances, religious organizations and private clubs may limit thesale, rental or occupancy of housing, owned or operated for other thana commercial purpose, to their members. Section 807 also provides thatnothing in the provisions regarding familial status applies to housingfor older persons. Section 803 of the Fair Housing Act provides that nothingin the Fair Housing Act, other than the prohibitions against discriminatoryadvertising, applies to the sale or rental by an owner of certain singlefamily houses without the use of a real estate broker or to the rentalof rooms in dwellings containing living quarters occupied by no more thanfour families, provided that the owner actually occupies one of the units.Section 100.10 of this part reflects these exemptions to the coverage ofthe law. Section 100.10(a)(3) states that nothing in this regulation limits theapplicability of any reasonable local, State or Federal restrictions onthe maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling unit. Thisparagraph incorporates into the regulation the revisions to section 807of the Fair Housing Act contained in section 6(d) of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of 1988. That provision is intended to allow reasonable governmentallimitations on occupancy to continue as long as they are applied to alloccupants, and do not operate to discriminate on the basis of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. H.R. Rep.No. 711, 100th Congress, 2d Sess. 31 (1988) (``House Report''). No changeshave been made in this section of the regulations. A number of commenters indicated that the proposed rule did not adequatelyaddress the question of what occupancy standards, if any, can be used bypersons in connection with the sale and rental of dwellings. Many of thesecommenters, generally persons involved in the rental of dwellings and associationsrepresenting owners and managers of rental dwellings, recommended thatthe final rule include a HUD-developed occupancy standard, and state thatin the absence of a State or local occupancy code, owners or managers complyingwith the HUD standard would be considered to be in compliance with theFair Housing Act with respect to the treatment of families with children.In the alternative, several commenters recommended that HUD indicate inthe final rule that owners and managers of rental housing would be in compliancewith the Fair Housing Act if they developed and implemented occupancy standardswhich are no less stringent than occupancy guidelines currently used inconnection with HUD-assisted housing programs. While the statutory provision providing exemptions to the Fair HousingAct states that nothing in the law limits the applicability of any reasonableFederal restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants, there isno support in the statute or its legislative history which indicates anyintent on the part of Congress to provide for the development of a nationaloccupancy code. This interpretation is consistent with Congressional relianceon and encouragement for States and localities to become active participantsin the effort to promote achievement of the goal of Fair Housing. Further,while the Department has developed occupancy guidelines for use by participantsin HUD housing programs, these guidelines are designed to apply to thetypes and sizes of dwellings in HUD programs and they may not be reasonablefor dwellings with more available space and other dwelling configurationsthan those found in HUD-assisted housing. On the other hand, there is no basis to conclude that Congress intendedthat an owner or manager of dwellings would be unable in any way to restrictthe number of occupants who could reside in a dwelling. Thus, the Departmentbelieves that in appropriate circumstances, owners and managers may developand implement reasonable occupancy requirements based on factors such asthe number and size of sleeping areas or bedrooms and the overall sizeof the dwelling unit. In this regard, it must be noted that, in connectionwith a complaint alleging discrimination on the basis of familial status,the Department will carefully examine any such nongovernmental restrictionto determine whether it operates unreasonably to limit or exclude familieswith children. Several commenters requested advice regarding the application of the FairHousing Act to the sale of condominium and cooperative units and mobilehomes by private persons. As indicated in the proposed rule, the prohibitions against discriminationapply to all types of dwellings, including condominiums, cooperatives andmobile homes. Thus, discrimination in the sale or rental of such dwellingswould be unlawful. However the Fair Housing Act provides a limited exemptionfor the sale of certain single family houses, and andSection; 100.10(c) describesthis statutory exemption. Specifically, this section indicates that theFair Housing Act exempts from the provisions prohibiting discriminationany single family house sold by an owner, subject to certain conditions:the owner may not own or have an interest in more than three such housesat any one time; in the case of the sale of a single family house in whichthe owner was not the most recent occupant prior to its sale, the ownermay not have made any other such sale within the preceding twenty-fourmonths; and the unit must be sold or rented without the use of a real estatebroker or agent, and without the use of any discriminatory advertisement.Thus, the sale of a single family house, including the sale of a condominiumor cooperative unit or a mobile home, by an owner would not be coveredby the provisions of the Fair Housing Act, provided that the limitationsin andSection; 100.10(c) are met. However, it must be noted that the exemptionin this section applies only to the <T3>owner</T3> of such a dwelling, and that the cooperative or condominiumor mobile home park would be prohibited from engaging in any discriminatoryconduct with respect to the dwelling notwithstanding the fact that theconduct of the owner was not covered.Section 100.20 Definitions.Section 100.20 provides definitions to be used for terms in Part 100. Thedefinition of the term ``dwelling'' in the proposed rule stated that theterm include mobile home parks, condominiums and cooperatives. A numberof comments aruged that cooperatives, condominiums and mobile homes arenot ``dwellings'' within the meaning of the statutory definition of theterm. The Department disagrees. The statutory definition of a dwellingis ``any building, structure, or portion thereof which is occupied as,or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more families,and any vacant land which is offered for sale or lease for the constructionor location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion thereof.''This definition is clearly broad enough to cover each of the types of dwellingsenumerated in the proposed rule: mobile home parks, trailer courts, condominiums,cooperatives, and time-sharing properties. Several commenters suggestedthat the definitions of the terms ``dwelling'' and ``person'' should beexpanded to provide some illustrations, particularly in the areas relatingto handicap and familiar status. Other commenters recommended that the final rule should contain the samedefinitions as those provided in the Fair Housing Act. These commentersindicated that the addition of certain types of persons, or certain examplesof dwellings, could be viewed as indicating a restriction not contemplatedin the law. The Department has determined that, on balance, the need to leave openthe extent and scope of the terms defined in the Fair Housing Act outweighsthe need to provide comprehensive examples in connection with this rulemaking.As a result, the definitions of the terms ``dwelling'' and ``person'' havebeen revised to read as set forth in the statute. A number of commenters objected to the inclusion of the phrase ``is aboutto occur'' in the definition of the term ``aggrieved person''. These commenterssuggested that the addition of this phrase was inappropriate in that itwould make unlawful acts that have not occurred.The definition of the term ``aggrieved person'', as any person who claimsto have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice, or who believesthat he or she will be injured by a discriminatory housing practice thatis about to occur, is statutory and has not been changed in the final rule.The phrase ``is about to occur'' applies to a number of situations in whichit is clear to a person that, if he or she takes an action, he or she willbe subjected to a discriminatory act which will result in an injury. Insuch cases, the Fair Housing Act does not require these persons to exposethemselves to the injury involved with the actual act of discriminationbefore filing a comlaint.A number of commeters suggested that the definition of aggrieved personbe expanded to incorporate into the text of the rule the statement in thepreamble to the proposed rule that an ``aggrieved person includes a fairhousing organization as well as a tester or other person who seeks informationabout the availability of dwellings to determine whether discriminatoryhousing practices are occurring.'' In addition, several commenters suggestedthat references to providers of group homes for handicapped persons alsobe added to the definition. As indicated above, the Department has determined that the definitionsin these regulations which are terms defined in the Fair Housing Act shouldcontain the statutory language. However, the Department has consistentlyinterpreted the provisions of the fair housing law to permit the filingof a complaint by any person or organization which alleges that a discrimintoryhousing practice has occurred or is about to occur and which will resultin an injury to them. The proposed rule defined the ``broker'' or ``agent'' as any person authorizedto perform an action on behalf of another person regarding any matter relatedto the sale or rental of dwellings, including offers, solicitations orcontracts, and the administration of matters regarding such offers, solicitationsor contracts or any real estate-related transactions. Several commenterspointed out that the Fair Housing Act did not contain a definition of theseterms. These commenters also pointed out that the specific definition ofthese terms, for the purpose of this regulation, could result in a limitationon the types of persons who would be considered as brokers or agents inconnection with any other aspect of a housing transaction. The Department did not intend, in the proposed rule, to establish a universaldefinition of the terms ``broker'' or ``agent.'' However the Departmentbelieves that since these terms appear in numerous places throughout therule, guidance is necessary with respect to the scope of persons who areconsidered to be brokers and agents, particularly when such persons areinvolved in the sale or rental of dwellings. Therefore, a definition ofthe terms ``broker'' or ``agent'' has been retained in the final rule.In order to avoid confusion as to whether persons otherwise involved inhousing transactions are acting as brokers or agents, the definition hasbeen revised to provide that a broker or agent ``includes'' rather than``means'' persons described in the definition. Several persons indicated that the term ``person in the business of sellingor renting dwellings'', which was included as a defined term in the proposedrule, was never used in the text of the rule. These commenters suggestedthat the definition of this term be deleted. These commenters are in error,since the term appears in the exemption for the sale or rental of a singlefamily house by an owner, in andSection; 100.10(c)(l)(ii). The definition,which is taken from section 803(c) of the Fair Housing Act, has been retainedin the final rule. The remaining definitions in the proposed rule have not been changed inthe final rule.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Discriminatory Housing Practices</ITAG>Section 100.50 Realestate practices prohibited. Section 100.50 of the rule states that Subpart B provides the Department'sinterpretation of the conduct made unlawful under section 804 and section806 of the Fair Housing Act. In general, these provisions describe conductmade unlawful with regard to any aspect related to the sale, rental, oradvertising of dwellings and to the provisions of brokerage services andfacilities in connection with the sale or rental of dwellings. Section 100.50(b) describes the specific conduct made unlawful in relationto the sale or rental of dwellings. The conduct described in this sectionforms the basis for the subsequent sections in Subpart B. Each of the subsequentsections provides illustrations of the scope and applicability of the ruleto specific sales, rental and brokerage activities. While the illustrations are set forth under the section of Subpart B whichis most applicable to the discriminatory conduct described, andSection; 100.50indicates that an action described in one section can constitute a violationunder other sections as well. In addition, the illustrations of discriminatoryconduct in this subpart are only examples of discriminatory conduct thatviolates the Fair Housing Act and are not intended to limit the scope ofdiscrimination in housing made unlawful under the Fair Housing Act.With the exception of the revision of andSection; 100.50(b)(4), which wasdiscussed earlier in this preamble, no changes have been made in the textof andSection; 100.50.Section 100.60 Unlawful refusal to sell or rent or to negotiate for thesale or rental. Section 100.60 describes the actions which constitutes a refusal to sellor rent a dwelling when a <T3>bona fide</T3> offer is made or a refusal to negotiate with personsfor the sale or rental of a dwelling and which are unlawful when they aretaken because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familiar status,or national origin. As discussed earlier, the illustration contained in andSection; 100.60 (b)(5) has been removed, and the subsequent illustration has been renumberedaccordingly. No other changes have been made in this section of the finalrule. Section 100.65 Discrimination in terms, conditions and privileges and inservices and facilities. Section 100.65 provides that differences in the treatment of persons inconnection with the provision of services and facilities or in the termsor conditions relating to the sale or rental of a dwelling because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin constitutediscriminatory housing practices. The illustrations in andSection; 100.65(b) indicate that the coverage ofthis section extends beyond restrictions or differences in a lease or salescontract and the provision of different levels of maintenance. This sectionprovides that denials of, or limitations on the use of privileges, servicesor facilities, relating to the sale or rental of a dwelling because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national originare also discriminatory housing practices. In order to indicate the broad range of conduct which would constitutedifferent terms and conditions, the department has added another illustrationto this section (andSection; 100.65(b)(5)) indicating that denying or limitingservices or facilities to persons based on a person failing or refusingto grant sexual favors can constitute a discriminatory housing practice.A large number of comments received from persons owning or managing rentalhousing and associations representing such persons disagreed with the Department'sinterpretation of the Fair Housing Act as precluding different securitydeposit requirements for persons with handicaps and families with children.These comments generally took the position that mobility impaired personsin wheelchairs and small children would cause more damage to the interiorof dwellings, thus justifying the need for additional security to coverthe exposure of the owner or manager to make needed repairs when unitsoccupied by such persons are vacated. Since the Department has determinedthat in enacting the Fair Housing Act, Congress sought to provide the sameprotections to persons with handicaps and families with children as weremade available to other classes of protected persons, no change in theillustration in andSection; 100.65(a)(1) has been made. A number of commenters indicated that they customarily provided for reducedsecurity deposits for elderly persons renting units and asked whether continuingsuch practice would place them in violation of the Fair Housing Act. Aslong as such a policy is based solely on age, is available to persons ifthere are children in the family, and is not otherwise operated in a mannerthat results in the exclusion of families with children, such a practicewould not be unlawful. Another commenter indicated that charges for the provision of water, electricity,refuse collection and other services have have been based on the numberof persons who occupy a dwelling and asked whether such a policy wouldbe permissible. In order to determine whether such a policy is permissible,it would be necessary to understand more fully why it was implemented andhow it actually operates. Further, since policies such as this would requirereview on a case by case basis, the Department has determined that addressingthis issue in the final rule would not be appropriate. As discussed earlier in the preamble, the illustration in andSection; 100.65(b)(2)has been removed, pending Congressional review of pro-integration programs.Section 100.70 Other prohibited sale and rental conduct. Section 100.70 provides that restricting or attempting to restrict thehousing choices of persons, or engaging in any conduct relating to thesale or rental of a dwelling that otherwise makes unavailable or deniesdwellings, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin, is a discriminatory housing practice. Section 100.70(c) describes actions which result in limitations of housingchoice that would violate the Fair Housing Act. These practices, whichare commonly referred to as ``steering,'' include practices designed todiscourage persons from seeking housing in a particular community, neighborhood,or development because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin. The illustrations in andSection; 100.70(c)(1), (d)(1) and (d)(2) of the proposedrule have been removed in response to comments regarding Congressionalactivity in the area of affirmative action to promote integrated housing.In addition, it should be pointed out that the Department did not intendin the illustration in andSection; 100.70(d)(2) of the proposed rule to implythat language or sign interpreters were required with respect to transactionsinvolving a person who can not speak English or who has a hearing or visionimpairment. The remaining illustrations in the section have been renumbered.In the preamble discussion of andSection; 100.70 in the proposed rule, itwas stated, as an example, that a private developer's market-based decisionto include only efficiency apartments in a new development would not violatethe Fair Housing Act even though, ``as a practical matter, such housingwould be unavailable to families with children.'' A commenter pointed outthat it would be possible for a single parent and child to live in an efficiencyor one bedroom apartment, and that the example was not illustrative ofa situation in which housing would be unavailable to families with children.The Department agrees with the commenter's assertion. However, even thoughthe example may have been flawed, the Department wishes to reiterate thatit does not interpret the Fair Housing Act as precluding the constructionof apartment buildings with small units. In order to clarify that an unlawful refusal to deal with brokers and agentsincludes a refusal based on the race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin of the broker or agent as well as the race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin ofone or more of their clients the illustration in andSection; 100.70(d)(2)has been revised. A number of commenters suggested that the proposed rule did not addressspecifically situations in which families are discouraged from obtaininghousing because of the presence or possible presence of children. As discussedearlier in this preamble, the illustrations provided in the final ruleare intended to described discriminatory housing practices generally andare not intended to be exhaustive descriptions of all conduct made unlawfulunder the Fair Housing Act. For this reason, the department has determinednot to add a separate illustration with respect to steering conduct basedon familial status. Further, the illustrations in andSection; 100.70(c) (2)and (3) indicate conduct designed to discourage persons from obtaininga dwelling by exaggerating drawbacks or by communicating that certain personsare incompatible with existing residents is unlawful. The department believesthat these illustrations make it clear that representing that certain housingwould not be appropriate for, or would not be available to families withchildren would be prohibited under the Act. Several commenters also noted that the proposed rule did not address discriminatorylocal land use, health and safety, and zoning rules that eliminate communityhousing opportunities. As indicated in the preamble discussion relatingto Subpart D of this rule, the department has determined not to publishrules regarding issues relating to local government exercise of policepowers in the areas of land use and zoning. However, as discussed in thepreamble to the proposed rule, discrimination in the provision of thoseservices and facilities which are prerequisites to obtaining dwellings,including refusals to provide municipal services or adequate property orhazard insurance because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus or national origin render housing unavailable in violation of theFair Housing Act. In order to indicate that the refusal to provide, orthe provision of different municipal services or facilities and propertyor hazard insurance for dwellings because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, or national origin can constitute a violation of ``the otherwisemake unavailable or deny'' provisions in the Act, the language in andSection;100.70(d) has been revised and a new illustration (andSection; 100.70(d)(4))has been added. In addition, the illustration relating to discriminatoryadvertisements in andSection; 100.70(d)(6) of the proposed rule has beenremoved, since such practices are more appropriate to the conduct madeunlawful under andSection; 100.75 of the rule.Section 100.75 Discriminatory advertisements, statements, and notices.Although the Fair Housing Advertising Regulations (24 CFR Part 109) applyto all advertising for dwellings, the Department believes that it is appropriate,in connection with regulations describing prohibited conduct related tothe sale or rental of housing, to include additional guidance as to prohibitedconduct regarding this specific area. Section 100.75 describes prohibitedconduct related to advertisements, notices and statements by persons engagedin the sale or rental of housing or in the printing and publishing of suchadvertisements, notices and statements. No comments raised substantial issues regarding this provision, and ithas been included in the final rule as it was proposed.Section 100.80 Discriminatory representations on the availability of dwellings.Section 100.80 states that the provision of inaccurate or untrue informationabout the availability of dwellings for sale or rent because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin constitutesa violation of the Fair Housing Act. A person who receives the inaccurateor untrue information need not be an actual seeker of housing in orderto be the victim of a discriminatory housing practice under this section.A number of commenters requested that the final rule specifically indicatethat the provision of inaccurate information to ``testers'' because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national originis unlawful under the Fair Housing Act. These commenters also recommendedthat the final rule should state that ``testers'' who are provided inaccurateinformation are persons aggrieved by a discriminatory housing practicewho may file a complaint with the Secretary. In response to these comments, an additional illustration has been addedto this section which indicates that the provision of false or inaccurateinformation regarding the availability of dwellings to any person, includingtesters, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin would be unlawful under the Fair Housing Act.Section 100.85 Blockbusting. Blockbusting consists of any effort, for profit, to induce or attempt toinduce a person to sell or rent a dwelling by representations regardingthe entry into a neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin, orwith a handicap. Proposed andSection; 100.85(b) stated that it was not necessarythat there be in fact a profit realized as a result of blockbusting, aslong as the availability of profit was a factor involved in the blockbustingactivity. A number of commenters indicated that the term ``blockbusting''was archaic and could be misread as meaning only efforts to get peopleto move out of a block. In addition, these commenters suggested that thelanguage ``as long as the availability of profit was a factor'' would beconfusing, since most law in the area has focused on whether a profit-orientedbusiness is involved as well as whether the actions were taken for profit.The description of the conduct made unlawful under andSection; 100.85 followsthe statutory prohibitions against discrimination under section 804(e)of the Fair Housing Act. These practices have generally been referred toas blockbusting, and the term appears in the statute. The specific activitiesmade unlawful under section 804(e) would not be limited merely becauseof the use of the term ``blockbusting''. Therefore, the Department hasdetermined that, while another more current term also may aptly describethe type of activities covered by this section (e.g. panic selling andpanic buying), changing the terminology in this area could result in substantialconfusion as to whether the change in accepted terminology implied anychange in the coverage of the provision. In addition, the Department believesthat the language in the proposed rule regarding profit as a factor inunlawful blockbusting activities accurately describes the breadth of activitiescovered. Because the illustration in andSection; 100.85(c)(3) could be misinterpretedas implying that blockbusting activity involving uninvited solicitationsfor listings would violate the Act only if different or more intensivesolicitation activity were involved, this illustration has been removedin the final rule. However, in order to make clear that such practicescan constitute discriminatory housing practices, the illustration in andSection;100.85(c)(1) has been revised to include a specific reference to uninvitedsolicitation for listings which would constitute a violation of the Act.Section 100.90 Discrimination in the provision of brokerage services. Section 100.90 reflects the prohibition in the Fair Housing Act againstdenying any person access to, or membership or participation in, any multiplelisting service, real estate brokers' organization or facility relatingto the business of selling or renting dwellings on account of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. This sectionalso states that it is unlawful to discriminate against any person in theterms or conditions of such access, membership or participation becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.Several commenters requested that the Department provide an additionalexample of unlawful conduct relating to restrictions on access to servicethrough area limitations. In response to these commenters, a new illustrationdescribing unlawful discrimination in establishing geographic boundariesor office or residence requirements because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin has been added to this section.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_Discrimination in Residential Real Estate-Related Transactions</ITAG>Section100.110 Discriminatory practices in residential real estate-related transactions.Section 100.110 indicates the general prohibition against discriminationin the availability of, or in the terms or conditions imposed in, any residentialreal estate-related transaction because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin. The prohibitions againstdiscrimination in Subpart C apply to any person or other entity whose businessincludes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions.Several commenters recommended that the statement of general prohibitionagainst discrimination in residential real-estate related transactionsincorporate by reference, into the Fair Housing Act regulations, the regulatoryimplementation of the Equal Credit Opportunity Act by Federal financialregulatory agencies.The Equal Credit Opportunity Act (15 U.S.C. 1691) makes it unlawful, inpart, to discriminate against persons on the basis of race, color, religion,sex, national origin, marital status or age in any aspect related to acredit transaction.The Equal Credit Opportunity Act provides for administrative enforcementby specified Federal financial regulatory agencies and empowers the FederalTrade Commission to provide for overall enforcement of the Act.HUD has no enforcement authority under the Equal Credit Opportunity Actand no enforcement responsibility with respect to implementing regulationspublished by the Federal financial regulatory agencies under the EqualCredit Opportunity Act. As a result, the inclusion of such regulationsin this section by reference would have no legal effect. This comment hasbeen rejected.Section 100.115 Residential real estate-related transactions.This section incorporates into Part 100 the definition of the term ``residentialreal estate-related transaction'' contained in section 6(c) of the FairHousing Amendments Act of 1988. Section 100.120 Discrimination in the making of loans and in the provisionof other financial assistance.Section 100.120 states that it is unlawful for a person or entity engagedin residential real estate-related transactions to discriminate againstpersons because of race, color, religion sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin in making available loans or other financial assistancerelating to dwellings. The prohibitions against discrimination in the makingof loans and in the provision of other financial assistance reflects thelanguage relating to discrimination in the financing of housing under TitleVIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968.In connection with the development of andSection; 100.120, the Departmenthas been guided by its experience in connection with the past administrationand enforcement of Title VIII. Since the definition of the term ``residentialreal estate-related transactions'' covers loans and other financial assistancewhich are secured by residential real estate, the defininition expandsthe types of financing transactions which were previously covered by thenondiscrimination requirements of Title VIII. However, there is nothingin the legislative history of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 toindicate that the Congress intended that loans and other assistance securedby a dwelling be treated any differently than loans for the purchase, construction,improvement, repair, or maintenance of a dwelling. Thus, this section appliesequally to both types of loans.As discussed earlier in this preamble, the illustrations of the applicationof this section that were contained in andSection; 100.120(b)(1), (3), (4),(5), (6), and (7) of the proposed rule have been removed, pending Congressionalaction on the issue of pro-integration activities.Section 100.125 Discrimination in the purchasing of loans.The principal change in the nature of the conduct made unlawful regardingloans and other assistance with respect to dwellings is the inclusion ofactivities relating to the purchase of such loans. In prohibiting discriminationin the purchasing of loans, Congress extended the coverage of the FairHousing Act to conduct in the secondary mortgage market. However, the HouseReport on the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 states, with regard tothis expanded coverage, ``The Committee does not intend that those purchasingmortgage loans be precluded from taking into consideration factors justifiedby business necessity (including requirements of Federal law) which relateto the financial security of the transaction or the protection againstdefault or diminution in the value of the property.'' House Report at 30.Section 100.125 sets forth the new coverage of secondary mortgage marketactivities under the Fair Housing Act. Since the protections provided underthis section are new, the illustrations of discriminatory housing practicesin this section focus on general areas of unlawful conduct under the Act.In this respect, the illustrations indicate that conduct made unlawfulwith regard to secondary mortgage market activities includes actions takenwith respect to the purchase and pooling of mortgage loans as well as withrespect to the terms and conditions of the sale of securities issued onthe basis of such loans.Commenters on this section were in general agreement with the overall contentof the provisions in the proposed rule but recommended that certain languagein the House Report, which they pointed out was also used by Senator Kennedyin a colloquy with Senator Sasser on the floor of the Senate, see 134 Cong.Rec. S10549 (daily ed. Aug. 2, 1988), be included in the text of the rule.Since there is a clear indication of congressional intent with respectto transactions involving the purchasing of loans, language relating tofactors justified by business necessity have been added. Thus, this provisionwould not preclude considerations employed in normal and prudent transactionsprovided that no such factor may in any way relate to race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status or national origin.One commenter representing mortgage bankers indicated that the term ``purchasing''of housing loans in the mortgage banking business could involve a numberof different and unrelated types of activities. This commenter describedmortgage loan activities engaged in by mortgage bankers as involving theoriginating, selling and servicing of mortgages. This commenter pointedout that, in mortgage banking, the term ``purchasing'' has been used looselyto describe the purchase of rights to service mortgages. In this process,the equitable interest in the loan remains unaffected but the legal titleto the loan and the right to service the loan and retain servicing feeshas been purchased. Based on this description, the commenter indicatedits belief that such transactions would be outside the coverage of theFair Housing Act because such transactions did not involve any financingdecision by the purchaser (since the loan had been closed prior to thepurchase of servicing rights) and suggested that the final rule definethe term ``purchase'' in a manner to exclude such transactions from theFair Housing Act.Section 805 of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 made it unlawful ``to denya loan or other financial assistance to a person applying therefor * ** or to discriminate against him in the fixing of the amount, interestrate, duration, or other terms or conditions of such loan or other financialassistance * * *''In amending this section of the Fair Housing Act, Congress revised thethrust of the prohibitions covered under Section 805 to protect personsfrom discrimination in residential real estate-related transactions whichwere defined to include ``the purchasing of loans * * * secured by residentialreal estate.''Under the Fair Housing Act, the nature of discriminatory conduct no longercan be limited to matters relating to the actual provision of financing.Further, the fact that the interest transferred in the servicing transactioninvolves only the legal title to the loans would not be a basis for concludingthat there has not been a residential real estate-related transaction.For these reasons the recommendation in the comment has not been adoptedin the final rule.Section 100.130 Discrimination in the terms and conditions for making availableloans or other financial assistance.Section 100.130 states that it is unlawful to impose different terms orconditions for the availability of a loan or other financial assistancefor a dwelling or which is, or will be secured by a dwelling because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.As discussed earlier in the preamble, the illustrations proposed in andSection;100.130(b) (1) and (4) have been removed from the final rule in order toavoid anticipating the results of ongoing congressional analysis of issuesrelating to pro-integrative programs. Other illustrations and the generalprovision regarding discriminatory conduct under this section were notthe subject of significant comment and have been retained in the finalrule.A substantial number of commenters had significant concerns relating tothe issue of ``redlining'' as it was discussed in the preamble to the proposedrule. Much of the concern relating to this discussion focused on the statementthat financial transactions in many cases involve ``legitimate businessjudgments and complex financial, economic and social issues and problems''.Many of the commenters asserted that this statement could be read to indicatethat proof of actual intent to discriminate would be required in orderto establish unlawful redlining under the Fair Housing Act. Other commentersindicated that the quoted language could be read as creating other considerationsbeyond those necessary in the business of making a decision on a loan (i.e.,economic and social issues and problems) which have not been traditionallyevaluated in the investigation of fair housing complaints and which arenot relevant to the making of loans.The Department agrees with the commenters that economic and social issuesand problems are not relevant in connection with the review and analysisof cases under the Fair Housing Act. However, the Department does not believethat the reference to legitimate business judgments implies that proofof intent to discriminate is or is not required in redlining cases. Thelanguage in the preamble was intended to indicate that, in the decisionto provide loans or other financial assistance, a lender may consider factorsjustified by business necessity, provided that such factors are unrelatedto race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.This articulation is consistent with the preamble discussion relating tothe purchasing of loans and the revised text of andSection; 100.125 of thefinal rule.Several commenters urged that the prohibition against redlining be includedin the rule text. However, in view of the removal of the illustrationsin andSection; 100.130(1) (b) and (4), the Department has determined thatit would not be appropriate to add such an illustration.Section 100.135 Unlawful practices in the selling, brokering, or appraisingof residential real property.The prohibitions against discrimination because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin in connection with residentialreal estate-related transactions apply to the selling, brokering and appraisingof residential real property. Section 100.135(a) of the proposed rule statedthat it is unlawful for any person whose business includes engaging inthe selling, brokering or appraising of residential real property to discriminateagainst any person in making available such services, or in the terms orconditions of such services, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. Paragraph (a) of the final rule hasbeen revised for the sake of clarity. It states that it is unlawful forany person or other entity whose business includes engaging in the selling,brokering or appraising of residential real property to discriminate againstany person in making available such services or in the performance of suchservices because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial statusor national origin.For the purpose of this rule, the term ``appraisal'' means an estimateor opinion of the value of a specified residential real property made ina commercial context in connection with the sale, rental, financing orrefinancing of a dwelling or with any other residential real estate-relatedtransaction, whether the appraisal is oral or written, or transmitted formallyor informally.The Fair Housing Act provides a specific exemption related to appraisals,stating that nothing in the Act prohibits a person in the business of furnishingappraisals of real property to take into consideration factors other thanrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.However, the Department indicated in the preamble to the proposed ruleits position that consideration of any factor because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin <T3>does </T3>constitute a discriminatory housing practice.Two professional organizations representing appraisers agreed with thedescription of the coverage of appraisal practices but suggested that thelanguage used in the illustrations could be read as precluding, in certaininstances, the use of observable, verifiable data that affect the marketvalue of property in a particular area, such as the proximity of certainfacilities or services. In this respect, they suggested that the illustrationsin this section should be revised to reflect more clearly the fact thatappraisers can consider any factors other than race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin in the appraisal of residentialreal property.The illustrations in andSection; 100.135(d) (1), (2), and (3) have been removedin the final rule, pending the result of congressional action with respectto the issue of pro-integrative activities, and since the regulation incorporatesthe statutory language on the use of other factors. In addition, paragraph(d) has been shortened and revised so that it will not inadvertently prohibitappraisers from considering factors which may lawfully be considered. Paragraph(d) of the final rule states that practices which are unlawful under andSection;100.135include, but are not limited to, using an appraisal of residential realproperty in connection with the sale, rental, or financing of any dwellingwhere the person knows or reasonably should know that the appraisal improperlytakes into consideration race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus or national origin. The word ``improperly'' was added so that itwill be absolutely clear that an appraisal may, for example, consider anadaptable physical environment as a positive factor in estimating the valueof residential real property. However, the Department wishes to stressthat it would not be proper or lawful, for example, to consider factorssuch as race, sex or national origin in appraising residential real property.These commenters also indicated that the use of the term ``commercial context''in andSection;100.135(b) would lead to confusion within the appraisal industryas to the type of structures to which the nondiscrimination requirementsin the Fair Housing Act apply.The use of the term ``commercial context'' in the regulation was intendedto indicate that the situations covered were directly related to conductof the business of appraising and were not intended to diminish the rightsof persons with respect to their private rights under the First Amendment.To avoid the possibility of confusion in this area, the word ``business''has been substituted for ``commercial'' in this section.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Prohibitions Against Discrimination Because of Handicap</ITAG>Section100.200 Purpose.Section 100.200 is unchanged from the proposed rule. It explains that thepurpose of Subpart D is to effectuate the provisions concerning handicapin the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988. No comments were received onandSection;100.200.Section 100.201 Definitions.Section 100.201 proposed definitions to be used for terms used only inSubpart D. The definitions in Subpart A also apply to Subpart D. Substantialcomments were received on the definitions in the proposed rule that arediscussed below. The other definitions have not been modified.An editorial change has been made to the final definition of ``accessible''.The proposed rule stated that a public or common use area that complieswith the appropriate requirements of ANSI A117.1 or another standard thataffords handicapped persons access essentially equivalent to or greaterthan that required by ANSI A117.1 is ``accessible''. The final rule statesmore simply that a public or common use area that complies with the appropriaterequirements of ANSI A117.1-1986 or a comparable standard is ``accessible''.The final sentence of the definitions of ``accessible route'' and ``buildingentrance on an accessible route'' have also been changed for the sake ofconsistency.``ANSI A117.1'' means the American National Standard for buildings andfacilities providing accessibility and usability for physically handicappedpeople. The American National Standards Institute, Inc. (ANSI) is a private,national organization that publishes standards on a wide variety of subjects.The Secretariat that developed the 1986 edition of the ANSI standard wascomposed of the National Easter Seal Society, the President's Committeeon Employment of the Handicapped, and HUD. The current version of thesestandards was published in 1986 and is referred to as ``ANSI A117.1-1986''.The preamble of the proposed rule explained that whenever ANSI A117.1 isused in Subpart D, the reference is to the most recently published editionof ANSI A117.1 as of the date bids for construction of a particular buildingare solicited. A number of commenters suggested that this statement shouldappear in the text of the regulation. Other commenters objected that an``open-ended'' reference to future ANSI standards represents an unlawfuldelegation of the Department's rulemaking authority. According to thesecommenters, HUD should refer to a specific edition of the AMSI standardsin its rule and should incorporate future editions only through rulemakingproceedings. Because of this concern the definition of ANSI A117.1 in thefinal rule is defined as the 1986 edition of ANSI (``ANSI A117.1-1986.'').The Department intends to propose to amend the definition of ANSI as futureeditions of ANSI are published.``Building'' means a structure, facility or the portion thereof that containsor serves one or more dwelling units. For example, a structure that servesone or more dwelling units includes a structure containing recreationalfacilities for residents of an apartment complex. A substantial numberof comments were received on this definition as it applies to townhouses.The application of Subpart D to townhouses is discussed in connection withthe definition of the term ``covered multifamily dwellings''. The definitionof ``building'' has not been changed from the proposed rule.``Common use areas'' means rooms, spaces or elements inside or outsidea building that are made available for the use of residents of a buildingor the guests thereof. The proposed rule cited as examples of common areashallways, lounges, lobbies, laundry rooms, refuse rooms and passagewaysamong and between buildings. A number of commenters suggested that mailroomsand recreational areas be added to this list. Other commenters, includingthe National Apartment Association, argued that the definition should notinclude ``public amenities'' such as swimming pools, jacuzzis, hot tubs,saunas or exercise facilities. They suggest that the legislative historyis silent with respect to such facilities.The definition of common use areas in the rule is a close adaptation ofthe definition of the term ``common use'' in ANSI A117.1-1986. Since theAct makes specific reference to ANSI, the Department believes that Congressintended that the ANSI definition apply. Furthermore, the House Reportstates that the Act's requirement that the public and common use portionsof covered multifamily dwellings be readily accessible to and usable byhandicapped persons ``means that hallways, lounges, lobbies, passagewaysamong and between buildings and other common areas <T3>and facilities</T3> not contain barriers to entrance and use by handicappedpersons.'' House Report at 26 (emphasis supplied). Mailrooms and recreationalareas can fairly be read as falling within this description. Therefore,these two additional examples have been added to the list of common useareas because they fall within the definition. The list in the final ruleis illustrative and not exclusive. In this regard, the Department notesthat the House Report states that the Act does not require that all entrancesto public and common use areas be made accessible to handicapped persons.Rather, the Act requires that ``one regular entrance to such areas be accessibleto handicapped persons for the same purpose for which it is used by others.''<T3>Id.</T3> Further, the Act does not require that amenities be installed.``The intent of the language is that only if such amenities are provided,then they must be readily accessible to and usable by handicapped persons.''<T3>Id.</T3>A ``covered multifamily dwelling'' means buildings consisting of 4 or moredwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and groundfloor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of 4 or more dwellingunits. The preamble of the proposed rule explained that a single structureconsisting of 5 two-story townhouses is not a ``covered multifamily dwelling''if the units do not have elevators, because the entire dwelling unit isnot on the ground floor. In contrast, a single-story townhouse is a coveredmultifamily dwelling. A number of commenters agreed with this interpretation;some reasoned that townhouses are not multifamily buildings because eachunit typically has a separate outside entrance.Other commenters objected to this interpretation, arguing that townhousesare covered because Congress intended that there be a broad interpretationof the Act. They believe that Congress intended to exempt otherwise covereddwellings from accessibility requirements only if <T3>no</T3> part of the dwelling unit touched the ground floor. These commenterscited in support of their position a statement made by Senator Kennedyduring the Senate debate on the Act, in which he referred to the need tomake the ground floor of multi-level housing accessible so that friendsand relatives with mobility impairments can visit. Specifically, SenatorKennedy stated as follows: ``This legislation does not affect the single-familyhome. What we are talking about is the multifamily dwelling with four ormore units. You only have to meet these very simple [accessibility] requirementsif you actually have an elevator, or, if you do not have an elevator, onlythe bottom floor <T3>unit</T3> is covered.'' 134 Cong. Rec. S. 10538 (daily ed. August 2,1988) (emphasis added). Senator Kennedy's later reference to the importanceof making units accessible so that friends and relatives can visit wasin response to Senator Humphrey's proposal to limit the scope of the Act'saccessibility requirements to 20 percent of the units. <T3>Id.</T3> The Department believes that the Senate debate referencedby these commenters supports its interpretation because Senator Kennedyspoke of ``bottom floor units.'' The first floor of a multi-story townhouseis not a bottom floor unit because the entire unit is not on the bottomor ground floor.Most significantly, the accessibility requirements of the Act itself extendonly to ``ground floor units'' in buildings without elevators. The commenters'position would require reading ``ground floor units'' as ``ground floor<T3>portions of</T3> units.'' The Act also requires that all premises withincovered multifamily dwellings have an accessible route into and throughthe dwelling. A ``covered'' townhouse of more than one story would in mostcases require an elevator in order to provide an accessible route throughout.This result would make the Act's distinction between buildings with elevatorsand buildings without elevators meaningless. Beyond this, the House Report(at p. 25) makes it clear that the Act was not intended to require theinstallation of elevators.For these reasons the Department continues to believe that townhouses consistingof more than one story are covered only if they have elevators and if thereare four or more such townhouses. Accordingly, the definition of ``coveredmultifamily dwellings'' in the final rule is unchanged from the proposedrule.``Dwelling unit'' was defined in the proposed rule as ``any building, structureor portion thereof, which is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancyas, a residence by one person or family.'' 53 FR 45029 (November 7, 1988).A significant number of comments, including comments submitted by SenatorsKennedy and Specter and Representative Edwards, were concerned that thephrase ``one person or family'' would be too restrictive in that individualswith handicaps may require a personal attendant to live with them, or mayfind it beneficial to live with another individual, who is or is not alsohandicapped. For example, an individual with a disability may live withan attendant who is not a member of his or her family. Other commenterswere concerned that the definition of ``dwelling unit'' is too similarto the definition of ``dwelling'' in andSection;100.20. They found the similarityconfusing. In order to accommodate these concerns the definition of ``dwellingunit'' has been revised substantially in the final rule. The final ruledefines ``dwelling unit'' as ``a single unit of residence for a familyor one or more persons.'' The definition in the final rule also containsa more comprehensive list of examples of dwelling units in order to furtherclarify the types of units that may be covered. Examples of dwelling unitsinclude a single family home and an apartment unit within an apartmentbuilding. In other types of dwellings (as defined in andSection;100.20) inwhich sleeping accommodations are provided but toileting or cooking facilitiesare shared by occupants of more than one room or portion of the dwelling,rooms in which people sleep are ``dwelling units''. For example, dormitoryrooms and sleeping accommodations intended for occupancy as a residencein shelters for homeless persons are ``dwelling units''.``First occupancy'' means a building that has never before been used forany purpose. This definition is unchanged from the proposed rule. A numberof commenters stated that HUD should state explicitly that substantialrehabilitation is not covered. The Department believes that the definitionclearly excludes a substantially rehabilitated building because one couldnot reasonably argue that such a building ``has never before been usedfor any purpose.''``Ground floor'' means any floor of a building with a building entranceon an accessible route. A building may have more than one ground floor.This definition was the subject of considerable public comment. Many commentersinterpreted the proposed rule as <T3>requiring</T3> that covered buildings have more than one ground floor.This is not what the Department proposed. Section 100.205(a) requires thatcovered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991,be designed and constructed to have <T3>at least one</T3> building entrance on an accessible route unless itis impractical to do so because of the terrain or unusual characteristicsof the site. The regulation does not require that any building have <T3>more</T3> than one ground floor; a covered building with one buildingentrance on an accessible route (<T3>i.e.,</T3> ground floor) satisfies the requirements of the regulationwith regard to accessibility to the building. However, if a covered buildingin fact has more than one floor with a building entrance on an accessibleroute, then the rule requires that the units on <T3>each</T3> floor with an accessible building entrance satisfy the Act'saccessibility requirements. Other commenters correctly interpreted the proposed rule as requiring thatthere be one building entrance on an accessible route but nonetheless arguedthat <T3>even if</T3> a particular building, because of the terrain, has accessibleentrances to more than one floor, the units on only one such floor shouldbe required to meet the Act's accessibility requirements. The Departmentdoes not believe that Congress intended to exempt from the Act's accessibilityrequirements dwelling units that are on a floor of a building that canbe entered through a building entrance on an accessible route. If a buildingdoes not have an elevator, then all of the units on accessible floors mustmeet the Act's accessibility requirements. <T3>Definition of ``Handicap''.</T3> The term ``handicap'' means, withrespect to a person, a physical or mental impairment which substantiallylimits one or more of such person's major life activities; a record ofhaving such an impairment; or being regarded as having such an impairment.However, this term does not include current, illegal use of or addictionto a controlled substance. The term also does not include an individualsolely because that individual is a transvestite. Paragraphs (a), (b),(c) and (d) of the definition clarify the key phrases in the definition:``physical or mental impairment''; ``major life activities''; ``has a recordof such an impairment''; and ``is regarded as having an impairment''. A substantial number of comments were received on the definition of ``handicap''in the proposed rule. They fall generally into two different groups. One group of commenters, including the National Association of Homebuildersand the National Association of Realtors, requested that paragraphs (a),(b), (c) and (d) of the definition in the proposed rule be deleted. Thesecommenters are concerned that these paragraphs broaden the definition ofhandicap ``far beyond'' the intent of Congress as expressed in the plainlanguage of the statute. Moreover, they are concerned that the definitionof handicap is so broad that housing providers will be powerless to excludehandicapped persons with a tendency toward antisocial or dangerous behavior.With the exception of current, illegal use of or an addiction to a controlledsubstance, the definition of ``handicap'' in the Act is very similar tothe definition of the term ``individual with handicaps'' in the RehabilitationAct of 1973. 29 U.S.C. 706. Congress intended that the definition of ``handicap''in the Fair Housing Amendments Act be interpreted in a manner that is consistentwith regulations interpreting the meaning of the similar provision foundin section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794. HouseReport at 22; 134 Cong. Rec. S10492 (daily ed. August 1, 1988) (statementof Sen. Chafee); 134 Cong. Rec. H4689 (daily ed. June 23, 1988) (statementof Rep. Pelosi); 134 Cong. Rec. H4612 (daily ed. June 22, 1988) (statementof Rep. Schroeder). Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act prohibits discrimination againstotherwise qualified individuals with handicaps in programs or activitiesreceiving federal financial assistance as well as in federally conductedprograms and activities. The Department of Justice's section 504 coordinationregulation for federally assisted programs is at 28 CFR Part 41. HUD'ssection 504 regulation for federally assisted programs is at 24 CFR Part8. Paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of the definition of ``handicap'' closelyfollow the definitions of these key phrases used in regulations interpretingsection 504. In light of the clear legislative history indicating thatCongress intended that the definition of ``handicap'' be fully as broadas that provided by the Rehabilitation Act, the Department does not believethat it would be appropriate to delete paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d)from the definition. Some of the commenters who requested this change appear erroneously toassume that a housing provider must admit any person who has a handicapas defined in the rule. This is not the case. Just because an applicantfor housing has a handicap does not preclude a housing provider from lawfullyrejecting that particular applicant. For example, alcoholism is considereda ``physical or mental impairment'' and therefore alcoholics frequentlywill fall within the definition of ``handicap''. However, the fact thatalcoholism may be a handicap does not mean that housing providers mustignore this condition in determining whether an applicant for housing isqualified. On the contrary, a housing provider may hold an alcoholic tothe same standard of performance and behavior (<T3>e.g.,</T3> tenant selection criteria) to which it holds others, evenif any unsatisfactory performance or behavior is related to the applicant'salcoholism. In other words, while an alcoholic may not be rejected by ahousing provider because of his or her alcoholism, the behaviorial manifestationsof the condition may be taken into consideration in determining whetheror not he or she is qualified. Thus, a housing provider may judge handicapped persons on the same basisit judges all other applicants and residents. A housing provider may considerfor <T3>all</T3> applicants, including handicapped applicants, such concernsas past rental history, violations of rules and laws, a history of disruptive,abusive, or dangerous behavior. However, a housing provider may not treathandicapped applicants or tenants less favorably than other applicantsor tenants. For example, a housing provider may not presume that applicantswith handicaps are less likely to be qualified than applicants withouthandicaps. Another group of commenters asked HUD to clarify that persons who are infectedwith the Human Immunodeficiency Virus (``HIV'' or ``AIDS virus'') are understoodto be persons with a ``handicap'' protected by the Act. The legislativehistory of the Act contains numerous statements that HIV-infected individualsare covered by the Act. <T3>See</T3> House Report at 22, n. 55; 134 Cong. Rec. H4922 (daily ed.June 29, 1988) (statement of Rep. Owens); 134 Cong. Rec. at H4221 (dailyed. June 29, 1988) (statement of Rep. Waxman); 134 Cong. Rec. H4612 (dailyed. June 22, 1988) (statement of Rep. Schroeder); 134 Cong. Rec. H4613(daily ed. June 22, 1988) (statement of Rep. Coelho); 134 Cong. Rec. H4689(daily ed. June 23, 1988) (statement of Rep. Pelosi). In addition, theOffice of Legal Counsel of the U.S. Department of Justice issued an opiniondated September 17, 1988 concluding that section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973 protects symptomatic and asymptomatic HIV-infected individualsagainst discrimination in any covered program or activity on the basisof any actual, past or perceived effect of HIV infection that substantiallylimits any major life activity, so long as the HIV-infected individualis ``otherwise qualified'' to participate in the program or activity, asdetermined under the ``otherwise qualified'' standard set forth by theU.S. Supreme Court in <T3>School Board of Nassau County v. Arline,</T3> 107 S. Ct. 1123 (1987)(<T3>Arline</T3>). This opinion is significant because, as previously noted,the legislative history of the Fair Housing Amendments Act makes it clearthat Congress intended the same definition of the term handicap that appliesunder section 504 to apply to the Fair Housing Act. In light of these authorities,the Department has added ``Human Immunodeficiency Virus infection'' tothe illustrative list of ``physical or mental impairments'' in the finalrule's definition of handicap. ``Interior'' means the spaces, parts, components or elements of an individualdwelling unit. The comments received relative to this definition are discussedin connection with comments received on andSection; 100.203 of the proposedrule relating to modifications of existing premises. The definition of``interior'' has not been changed from the proposed rule. ``Premises'' means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components orelements of a building or a dwelling unit, including individual dwellingunits and the public and common use areas of a building. The comments receivedrelative to this definition are discussed in connection with the commentsreceived on andSection; 100.203 of the proposed rule relating to modificationsof existing premises. The definition has not been changed from the proposedrule. Section 100.202 General prohibitions against discrimination because ofhandicap.Section 100.202 contains the general prohibitions against discriminationbecause of handicap and serves as the analytical foundation for the remainingsections of the subpart. The remaining sections of Subpart D explain ingreater detail what conduct is discriminatory. Thus, whenever a personhas violated any of the subsequent sections of Subpart D, that person hasalso violated andSection; 100.202Paragraph (a) is unchanged from the proposed rule. It restates the FairHousing Amendments Act's mandate of nondiscrimination in the sale or rentalof dwellings. Under paragraph (a), it is unlawful to discriminate againstany person in the sale or rental of, or to otherwise make unavailable ordeny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a handicap of that buyeror renter, a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwellingafter it is so sold, rented, or made unavailable, or any person associatedwith that buyer or renter.Paragraph (b) is also unchanged from the proposed rule. It restates thatAct's ban of discrimination in the terms, conditions, or privileges ofthe sale or rental of a dwelling. Paragraph (b) makes it unlawful to discriminateagainst any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of the saleor rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilitiesin connection with such dwelling because of a handicap of that buyer orrenter, a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling afterit is so sold, rented, or made available, or any person associated withthat person.<T3>Land Use and Zoning Rules and Practices.</T3> The thrust of the publiccomments received on the general prohibitions in paragraphs (a) and (b)is that the rule does not address explicitly discriminatory local landuse, health and safety, and zoning rules that ``eliminate'' community housingopportunities for persons with disabilities. These commenters ask thatthe Department add to the regulation a prohibition on rules and practiceswhich establish unique requirements for housing for persons with disabilitiesand which create barriers to the development of such housing. These commenterscorrectly point out that the House Report discusses such matters in considerabledetail. Specifically, the House Report states that the prohibition againstdiscrimination against those with handicaps was intended to apply to zoningdecisions and practices: ``The Act is intended to prohibit the applicationof special restrictive covenants, and conditional or special use permitsthat have the effect of limiting the ability of such individuals to livein the residence of their choice in the community.'' House Report at 24.The Department does not believe that it would be appropriate to addressthe issue in these regulations. This concern is heightened since, undersection 810(g)(2)(C) of the Fair Housing Act, as amended, if the Secretarydetermines that a matter involves the legality of any State or local zoningor other land use law or ordinance, the Secretary shall immediately referthe matter to the Attorney General for appropriate action under section814 of the Fair Housing Act. Since the Secretary has no power to issuea charge of discrimination in matters involving zoning or other land uselaw, the Department believes that it is inappropriate to address this specificissue in these regulations. However, it should be noted that failing orrefusing to provide municipal services for dwellings or providing suchservices differently because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus or national origin is a violation of andSection; 100.70(c)(6) of theseregulations.<T3>Applicant Selection Inquiries.</T3> Paragraph (c) is an adaptationof the ``pre-employment inquiries'' provision in the section 504 regulations;it prohibits inquiries to determine whether an applicant for a dwelling,a person intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rentedor made available, or any person associated with that person has a handicapor to make inquiry as to the nature or severity of a handicap of such person.Paragraph (c) also states that it does not prohibit five types of inquiries,provided these inquiries are made of all applicants, whether or not theyhave handicaps. Paragraph (c) resulted in considerable public comment.Paragraph (c)(1) clarifies that a housing provider may inquire into anapplicant's ability to meet the requirements of ownership or tenancy. Commentersgenerally considered this particular inquiry helpful in providing guidanceto both housing providers and housing applicants.Paragraph (c)(2) states that paragraph (c) does not prohibit inquiry todetermine whether an applicant is qualified for a dwelling that is availableonly to persons with handicaps or to persons with a particular type ofhandicap. Paragraph (c)(3) provides that paragraph (c) does not prohibitan inquiry to determine whether an applicant for a dwelling is qualifiedfor a priority available to persons with handicaps or to persons with aparticular type of handicap. These two inquiries where criticized by organizationsrepresenting persons with disabilities, including the Consortium for Citizenswith Developmental Disabilities. These commenters fear that such inquirieswill be abused by housing providers as a means of impermissibly inquiringabout the extent or severity of a disability. Nonetheless, some of thesecommenters recognized that the ability to make these inquiries often isnecessary to determine eligibility for government housing programs; forexample, some Federal and State housing is designed for, and occupied by,persons with handicaps. Only persons with handicaps are eligible to livein such dwellings. Beyond this, as the Department explained in the proposedrule, the Fair Housing Amendments Act does not prohibit the exclusion ofnon-handicapped persons from dwellings. A privately owned unsubsidizedhousing facility may lawfully restrict occupancy to persons with handicaps.The owner or operator of such a housing facility must therefore be permittedto inquire of applicants to determine whether they have a handicap forthe purpose of determining eligibility.A housing provider may also choose to offer some or all of its units topersons with handicaps on a priority basis and may inquire whether applicantsqualify for such a priority. For example, a housing provider may offeraccessible units to persons with mobility impairments on a priority basisand may ask applicants whether they have a mobility impairment which wouldqualify them for such a priority but may not in such circumstances askapplicants whether they have other types of impairments.After carefully considering the comments received the Department continuesto believe that the inquiries permitted by paragraphs (c) (2) and (3) areconsistent with the Act and that the benefits of permitting these inquiriesoutweigh the potential for abuse, because the circumstances in which suchinquiries can be made are carefully circumscribed. A dwelling must eitherbe available only to persons with handicaps or to persons with a particulartype of handicap or the dwelling must genuinely be available on a prioritybasis to persons with a handicap or to persons with a particular type ofhandicap. Otherwise, such an inquiry cannot be made.Paragraph (c)(4) provides that paragraph (c) does not prohibit inquiringwhether an applicant for a dwelling is a current illegal abuser of or addictto a controlled substance. The definition of ``handicap'' in the Fair HousingAmendments Act does not include current, illegal use of or addiction toa controlled substance. <T3>See </T3>House Report at 30. Paragraph (c)(4) was not the subject ofsubstantial comment and is unchanged from the proposed rule.Paragraph (c)(5) provides that paragraph (c) does not prohibit inquiringwhether an applicant has been convicted of the illegal manufacture or distributionof a controlled substance. Section 807(b)(4) of the Fair Housing Act statesthat nothing in the Act prohibits conduct against a person because suchperson has been convicted by any court of competent jurisdiction of theillegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance. Paragraph(c)(5) was not the subject of substantial comment and is unchanged fromthe proposed rule.Paragraph (d) restates new section 804(f)(9) of the Fair Housing Act whichprovides that nothing in section 804(f) requires that a dwelling be madeavailable to an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threatto the health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would resultin substantial physical damage to the property of others. This paragraphwas criticized by organizations representing disabled persons because itsimply repeats the statutory language and provides no guidance concerningits proper implementation. Furthermore, the placement of the language containedin paragraph (d) was questioned, in that it follows a list of questionsthat housing providers are permitted to ask to determine the qualificationsof applicants. These commenters fear that the absence of any detail beyondthe statutory language might suggest that a housing provider need not followany objective method for determing that an applicant ``would constitutea direct threat to the health or safety of other individuals.'' At thesame time, these commenters recognized that the preamble of the proposedrule contained considerable explanation of paragraph (d). 53 FR 45001-02(November 7, 1988). The preamble discussion was considered by these commentersto be consistent with the intent of the statute. A number of commenterssuggested that the preamble language be incorporated in the rule.On the other hand, organizations representing housing providers are concernedthat property owners or managers will not be able to determine whetheror not an applicant poses a threat to the safety of others without substantialamounts of information and that they ultimately will be subject to increasedliability. They ask that the regulations be revised expressly to permita property owner or manager to inquire into a prospective tenant's ``historyof antisocial behavior or tendencies.'' Alternatively, it was suggestedthat HUD promulgate a regulation that absolves a property owner or managerof liability for any injury caused by reason of a condition of a personwith a handicap.The Department does not believe that it is necessary or appropriate toincorporate detailed preamble language discussing the Supreme Court decisionin <T3>School Board of Nassau County v. Arline, </T3>107 S Ct. 1123 (1987),into the regulation. This is especially true since the case law in thisarea continues to develop at a relatively rapid pace. However, the Departmentwishes to stress that it will interpret and enforce paragraph (d) consistentwith the discussion in the preamble of the proposed rule and envolvingcase law.The Department also does not believe that it would be appropriate to reviseandSection; 100.202 expressly to permit inquiries into ``antisocial'' behavioror ``tendencies.'' Language such as this might well be seen as creatingor permitting a presumption that individuals with handicaps generally posea greater threat to the health or safety of others than do individualswithout handicaps. Such a presumption is unwarranted and would run counterto the intent and purpose of the Act. House Report at 28. Likewise, a regulatoryprovision stating that housing provides shall not be liable for personalinjury or property damages caused by reason of another person's handicapcould also be seen as creating a presumption that persons with handicapsare more likely to pose a threat to persons or property that are otherpersons and would run counter to the intent of the Act, since Congressmade no such presumption. For example, the House Committee on the Judiciarystated that it did not ``foresee that the tenancy of any individual withhandicaps would pose any risk, much less a significant risk, to the healthor safety of others by the status of being handicapped * * *.'' <T3>Id.</T3>For these reasons, andSection; 100.202 is unchanged from the proposed rule.Section 100.203 Reasonable modifications of existing premises.Paragraph (a) implements section 804(f)(3)(A) of the Fair Housing Act,as amended. Under paragraph (a), it is illegal to refuse to permit a tenantwith disabilities to make reasonable modifications, at his or her expense,of existing premises if the proposed modifications are necessary for thefull enjoyment of the premises. In the case of a rental, the landlord may,where it is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modificationon the renter agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the conditionthat existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted.Paragraph (a) allows reasonable modifications at the expense of the individualwith handicaps to existing ``premises''. ``Premises'' is defined in andSection;100.201 to mean the interior or exterior parts, components or elementsof a building or a dwelling unit, including the public and common use areasof a building. Thus, an individual with handicaps would be able, at hisor her own expense, to make reasonable accommodations to lobbies, mainentrances of apartment buildings, laundry rooms and other common and publicuse areas necessary to the full enjoyment of the premises. The Departmentproposed to define the term ``premises'' to encompass the public and commonuse areas because it appears that this is what Congress intended. The Actallows reasonable modifications of ``existing premises'' if necessary toafford the handicapped person full enjoyment of the premises. If the laundryroom is not accessible, for example, a person with a mobility impairmentwill not have ``full enjoyment'' of the premises. ``interior'' is definedas the spaces, parts, components or elements of an individual dwellingunit.<T3>Restoration of Modifications to Public and Common Use Areas. </T3>TheDepartment specifically invited public comment on the definitions of theterms ``premises'' and ``interior'', especially in light of the fact thatsection 15 of the Fair Housing Amendments Act provides that, in the caseof a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so, conditionpermission for a modification on the renter agreeing to restore the <T3>interior </T3>of the premises to the condition that existed beforethe modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted.Many of the comments received on this question were in agreement with theDepartment's definitions of these terms. For example, the American Instituteof Architects stated that since the types of modifications made to thepublic and common use areas of a building's interior are on the order ofthose made to the exterior of the building, it would not be reasonablefor the landlord to require the tenant to restore such modifications tothe preexisting condition.Other commenters argued that public and common use areas should not beexcluded from the restoration requirement, suggesting that the interpretationproposed by the Department will have the effect of forcing owners to takea narrow view of what constitutes a reasonable modification of a publicor common use area.After careful consideration, the Department continues to believe that theproposed rule's treatment of these issues is faithful to the statute. Asthe Department stated in the preamble of the proposed rule, reasonablemodifications to public and common use areas will not detract significantlyfrom the public and common use areas modified, and may be of benefit toother persons with and without handicaps.Some commenters complained that the proposed rule did not discuss how alandlord's responsibilities under andSection; 100.204 to make reasonableaccommodations mesh with andSection; 100.203. These commenters note thatandSection; 100.204 applies to services, and interpreted the proposed ruleas assuming, for example, that if a laundry room is inaccessible, the onlyoption open to the tenant is to pay for physical modifications necessaryto make the room accessible. One commenter requested that the Departmentclarify that if the tenant chooses to ask a friend to do his or her laundryin the laundry room, the landlord must accommodate this situation by waivingany rule that prohibits non-tenants from gaining access to the laundryroom. The Department agrees that this is the sort of accommodation requiredby andSection; 100.204.<T3>``Security Deposits.''</T3> The final sentence of paragraph (a) ofthe proposed rule stated that a landlord may not increase for handicappedpersons any customarily required security deposit for the purpose of securingpayment for modifications. The Department invited public comment on thisquestion as well, 53 FR 45003 (November 7, 1988), and received substantialcomments on both sides of this issue.A number of commenters stated their belief that a prohibition on an increasedsecurity deposit for handicapped persons who make modifications at theirown expense is required by the Fair Housing Act. They point out that section804(f)(2) of the Act makes it unlawful to discriminate in the terms, conditions,or privileges of the rental of a dwelling because of handicap and statethat such deposits should not be necessary and would create an undue burdenon persons with handicaps not intended by the Act.On the other side of this issue, commenters speaking from the standpointof housing providers urged the Department to provide that a landlord mayrequire a reasonable additional security deposit to secure a renter's agreementto restore the interior of the premises to the condition that existed beforethe modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted. These commenters pointout that such a deposit is particularly necessary in case of the occupant'sdeath, or abandonment of the unit without any notice. The National Associationof Homebuilders stated that it is standard practice to require additionalsecurity deposits as a condition of a housing provider's granting permissionfor modifications to be made to a dwelling unit. These commenters arguethat deposits are necessary so that all tenants, handicapped and non-handicappedalike, are treated equally and fairly.Upon further consideration of this question, the Department has come tothe view that this is not truly a question relating to a traditional securitydeposit. Security deposits are generally paid at the time a tenant movesin. A tenant with handicaps may request a landlord's permission to makemodifications at any time. For example, a tenant may become disabled duringhis or her tenancy and then ask for permission to make modifications. Atthis point the tenant has already paid any customarily required securitydeposit. Further, the Department agrees that there is no basis for requiringthat handicapped persons pay a higher customarily required security depositthan is paid by non-handicapped persons. However, the Department is mindfulof the financial exposure of a landlord who may be required to permit atenant to make extensive modifications to the interior of a dwelling unitthat can reasonably be expected to interfere with the landlord's or thenext tenant's use and enjoyment of the premises. The Department believesthat there are specific instances where it would be reasonable for a landlordto condition permission for making modifications on the tenant paying intoan interest bearing escrow account a reasonable amount of money to ensurethat funds will be available to pay for those restorations that the tenantis legally required to make at the end of the tenancy. Accordingly, paragraph(a) of andSection; 100.203 has been revised to reflect this view.The third sentence of paragraph (a) continues to state that the landlordmay not increase, for handicapped persons, any customarily required securitydeposit. A new fourth sentence states that, where it is reasonable to doso, the landlord may negotiate as part of a restoration agreement a provisionrequiring that the tenant pay into an interest bearing escrow account,over a reasonable time period, a reasonable amount of money not to exceedthe cost of restoring the modifications. The interest in any such accountshall accrue to the benefit of the tenant.The language added to paragraph (a) balances the interests of a handicappedperson seeking to make modifications to a dwelling unit so that he or shewill be able to live in the unit with the interests of the landlord inassuring that all required restorations are made at the end of the tenancyat the expense of the tenant. The new language makes it clear that escrowpayments may be negotiated only where it is reasonable to do so. Thus,a landlord may not routinely require that escrow payments be made. Rather,the landlord must make a case-by-case determination based upon such factorsas the extent and nature of the proposed modifications, the expected durationof the lease, the credit and tenancy history of the individual tenant,and other information that may bear on the risk to the landlord that thepremises will not be restored. It can be expected that generally a tenantmaking extensive modifications to a unit at his or her own expense willplan to live in that unit for more than a brief period of time. Both theamount and terms of the escrow payment are subject to negotiation betweenthe landlord and the tenant. For example, if the proposed modificationswhich are subject to restoration are minor and the tenant has a good credithistory or otherwise can provide reasonable assurances that he or she willbe able to ensure that the restorations are carried out, then it wouldnot be reasonable for the landlord to require any payment. On the otherhand, if the tenant wishes to make extensive modifications that must berestored and has only a ``fair'' credit history, or other factors suggestthat the tenant would not be able to ensure that the restorations are carriedout, then it might be reasonable for a landlord to require a payment. Ofcourse, the landlord may not require that the total amount to be paid exceedthe reasonable cost of restoring the modifications that must be restoredat the end of the tenancy. The Department expects that frequently a smalleramount will suffice to protect the interests of the landlord. Furthermore,landlords may not assume that persons with handicaps are less creditworthythan persons without handicaps. Just because the facts warrant requiring<T3>a payment </T3>does not mean that the landlord may reasonably requirethat the full restoration costs be paid before the modifications are evenmade.If a person with handicaps seeking to make modifications believes thata landlord is unreasonably withholding permission to make the requestedmodifications or has required an unreasonable escrow payment he or shemay file a complaint with HUD.The Department wishes to stress that the Fair Housing Act does not requirea tenant to restore all modifications. For example, as example (2) in paragraph(b) makes clear, if a handicapped tenant seeks a landlord's permissionto widen a doorway for a wheelchair to pass, it is unlawful for the landlordto refuse to permit the applicant to make the modification. Further, thelandlord may not, in usual circumstances, condition permission for themodification on the applicant paying for the doorway to be narrowed atthe end of the lease because a wider doorway will not interfere with thelandlord's or the next tenant's use and enjoyment of the premises. However,if a tenant seeks, for example, to lower the kitchen cabinets to a heightsuitable for a person in a wheelchair, the landlord may condition permissionon the tenant agreeing to restore the cabinets to their original heightand, if it is reasonable to do so considering the financial resources andcredit-worthiness of the tenant, may seek a reasonable escrow deposit.At the end of the lease the landlord may require that the tenant restorethe cabinets to their original height unless the next occupant prefersthat the cabinets remain where they are. If the next occupant does notwish that the modification be restored then the landlord must promptlyreturn the tenant's escrow deposit, if any, in full. The landlord, in sucha situation, may, where it is reasonable to do so, require that the newtenant establish a new interest bearing escrow account.Comments from housing providers also asked that the rule state that housingproviders have an ``absolute right'' to reject any proposed modificationsif they are unreasonable and that the housing provider should have theauthority to select or approve the party making the modifications. Thesecommenters point out that prior approval is necessary so that the housingprovider can be assured of quality workmanship done in accordance withlocal building code specifications.Paragraph (a) makes it plain that the applicant or tenant must seek thelandlord's approval before making modifications. A landlord, of course,is entitled to know what the proposed modifications are as well as reasonableassurances from the tenant that any required building permits will be obtainedand that the work will be performed in a workmanlike manner. In order toaddress these concerns the Department has added a new paragraph (b) toandSection; 100.204. It states that a landlord may condition permission fora modification on the renter providing a reasonable description of theproposed modifications as well as reasonable assurances that the work willbe performed in a workmanlike manner and that any required building permitswill be obtained. The description may be oral or written depending on theextent and nature of the proposed modifications. The Department does notbelieve it would not be possible, as some commenters suggested, to spellout a detailed approval procedure that would be applicable in all instances.What is reasonable will vary with the extent, location and nature of themodifications a particular tenant wishes to make. Some requested modificationswill be simple and the approval process in such instances should be straightforward(e.g., installation of grab bars in a bathroom that already has the requisiteblocking). Other requested modifications to the interior of a unit or publicor common use area will be more complex. In such instances, the landlordmay withhold permission until the tenant has described in reasonable detailthe modifications to be made and identified to the landlord a responsibleparty to perform the work in question. However, since the tenant is payingfor the modification, the landlord may not specify that only one particularcontractor make the modifications. The modifications may be accomplishedby any party reasonably able to complete the work in a workmanlike manner.Paragraph (c) contains two examples that illustrate the application ofparagraph (a). Some commenters felt the examples in paragraph (c) (paragraph(b) of the proposed rule) ``raise more questions than they answer.'' Theseexamples are intended to be illustrative and not exhaustive. The Departmentcontinues to believe that the regulation is clearer with these examplesthan without them. Therefore, they have been retained unchanged from theproposed rule.Section 100.204 Reasonable accommodations.Section 100.204 implements section 804(f)(3)(B) of the Fair Housing Actwhich makes it unlawful to refuse to make reasonable accommodations inrules, policies, practices, or services if necessary to afford a personwith handicaps equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling. The conceptof ``reasonable accommodation'' is also used in regulations and case lawinterpreting section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973. <T3>See,</T3> 28 CFR 41.53; 24 CFR 8.11 and 8.33; <T3>Southeastern Community College v. Davis,</T3> 442 U.S. 397 (1979);<T3> Alexander v. Choate,</T3> 469 U.S. 287 (1985).The principal comments received on this section discuss the relationshipbetween andSection;andSection; 100.204 and 100.203 relating to reasonable modificationsof existing premises. These comments were discussed in connection withandSection; 100.203.Paragraph (a) closely follows the statutory language and is unchanged fromthe proposed rule. It states that it is unlawful for any person to refuseto make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices or services,when such accommodations may be necessary to afford a handicapped personequal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling unit, including public andcommon use areas. A number of commenters were concerned that this languagecould be interpreted as requiring that housing providers provide a broadrange of services to persons with handicaps that the housing provider doesnot normally provide as part of its housing. The Department wishes to stressthat a housing provider is not required to provide supportive services,<T3>e.g.,</T3> counseling, medical, or social services that fall outsidethe scope of the services that the housing provider offers to residents.A housing provider is required to make modifications in order to enablea qualified applicant with handicaps to live in the housing, but is notrequired to offer housing of a fundamentally different nature. The testis whether, with appropriate modifications, the applicant can live in thehousing that the housing provider offers; not whether the applicant couldbenefit from some other type of housing that the housing provider doesnot offer. Paragraph (b) illustrates the application of paragraph (a) with two examplesof reasonable accommodations. No substantial comments were received onthese examples and they remain as they were proposed.Section 100.205 Design and construction requirements.Section 100.205 implements section 804(f)(3)(C) of the Fair Housing Actwhich places accessibility requirements on ``covered multifamily dwellings''designed and built for first occupancy 30 months after enactment.The term ``covered multifamily dwellings'' means buildings consisting of4 or more dwelling units if the building has one or more elevators, and``ground floor'' dwelling units in other buildings consisting of 4 or moredwelling units. The ground floor is any floor of a building with a buildingentrance on an accessible route. A building may have more than one groundfloor. A ``building'' is a structure, facility or the portion thereof thatcontains one or more dwelling units.<T3>Unusual Terrain or Site Characteristics. </T3>Paragraph (a) of theproposed rule provided that ``covered multifamily dwellings'' for firstoccupancy after March 13, 1991 be designed and constructed to have at leastone building entrance on an accessible route unless it is impractical todo so because of the terrain or unusual characteristics of the site. Paragraph(a) was the subject of considerable public comment.Some commenters objected to the portion of paragraph (a) that exempts buildingsfrom having an accessible building entrance where it is impractical toprovide such an entrance because of the terrain or unusual characteristicsof the site. These commenters argue that the statute contains an ``absolute''requirement that ``covered multifamily dwellings'' for first occupancyafter March 13, 1991 be made accessible. They believe that paragraph (a)introduces an exception not found in the Act.Other commenters did not altogether object to an ``impracticality'' standardbut considered the standard of ``impracticality'' proposed by the Departmentto be too broad. These commenters feel that the ``impracticality'' standardin paragraph (a) allows designers and builders to use their own standardsand claim that because it is ``impractical'' to do so, they need not maketheir buildings accessible. In the view of these commenters, this ``loophole''was not intended by Congress; they suggest that HUD establish a more specificstandard. Some commenters stated that, where feasible, grading be mademandatory. Other commenters urged that the ``impracticality'' exemptionaccrue to dwellings where the <T3>only</T3> access is stairs which are higher than 10 feet. At this pointthey argue it is impractical for a ramp to be built.Representative Barney Frank of Massachusetts submitted a comment statinghis belief that the word ``impractical'' could be more of a loophole thanwas intended by Congress. Mr. Frank suggested tightening the standard bymodifying the word ``impractical'' with adverbs such as ``highly'' or ``extremely''.Mr. Frank also stressed that it ought to be made clear that only unusualphysical characteristics of the site would justify the invocation of thetighter standard of impracticality he suggested.Other commenters argued for a broader standard than the one proposed bythe Department. They did not interpret the proposed standard as relatingin any way to the economic impact of designing and constructing a buildingon a particular site to have an accessible building entrance. These commentersargued that the Department should consider the economic impact of requiringat least one building entrance on an accessible route and not only whetheraccess is physically impractical. These commenters noted that if the costof providing an accessible entrance is too great, the project may becomeeconomically infeasible. They pointed out that Congress was sensitive tothe impact of the Act's requirements on housing affordability. For example,the Act's accessibility provisions ``carefully facilitate the ability oftenants with handicaps to enjoy full use of their homes without imposingunreasonable requirements on homebuilders, landlords and non-handicappedtenants.'' House Report at 27. These commenters suggest that economic lossbeyond a <T3>de minimis </T3>amount is in many cases a viable and fair determinantof the impracticality of providing an accessible entrance.Congress did not intend to impose an absolute standard that all coveredmultifamily dwelling units be made accessible without regard to the impracticalityof doing so. Even though the statute itself does not contain an impracticalitystandard the legislative history makes it clear that Congress ``was sensitiveto the possibility that certain natural terrain may pose unique buildingproblems.'' House Report at 27. For example, the House Report explicitlyrecognizes that in some locales it is common to construct housing on stiltsbecause of flooding problems. A requirement that housing on such siteshave an accessible entrance on an accessible route may be tantamount toprohibiting the construction of covered multifamily housing on such sites.This is not what Congress intended. The House Report further states thatthe ``Committee does not intend to require that the accessibility requirementsof this Act override the need to protect the physical integrity of multifamilyhousing that may be built on such sites.'' <T3>Id.</T3>Further, the Department does not believe that it would be appropriate toconstrain designers by adopting a highly specific building accessibilitystandard, as suggested by some commenters. For example, some commenterssuggested that the rule state that, where feasible, grading be mandatory.A developer is required by paragraph (a) to design and construct one buildingentrance on an accessible route unless it is impractical to do so becauseof the terrain or unusual characteristics of the site. As a practical matter,it may sometimes be necessary to provide grading for persons in wheelchairsso that the requirements of paragraph (a) will be met and in many casesit will be the least expensive means of doing so. However, in other instances,it may be possible to design and construct an accessible building entrancein some other fashion. Designers are free to use any reasonable designthat obtains the required result. The Department does not believe thatCongress intended to dictate the method a designer must use to providean accessible entrance. Innovative designs that are accessible to handicappedpersons should be encouraged.Since the statute itself does not contain an exemption, the Departmentfeels constrained to follow closely the intent of Congress on this issueas expressed in the Act's legislative history. The discussion in the HouseReport on this issue is of ``unique building problems'' along the orderof examples (1) and (2) in paragraph (b). The impracticality standard inparagraph (a), however, does not go so far as to require that it be ``impossible''to design and construct a building entrance on an accessible route, becausethe Department does not believe that Congress intended that the standardbe limited to such extreme instances.On balance, and after carefully considering the various comments receivedon this issue, the Department believes that, based upon specific languagein the House Report, Congress intended to apply the test the Departmentproposed for determining when the burdens of providing an accessible entranceare too great. Only when the terrain or unusual site characteristics makeit impractical to design and construct an accessible building entranceat a particular site did Congress consider the burdens of providing suchan entrance to be unreasonable. Since the standard in paragraph (a) alreadytakes into account the burdens of making a building accessible, the Departmentdoes not believe that it would be faithful to the statute to revise thestandard to refer to an open-ended ``economic impracticality'' standardunrelated to the sorts of unusual site problems Congress expressly consideredrelevant.<T3>Determining ``First Occupancy'' After March 13, 1991. </T3>A numberof commenters stated that while the proposed rule properly limits the Act'sdesign and construction requirements to covered multifamily housing forfirst occupancy after March 13, 1991, it fails to indicate how it willbe determined whether covered multifamily housing is ``for first occupancyafter March 13, 1991.'' These commenters are concerned that coverage ofthe design and construction requirements <T3>must </T3>be determinable at the beginning of planning and development,arguing that it is unreasonable to base this determination on the actualdate of first occupancy since this date may be affected by a variety ofunexpected and uncontrollable events occurring during the lengthy planningand development process. In order to accommodate these legitimate concernson the part of the building industry, the Department has added a sentenceto paragraph (a). It states that, for purposes of andSection; 100.205, coveredmultifamily dwellings shall be deemed to be designed and constructed forfirst occupancy <T3>on or before </T3>March 13, 1991 if they are occupied by that dateor if the <T3>last </T3>building permit or renewal thereof for the covered multifamilydwellings is issued by a State, County or local government on or beforeJanuary 13, <T3>1990. </T3>In other words, if a developer obtains a building permiton or before January 13, 1990 (which is not renewed after that date) andcompletes construction under that permit, the building in question neednot comply with the accessibility requirements of andSection; 100.205. Thus,a developer will not be penalized if a strike or Act of God prevents occupancyby a certain time. The date of January 13, 1990 was selected because itis fourteen months before March 13, 1991. Fourteen months represents areasonable median construction time for multifamily housing projects ofall sizes based upon data contained in the ``Marshall Valuation Service.''The Department considered adopting different construction times for differentsized projects but ultimately found this approach cumbersome from an administrativeand enforcement standpoint. The Department chose the issuance of a buildingpermit as the appropriate point in the process, since such permits areissued in writing by governmental authorities. Such a standard has theadvantage of being clear and objective. In addition, any project that actuallyachieves first occupancy before March 13, 1991 will be judged to have metthis standard even if the last building permit or renewal thereof was issuedafter January 13, 1990.<T3>Accessibility Guidelines. </T3>Paragraph (b) contains three examplesthat illustrate the application of paragraph (a). Some commenters statedthat the examples illustrating the application of paragraph (a) may reducenoncompliance at the extremes but do not satisfactorily indicate what constitutessufficient compliance in most day-to-day situations. The Department doesnot believe that it is feasible to publish more specific guidance at thistime. However, the Department will endeavor to provide as much additionalguidance as possible in the accessibility guidelines HUD plans to develop.Many commenters expressed a desire to have an opportunity to comment onthese guidelines. HUD intends to publish these guidelines in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>for full public comment as soon as they are ready.The only change made to these three examples is a minor change to example(1). In the proposed rule example (1) related to a developer who plannedto construct six townhouses on a site with hilly terrain. Some commenterswere confused by the reference to townhouses, in view of the Department'sinterpretation that four or more townhouses are not covered multifamilydwellings unless the entire unit is on the ground floor or unless the townhouseshave an elevator. In order to avoid this confusion, the reference to townhouseshas been deleted. Instead, the example refers simply to six units of coveredmultifamily dwelling units. The purpose of the example is to explicatesite impracticality because of hilly terrain.Example (3), which describes an instance where building accessibility canbe achieved only at the cost of a 4.7 percent density loss, was the subjectof criticism by builders. They argued that a 4.7 percent density loss mayrender a project economically infeasible. Even though this may well bethe case in some situations, the Department does not believe, in lightof the discussion above, that Congress necessarily intended that a reductionof five units in a 105-unit building would be sufficient to exempt thatbuilding from the accessibility requirements of the Act. A more stringentstandard was intended. (However, this example was not intended to meanthat <T3>any </T3>loss of density, no matter how great, would be insufficientto establish site impracticality.)Paragraph (c) requires that all covered multifamily dwellings for firstoccupancy after March 13, 1991 with a building entrance on an accessibleroute satisfy certain accessibility requirements set forth in paragraph(c). Paragraphs (c) (1) and (2) set forth the specific accessibility requirementsfor covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991with a building entrance on an accessible route. Many commenters complainedthat the guidance provided in paragraph (c) is inadequate. Some commentersmade highly detailed suggestions that the Department will carefully consideras it develops accessibility guidelines to help builders understand andcomply with the specific accessibility requirements of the Fair HousingAct. The guidelines would, of course, not be mandatory. Rather, they wouldprovide technical assistance to persons who must comply with paragraph(c). Until these guidelines are published for public comment, designersand builders may be guided by the requirements of ANSI in meeting the specificaccessibility requirements of the Act.Paragraph (d) provides two examples that illustrate the application ofparagraph (c). These examples were not the subject of substantial publiccomment and are unchanged from the proposed rule.Paragraph (e) states that compliance with the appropriate requirementsof ANSI A117.1 suffices to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (c)(3).Paragraph (e) implements section 804(f)(4) of the Fair Housing Act. Thissection does not require that designers and builders follow ANSI A117.1exclusively. However, if designers and builders do follow ANSI A117.1,then they will have satisfied the requirements of paragraph (c)(3). HouseReport at 27. Paragraph (e) was not the subject of substantial public comment,closely follows the statutory language and is unchanged from the proposedrule.Paragraphs (f) and (g) implement the provisions of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct designed to encourage enforcement, by the States and local governments,of the provisions of the Act regarding adaptability and accessibility requirementsfor newly constructed multifamily dwellings. 134 Cong. Rec. S10456 (dailyed. August 1, 1988) (Memorandum of Senators Kennedy and Specter RegardingTheir Substitute Amendment).Paragraph (f) states that compliance with a duly enacted law of a Stateor unit of general local government that includes the requirements of paragraphs(a) and (c) satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (c). Paragraph(f) was not the subject of substantial public comment and is unchangedfrom the proposed rule.Paragraph (g)(1) was not the subject of substantial public comment andis unchanged from the proposed rule. It declares that it is the policyof HUD to encourage States and units of local government to include intheir existing procedures for the review and approval of newly constructedcovered multifamily dwellings, determinations as to whether the designand construction of such dwellings are consistent with paragraphs (a) and(c).Paragraph (g)(2) states that a State or unit of general local governmentmay review and approve newly constructed multifamily dwellings for thepurpose of making determinations as to whether the requirements of paragraphs(a) and (c) are met. Paragraph (g)(2) was not the subject of substantialpublic comment and is unchanged from the proposed rule.<T3>Determinations of Compliance by State or Local Agencies. </T3>Paragraph(h), which is unchanged from the proposed rule, states that determinationsof compliance or noncompliance by a State or a unit of general local governmentunder paragraph (f) or (g) are not conclusive in enforcement proceedingsunder the Fair Housing Act. Some commenters argued that this paragraphshould be revised to state that determinations by State and local governmentswill be given substantial weight. These comments concede that neither thestatute nor its legislative history indicates the weight to be given tosuch determinations. The Department believes it would be inappropriateto accord particular ``weight'' to determinations made by a wide varietyof State and local government agencies involving a new civil rights law,without first having the benefit of some experience reviewing the accuracyof the determinations made by State and local authorities under the FairHousing Act.Paragraph (i) states that subpart D does not invalidate or limit any lawof a State or political subdivision of a State that requires dwellingsto be designed and constructed in a manner that affords handicapped personsgreater access than is required by this subpart. Paragraph (i) was notthe subject of substantial public comment. It is unchanged from the proposedrule.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Housing for Older Persons</ITAG>The Fair Housing Act prohibits discrimination because of familial status.However, the Act exempts ``housing for older persons'' from the prohibitionsagainst discrimination because of familial status. The purpose of the prohibitionsagainst discrimination because of familial status and the housing for olderpersons exemption is to protect families with children from discriminationin housing, without unfairly limiting housing choices for elderly persons.134 Cong. Rec. S10465-66 (daily ed. August 1, 1988) (statement of Sen.Karnes). The statutory definition of ``housing for older persons'' comprisesthree categories of housing: (1) Housing provided under any State or Federalprogram that the Secretary of HUD determines is specifically designed andoperated to assist elderly persons; (2) housing intended for, and solelyoccupied by, persons 62 years of age or older; and (3) housing intendedfor, and solely occupied by, at least one person 55 years of age or olderper unit, provided that various criteria are met.<T3>Mobile Home Parks. </T3>The Department received thousands of commentsrelating to the housing for older persons exemption. A significant portionof these comments came from people who live in mobile home parks whichare currently restricted to adults. These commenters point out that mobilehome park living is unique. Mobile home park residents typically own theirown homes but rent the space. Frequently, there is relatively little spacebetween homes. Many of these commenters state that they prefer to livein an all-adult atmosphere and that if children are admitted there willin most cases be no place for them to play. Furthermore, many commentersmade it plain that they do not want or need special services or facilities.Rather, they want mobile home parks to provide an environment where theycan be with others of their age group, while at the same time remainingindependent and self-sufficient.Some commenters asked that mobile home parks be exempted outright fromthe Fair Housing Act. Mobile home parks are covered by the Fair HousingAct. The Fair Housing Act makes it unlawful to refuse to sell or rent a``dwelling'' because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin. The statutory definition of ``dwelling'' includesvacant land which is offered for sale or lease for the construction orlocation thereon of a structure. In addition, the legislative history ofthe Fair Housing Amendments Act indicates that Congress intended that mobilehome parks would be covered by the Act, and specifically by the familialstatus provisions. <T3>See </T3>134 Cong. Rec. S10551 (daily ed. Aug. 2, 1988) (colloquy betweenSens. Wilson and Specter). Thus, the Department has no basis for exemptingmobile home parks from the prohibition of discrimination against familieswith children.Other commenters asked HUD to create an additional exemption for ``over40'' or for ``all-adult'' mobile home parks. There is nothing in the FairHousing Amendments Act or its legislative history to indicate that Congressintended that mobile home parks be afforded a housing for older personsexemption that is broader than the exemption that applies to other typesof housing (<T3>e.g., </T3>apartments and condominiums). To the contrary, the legislativehistory indicates that ``mobile home parks ar eligible for the same exemptionsas are other communities under the `housing for older persons' provisions* * *'' of the Act. <T3>Id. </T3>Therefore, mobile home parks are subject to the same rulesthat apply to other types of housing. More specific comments received onthis subpart will be discussed in connection with the exemption for ``55or over'' housing.<T3>``Dual Purpose Housing Facilities.'' </T3>A number of commenters raisedthe question of whether it is permissible to operate a ``dual purpose''housing facility. In a ``dual purpose'' housing facility specified unitsor sections would be designated for older persons and other units or sectionswould be open to everyone. For example, one commenter representing theinterests of mobile home park owners suggested that regulations be promulgatedto permit the operation of ``dual purpose'' properties, so that certainsections or units are not restricted to persons of a certain age and othersare designated for housing for older persons. This commenter stated thatthe proposed rule did not address this question. However, this issue wasaddressed in the proposed rule. Section 100.70(c)(5) of the proposed rule(53 FR 45025, November 7, 1988) stated that it is unlawful to assign ``anyperson to a particular section of a community, neighborhood or developmentor to a particular floor of a building because of * * * familial status* * *.'' This same prohibition appears as andSection; 100.70(c)(4) of thefinal rule. As the Department explained in connection with public commentsreceived on subpart A, the legislative history of the Fair Housing Actand the development of fair housing law after the protections of the FairHousing Act were extended in 1974 to prohibit discrimination because ofsex support the position that persons with handicaps and families withchildren are entitled to the same protections as other classes of persons.For example, ``dual housing'' facilities segregated by race, color or religionclearly would violate the Fair Housing Act. Similarly, the Department believesthat it is unlawful for a housing facility to segregate because of familialstatus.Section 100.300 Purpose.Section 100.300 explains that the purpose of subpart E is to effectuatethe housing for older persons exemption in the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct. This section was not the subject of public comment and is unchangedfrom the proposed rule.Section 100.301 Housing for Older Persons Exemption.Section 100.301 provides the analytical framework for subpart E. Paragraph(a) implements the second sentence of section 807(b)(1) of the Fair HousingAct, as amended. It states that the prohibitions against discriminationbecause of familial status in this part do not apply to housing which satisfiesthe requirements of andSection;andSection; 100.302 (<T3>``State and Federal Elderly Housing Programs''</T3>), 100.303 (<T3>``62 or Over Housing''</T3>), or 100.304 (<T3>``55 or Over Housing''</T3>). Paragraph (a) was not the subject ofpublic comment and is unchanged from the proposed rule.Paragraph (b) states that nothing in this part limits the applicabilityof any reasonable local, State, or Federal restrictions regarding the maximumnumber of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling. Paragraph (b) implementsthe first sentence of section 807(b)(1) of the Fair Housing Act. Many jurisdictionslimit the number of occupants per unit based on a minimum number of squarefeet in the unit or the sleeping areas of the unit; HUD also issues occupancyguidelines in its assisted housing programs. Reasonable limitations donot violate the Fair Housing Act as long as they apply equally to all occupants.A substantial number of comments were received asking that the Departmentadopt occupancy restrictions that housing providers can apply in jurisdictionsthat do not have governmentally-adopted occupancy restrictions, and injurisdictions where the governmentally-adopted restrictions are tantamountto no restrictions. There comments are discussed in the preamble discussionrelating to Subpart A.Section 100.302 State and Federal Elderly Housing Programs.Section 100.302 implements section 807(b)(2)(a) of the Fair Housing Act.Section 100.302 exempts housing provided under any Federal or State programthat the Secretary determines is specifically designed and operated toassist elderly persons, as defined in the State or Federal program fromthe prohibitions against discrimination because of familial status in thispart. Section 100.302 was not the subject of substantial public commentand is unchanged from the proposed rule. It should be noted that the eligibilityrequirements for housing for elderly persons in HUD-assisted and insuredprograms differ from the requirements in andSection;andSection; 100.303 and100.304. State or Federal definitions are not superseded by those establishedin this Part for other housing.<T3>Section 100.303 62 or Over Housing.</T3>Section 100.303 implements andSection; 807(f)(2)(B) of the Act. It exemptsfrom the prohibitions against discrimination because of familial statushousing intended for, and solely occupied by, persons 62 years of age orolder.<T3>Transition Provision.</T3> Paragraph (a)(1) contains a transition provisionto ensure that the interests of current residents of housing that excludeschildren will not be unduly disturbed by the Fair Housing Act. 134 Cong.Rec. S10456 (daily ed. August 1, 1988) (Memorandum of Sens. Kennedy andSpecter Regarding Their Substitute Amendment). It provides that housingsatisfies the requirements of andSection; 103.303 even though there werepersons residing in such housing on September 13, 1988 who are under 62years or age, <T3>Provided </T3>That all new occupants thereafter are persons 62 yearsof age or older.Section 6(d) of the Fair Housing Amendments Act provides that housing shallnot fail to meet the requirements for housing for older persons by reasonof ``persons residing in such housing <T3>as of the date of enactment of this Act </T3>[<T3>i.e.,</T3> September 13, 1988]'' who do not meet the age requirementsof the housing for older persons exemption, provided that all new occupantsmeet the age requirements of the housing for older persons exemption. Section13(a) of the Act provides that ``[t]his Act and the Amendments made bythis Act shall take effect on the 180th day beginning after the date ofenactment of this Act.'' The date described in section 13(a) is March 12,1989. Several commenters questioned whether the appropriate date for thetransition provision in andSection; 100.303(a)(1) is September 13, 1988 orMarch 12, 1989.In the preamble of the proposed rule the Department explained that if section6(d) of the Act is applied literally, then housing providers, in orderto avail themselves of this transition provision, had to begin fillingunits in accordance with the age requirements of the housing for olderpersons exemption on September 13, 1988, which is before the effectivedate of the Act. The proposed rule adopted this interpretation, but inview of the consequences of such a determination, invited public commenton the question. Comments were received on both sides of the issue.One group of commenters argued that the transition rule should become effectiveon March 12, 1989 instead of September 13, 1988 as proposed by the Department.Some of these commenters conceded that the proposed rule followed the plainmeaning of the statute, but argued that this is a case where adherenceto the statute's plain language will frustrate Congress' intent to providea workable transition rule that ensures that the interests of current residentsof housing that excludes children will not be unduly disturbed by passageof the bill. 134 Cong. Rec. S10456 (daily ed. August 1, 1988) (Memorandumof Sens. Kennedy and Specter Regarding Their Substitute Amendment). Thesecommenters also stated that a March 12, 1989 transition date would be fairer.A different group of commenters agreed with the Department's interpretationof the transition provision that appeared in the proposed rule as consistentwith the plain meaning of the Act and Congressional intent. These commentersagreed with the Department's statement in the preamble of the proposedrule that the general language in section 13(a) was not intended to renderthe more specific language in section 6(d) a nullity. Moreover, under theinterpretation of the Act in the proposed rule there is no inconsistencybetween sections 6(d) and 13(a) of the Fair Housing Act. The Act will takeeffect on March 12, 1989 and, by its terms, the housing for older personsexemption will be satisfied even though, on September 13, 1988, there werepersons in the housing facility who did not meet the age requirements,provided that all new occupants after September 13, 1988 meet the age requirements.Some commenters added that under fundamental principles of statutory constructionthe more specific language of the Act prevails over more general languagecovering the same subject. <T3>See e.g., </T3><T3>Ginsberg andamp; Sons. v. Popkin,</T3> 285 U.S. 204, 208 (1932) (``Generallanguage of a statutory provision, although broad enough to include it,will not be held to apply to a matter specifically dealt with in anotherpart of the same enactment.''). Therefore, these commenters concluded thatthe more general language in section 13(a) describing the effective dateof the Act as a whole should not be interpreted to delete the specificlanguage in section 6(d) defining the appropriate date for the transitionprovision.After carefully considering the comments received on this question, theDepartment has determined not to modify its interpretation of the transitionprovision that was included in the proposed rule because it appears thatthis is what Congress intended. The transition provision in section 805(b)(3)of the statute relating to persons residing in a housing facility who donot meet the age restrictions for housing for older persons is expresslylimited to ``persons residing in such housing as of the date of enactmentof this Act.'' The same date (September 13, 1988) is, for the same reasons,referenced in andSection;100.304(d)(1) (``<T3>55 or Over Housing</T3>''). In addition, some commenters proposed that the rule state that a mobilehome park may change its age requirements to either family, 55 or overor 62 or over, at any time_arguing that such a provision would be consistentwith the legislative intent of the Act to stop discrimination against familieswith children but to allow for distinct housing opportunities for olderpersons. As previously explained, the Department sees no legal basis forproviding special treatment or exceptions for mobile home parks in lightof the legislative history to the contrary. Furthermore, the transitionprovision in section 807(b)(3)(A) makes specific reference to the dateof enactment. In light of this temporal limitation in the statute the Departmentdoes not believe it would be faithful to the statute to create in thisrule a procedure permitting a housing provider to change its age requirementsat any time in order to exclude families with children. A related issue raised by some commenters is the relationship between theAct and various State laws that regulate existing relationships betweenlandlords and tenants. For example, under the California Mobilehome ResidencyLaw, a rule or regulation of a mobile home park may be amended at any timewith the consent of a homeowner, or without his or her consent upon writtennotice to him or her of not less than six months. Calfornia Civil CodeandSection; 798.25 (1982 andamp; Supp. 1988). These commenters pointed outthat this and other notice requirements made it very difficult, and insome cases, impossible for mobile home park owners to avail themselvesof the transition provision in section 807(b)(3)(A) of the Act. On October21, 1988 the General Counsel of HUD, J. Michael Dorsey, issued a legalopinion on this question. In that opinion, Mr. Dorsey concludes that theFair Housing Act does not preempt or supersede andSection; 798.25 of theCalifornia Civil Code since there is no language in the Fair Housing Act,as amended, or its legislative history to support a conclusion that theAct was intended to invalidate or limit any State law, unless that Statelaw requires or permits a discriminatory housing practice. 42 U.S.C. 3616(as redesignated by the Act). Section 798.25 of the California Civil Codeneither requires nor permits a discriminatory housing practice; it simplysets forth a procedure that a mobile home park must follow in order tochange a rule or regulation. In addition, the comments submitted by SenatorsKennedy and Specter and Representative Don Edwards state as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Since enactment of the 1988 Amendments to the Fair Housing Act, manymobile home parks have changed their status from an eighteen and older``adult'' park, which is allowed under existing California law, but prohibitedby the Fair Housing Amendments Act to a ``housing for older persons'' parkin order to qualify for an exemption under the Act. Many of these parkshave claimed that the Act preempts California law, and thus six months'notice of a change in policy is not required. This is an incorrect interpretationof the Act. It was not the intent of Congress to preempt this notice requirement,and the regulations should so specify. (Footnotes omitted.)</ITAG>Paragraph (a)(2) states that housing satisfies the requirements of andSection;100.303even though there are unoccupied units (at any time), provided that suchunits are reserved for occupancy by persons 62 years of age or over. Paragraph(a)(2) was not the subject of substantial comment and is unchanged fromthe proposed rule. A new paragraph (a)(3) has been added to the final rule. It states thathousing satisfies the requirements of andSection; 100.303 even though thereare units occupied by employees of the housing (and their family membersresiding in the same unit) who are under 62 years of age provided theyperform substantial duties directly related to the management or maintenanceof the housing. This paragraph was added by the Department in recognitionof the fact that it is common for a manager of a housing facility or maintenanceworker to reside in one of the units. Frequently, such arrangements benefitthe residents of the housing facility. The Department does not believethat Congress intended for a housing owner to lose its ``62 or over'' exemptionsimply because the manager of the facility or a maintenance worker residesthere. However, the Department wishes to stress that any employees wholive at the housing facility must perform substantial duties directly relatedto the management or maintenance of the housing in question. For example,if the employee works primarily at a different housing facility, then thatemployee does not satisfy the requirements of paragraph (b)(3) and thehousing facility where that employee lives will not qualify for the ``62or over'' exemption.Paragraph (b) contains two examples that illustrate the application ofparagraph (a). These examples were not the subject of substantial commentand are unchanged from the proposed rule.Section 100.304 55 or Over Housing.Section 100.304 implements section 807(b)(2)(C) of the Fair Housing Act,which exempts housing intended and operated for occupancy by at least oneperson 55 years of age or over per unit that satisfy certain criteria.This section of the proposed rule was the subject of many public comments.As an initial matter, a number of commenters asked that the Departmentclarify the meaning of the phrase ``housing intended and operated for occupancy<T3>by at least one person</T3> 55 years of age or older, per unit * **'' in paragraph (a). Specifically, these commenters asked that HUD address the issue of theage of any other person occupying the unit along with a person 55 yearsof age or older per unit. A housing provider may use any non-discriminatorymethod of qualifying for the exemption that comports with applicable Stateand local laws. Since the Fair Housing Amendments Act does not prohibitdiscrimination because of age, nothing in the Act prohibits a housing providerseeking to qualify for the exemption for ``55 or over'' housing from settingage restrictions that are <T3>more</T3> stringent than those set forth in the Act. Thus, a housingprovider <T3>may, </T3>for example, require that <T3>all</T3> residents be 55 years of age or older, provided that sucha rule is consistent with applicable State and local laws. The other commentson andSection; 100.304 fall within four areas. First, some commenters stated that andSection; 100.304(c)(1) should statethat all units, upon initial occupancy, must be occupied by at least oneperson 55 years of age or older. Under the Act, the exemption for housingfor persons 55 years of age or older requires, among other things, that80 percent of the dwellings have at least one resident who is 55 yearsof age or older <T3>and</T3> that the housing complex adhere to policies demonstratingan intent to provide housing to persons of that age group. Section 807(b)(2)(C).The Children's Defense Fund and other commenters state that Congress' purposein permitting up to 20 percent of the units to be occupied solely by personsunder the age of 55 was to prevent disruption of the lives of survivingspouses and cohabitants under age 55, when the over 55 member of a householddies or otherwise leaves the unit. <T3>See</T3> 134 Cong. Rec. H 6498 (daily ed. August 8, 1988) (statementof Representative Edwards); House Report at 31. Specifically, these commentersargue that the ``55 or over'' exemption was not meant to permit the ownerof housing for older persons to ``set aside'' 20 percent of its units for<T3>incoming</T3> households (as opposed to surviving spouses or companions).These commenters feel that such a ``set aside'' is inconsistent with theexemption's requirement that the owner or manager demonstrate an intentto provide housing for persons 55 years of age or older. These commenters correctly point out that statements in the legislativehistory discuss the need to permit up to 20 percent of the units to beoccupied by persons all of whom are under 55 years old in 55 or over housingin order to accommodate persons such as surviving spouses under the ageof 55 and nurses and other personnel to care for the elderly. 134 Cong.Rec. H 6498 (daily ed. August 8, 1988) (statement of Representative Edwards);House Report at 31. However, the Department does not believe that the examplesthat appear in the legislative history were intended to be exhaustive.Particularly, the Department is not of the view that these units for personsunder 55 years of age cannot be occupied by <T3>incoming </T3>households (as opposed to surviving spouses or companions).Indeed, some incoming households may be persons under 55 related in someway to residents who are over 55 years old. For example, an elderly ownerof a condominium might die and leave the condominum to a relative who isunder 55 years old. If the 20 percent of the units available to personsunder 55 years old were not open to incoming households then the recipientof the legacy would be in the anomalous situation of not being able tolive in a condominium he or she owns. Further, the Department does notbelieve that the proposed rule can fairly be characterized as establishinga 20 percent ``set-aside'' for persons under 55 years of age. In orderto be assured of preserving the exemption, an owner of ``55 or over'' housingwill not, as a practical matter, be able to sell or rent a full 20 percentof the units to incoming persons, all of whom are under 55 years of age,because if the owner does so he or she will risk losing the exemption ifsome of the over-55 occupants die with surviving spouses who are under55 years old. In this regard, a number of commenters expressed concernabout the last sentence of example 1A in paragraph (e). This sentence indicatesthat a housing provider could rent a unit to persons (John and Mary inthe example) all of whom are under 55 years old even if doing so wouldreduce the percentage of units occupied by at least one person 55 yearsof age or older to just a fraction above 80 percent. Although the housingprovider in fact could rent to John and Mary without losing the ``55 orover'' exemption the Department agrees that doing so is not advisable underthe circumstances described in the example. Since the owner would be justa fraction above the 80 percent minimum required to maintain the ``55 orover'' exemption, renting to John and Mary could lead to the owner losingthe exemption if some of the over-55 occupants die with surviving spouseswho are under 55. In order to avoid any confusion, therefore, the lastsentence of example 1A in paragraph (e) of the proposed rule has been deletedin the final rule. Beyond this, the owner must take care to publish and adhere to policiesand procedures which demonstrate an intent to provide housing for persons55 years of age or older. For example, this requirement would precludean owner or manager from marketing 80 percent of the units for persons55 years of age or older and marketing the remaining 20 percent in a radicallydifferent way (<T3>e.g.,</T3> young adults). The policies and procedures for the housingfacility <T3>as a whole </T3>must demonstrate an intent to provide housing for persons55 years of age or older. ``In essence, this means that the housing inquestion must in its marketing to the public and in its internal operations,hold itself out as housing for persons aged 55 or older.'' 134 Cong. Rec.S10456 (Memorandum of Senators Kennedy and Specter Regarding Their SubstituteAmendment). Accordingly, the Department has determined not to revise paragraph(d)(2). The second major issue relating to 55 or over housing concerns paragraph(c)(1), which requires that at least 80% of the units in the housing facilitybe occupied by at least one person 55 years of age or older unit <T3>except that</T3> a newly constructed housing facility for first occupancyafter March 12, 1989 need not comply with paragraph (c)(1) of this sectionuntil 25% of the units in the facility are occupied. The exception forpartially occupied newly constructed housing facilities was proposed byHUD to deal with the practical problem of filling units in a new and unoccupiedhousing facility in a reasonable manner, consistent with the ``55 or over''exemption. For example, it would be unreasonable for a large newly constructedhousing facility that intends to qualify for the exemption to lose itsright to claim the exemption simply because the first unit happens to befilled with persons all of whom are under 55 years of age. However, oncea certain percentage of units has been filled the housing facility canreasonably be expected to comply with the percentage requirement in paragraph(c)(1). Thus, the Department proposed to require that a housing facilitycomply with the 80% requirement in paragraph (c)(1) once 25% of the unitsin the housing facility have been filled and invited comment on the questionof whether the 25% point is too high or too low. The National Association of Homebuilders, among other commenters, feltthis percentage was too low to make a meaningful assessment of a particularhousing facility. The National Multi Housing Council argued that a buildingshould be eligible for the ``55 and Over'' exemption during initial occupancyso long as not more than 20 percent of the total units are occupied bynon-qualifying residents. The Council argues that marketing and marketconditions will vary widely throughout the country and suggest that itis unnecessary for HUD to attempt to fix a universal demarcation pointon this subject. The Council proposes that the final rule permit an ownerto sell or rent the first 20 percent of the units to non-qualifying occupants,if he or she wishes. On the other hand, the Children's Defense Fund and the Leadership Conferenceon Civil Rights, among other commenters, objected to paragraph (c)(1) sincethe 25 percent point referenced in the proposed regulation is not containedin the Act or its legislative history. These commenters further argue thatthis 25 percent point of reference be deleted because it stems from whatthey regard as an incorrect interpretation of the 55 or over exemption.In other words, if the 20 percent of the units for non-qualifying householdswere restricted to surviving spouses, nurses and companions there wouldbe no need for the 25 percent point of reference for initial occupancy.Since the Department has not adopted the narrow interpretation of the 20percent limitation urged by some commenters, the Department continues tobelieve that the regulation must contain some point of reference so thateveryone concerned will know how to calculate whether a housing facilityhas complied with the 80 percent requirement during initial occupancy.However, the Department does not believe it would be consistent with theintent of the statute to permit an owner or manager seeking to qualifyfor the ``55 or Over'' exemption to sell or rent the first 20 percent ofthe units to persons all of whom are under 55 years of age. Filling somany units with non-qualifying persons might create an impression thatthe housing is not intended for older persons. Further, the owner wouldnot have any leeway to provide for units occupied by under 55 survivingspouses and nurses or companions. For these reasons, the Department hasretained paragraph (c)(1) as it was proposed. In addition, as in andSection; 100.303(a)(3), a new paragraph (d)(3) hasbeen added to andSection; 100.304 of the final rule. It states that housingsatisfies the requirements of this section even though there are unitsoccupied by employees of the housing (and family members residing in thesame unit) who are under 55 years of age provided they perform substantialduties directly related to the management or maintenance of the housing.Thus, as in andSection; 100.303, units occupied by employees of the housingwho do not meet the age threshold are not considered in determining a project'seligibility as housing for older persons. <T3>``Significant Facilities and Services''.</T3> Third, the Departmentreceived a great many comments asking for clarification of the phrase ``significantfacilities and services designed to meet the physical or social needs ofolder persons.'' A large number of commenters viewed the definition inproposed paragraph (b)(1) as requiring facilities and services on the orderof what one might expect to find in a facility for severely disabled elderlypersons who are not able to care for themselves. Other commenters wantto qualify for the ``55 or Over'' exemption and want to know preciselywhat services and facilities must be provided in order to qualify for theexemption. Paragraph (b)(1) of the proposed rule stated that ``significant facilitiesand services specifically designed to meet the physical or social needsof older persons'' include an accessible physical environment, congregatedining facilities, social and recreational programs, emergency and preventivehealth care or programs, continuing education, welfare, information andcounseling, recreational, homemaker, outside maintenance and referral services,transportation to facilitate access to social services, and services designedto encourage and assist residents to use the services and facilities availableto them. The list of significant facilities and services designed to meetthe physical or social needs of older persons in the proposed rule is drawnfrom section 202(f) of the Housing Act of 1959, 12 U.S.C. andSection; 1701q,listing examples of facilities and services for older persons. The HouseReport (at p. 32) relies heavily upon the listing in section 202(f) ofthe Housing Act of 1959 in its discussion of such facilities. In addition,the proposed rule made it clear that the housing facility need not haveall of these features to qualify for the exemption. Based upon the reaction hundreds of commenters had to the proposed definitionof ``significant facilities and services designed to meet the physicalor social needs of older persons'' it appears that the presence early onin the definition of ``congregate dining facilities'' and an ``accessiblephysical environment'' may have created an impression that only housingfor older persons who are not capable of living independently would satisfythe requirements of paragraph (b)(1). The Department wishes to stress thata housing facility may have significant facilities and services designedto meet the physical<T3> or</T3> social needs of older persons and still provide housing foractive older persons who live very independently. A housing facility, forexample, need<T3> not</T3> necessarily have congregate dining facilities or an accessiblephysical environment in order to qualify. In fact, many of the facilitiesand services on the list can readily be associated with active older persons.These include social and recreational programs, preventive health care,information and counseling, recreational services, and transportation tofacilitate access to social services. Moreover, the list of services onthis list was not intended to be exclusive. As a result of this reaction,the Department has reordered the list of services and facilities in thefinal rule. In addition, ``welfare'' has been deleted from the list becauseit appears only to have relevance in the context of governmental programsfor elderly persons which are covered by andSection; 100.301. The facilities and services designed to meet the physical or social needsof older persons must be ``significant'' in order to satisfy paragraph(b)(1). It is not possible for the Department to define precisely whatservices and facilities must be present before they are considered ``significant.''The services and facilities will necessarily vary based on the geographiclocation and the needs of the residents. However, it is clear, for example,that the installation of a ramp at the front entrance of a housing facilitywould not constitute a ``significant'' facility designed to meet the physicalneeds of older persons. Similarly, the provision of minor amenities_suchas putting a couch in a laundry room and labeling it a recreation center_wouldnot constitute a ``significant'' facility designed to meet the social needsof older persons. House Report at 32. <T3>``Important Housing Opportunities for Older Persons''.</T3> Some commenterssuggested that the Department establish a ``precertification'' procedurewhich would enable housing providers to seek HUD certification that a housingfacility has ``significant facilities and services designed to meet thephysical or social needs of older persons'' or that the housing facilitysatisfies the requirements of paragraph (b)(2). One commenter representingthe interests of mobile home park owners argued that such a procedure wouldprevent many lawsuits and ``frivolous'' administrative complaints of discriminationfrom being filed. The Department does not believe at this early stage ofthe enforcement of the Fair Housing Amendments Act that there is a reasonablebasis to conclude that many ``frivolous'' complaints will be filed unlessa ``pre-certification'' procedure is established. Further, the Departmentdoes not believe that it has sufficient resources to support such a procedure.However, if experience with enforcement of the exemption for ``55 or over''housing shows that such a procedure would be cost-effective the Departmentwill consider adding a ``pre-certification'' procedure in the future. The fourth area of major public comment concerns paragraph (b)(2) of theproposed rule. A housing facility may qualify for the ``55 or over'' exemptioneven if it does not satisfy the requirements of paragraph (b)(1). Underparagraph (b)(2), a housing facility that does not provide significantfacilities and services specifically designed to meet the physical or socialneeds of older persons may nonetheless qualify for the ``55 or over'' exemption.Such a housing facility must demonstrate that it is not practicable forit to provide significant facilities and services designed to meet thephysical or social needs of older persons, and must also demonstrate thatthe housing facility is necessary to provide important housing opportunitiesfor older persons. The proposed rule contained eight factors, among others, that the Departmentproposed to consider in determining whether a housing facility satisfiesthe requirements of paragraph (b)(2). Paragraph (b)(2) was criticized bymany commenters for not being sufficiently precise. These commenters statethat listing eight factors is not sufficient, especially since the proposedrule did not state how many (or how few) of the factors must be fulfilledin order to obtain a waiver of the requirement of providing significantservices and facilities.Further, some commenters cited legislative history which they believe ishelpful in construing the exception. Senator Kennedy stated that the exceptionwas intended ``to be narrowly used only when it can be demonstrated thatthe costs of providing the facilities and services would result in deprivinglow- and moderate-income persons of needed and desired housing. Independentand objective evidence must be provided to establish impracticability.''134 Cong. Rec. S10549 (daily ed. August 2, 1988) (statement of Sen. Kennedy).Representative Edwards explained that andSection; 807(b)(2)(C)(i) was ``notintended to provide a broad exemption * * *.'' 134 Cong. Rec. H6498 (dailyed. August 8, 1988) (statement of Representative Edwards). Mr. Edwardswent on to explain the impracticability test as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">The fact that the facilities and services are expensive to provideis not alone sufficient to meet the standard of impracticability. Thisstandard cannot be satisfied only by estimates of increased costs, businessinefficiency or loss of profit. Independent and objective evidence mustbe provided to establish impracticability. Mere opinion that the provisionof such facilities and services is impracticable is not sufficient.</ITAG>Id.With regard to the requirement that the housing qualify as an ``importanthousing opportunity for older persons'' Representative Edwards stated thatit must be shown that ``[a]ffordable housing for older persons of low ormoderate incomes must not be otherwise available in the community.''<T3> Id.</T3>The Department agrees that additional guidance is needed and the Departmenthas been guided by this legislative history in revising paragraph (b)(2)to provide for a somewhat more precise definition of this exception. Thefirst sentence of paragraph (b)(2), which mirrors the statute, is unchangedfrom the proposed rule. The following sentence explicates this statutorytest in a manner that is consistent with the legislative history regardingthis exception. It states that an owner or manager, in order to satisfythe requirements of paragraph (b)(2), must demonstrate through credibleand objective evidence that the provision of significant facilities andservices designed to meet the physical or social needs of older personswould result in depriving older persons in the relevant geographic areaof needed and desired housing. The Department believes that the revisedstandard is both clearer and consistent with the intent of Congress.The eight factors in the proposed rule have been reduced to seven factorsin the final rule. Specifically, the first and second factors that appearedin the proposed rule have been consolidated and clarified in the finalrule. The seven relevant factors in the final rule are as follows:(i) Whether the owner or manager of the housing facility has endeavoredto provide significant facilities and services designed to meet the physicalor social needs of older persons either by the owner or some other entity.Demonstrating that such services and facilities are more expensive to provideis not alone sufficient to demonstrate that the provision of such servicesis not practicable. The preceding sentence relating to the cost of providingsignificant services and facilities is based on the legislative history.<T3>See </T3>134 Cong. Rec. H6498 (daily ed. August 8, 1988) (statementof Representative Edwards) (``The fact that the facilities and service[sic] are expensive to provide is not alone sufficient to meet the standardof impracticability.'')(ii) The amount of rent charged, if the dwellings are offered for rent.The price of the dwellings, if they are offered for sale.(iii) The income range of the residents of the housing facility.(iv) The demand for housing for older persons in the relevant geographicarea.(v) The range of housing choices for older persons within the relevantgeographic area.(vi) The availability of other similarly priced housing for older personsin the relevant geographic area. If similarly priced housing for olderpersons with significant facilities and services is reasonably availablein the relevant geographic area, then the housing facility does not meetthe requirements of paragraph (b)(2). The second sentence is new and hasbeen added to clarify the appropriate application of this factor.(vii) The vacancy rate of the housing facility.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Interference, Coercion or Intimidation</ITAG>Section 100.400Prohibited interference, coercion or intimidation.Subpart F provides the interpretation of the Department as to the conductwhich constitutes a discriminatory housing practice under section 818 ofthe Fair Housing Act.Section 100.400(b) states that it is unlawful to coerce, intimidate, threatenor interfere with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on accountof that person having exercised or enjoyed, or on account of that personhaving aided or encouraged any person in the exercise or enjoyment of,any right granted or protected by Part 100. Such conduct can also involveharassment of persons because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.The illustrations in this section also indicate that a broad range of activitiescan constitute a discriminatory housing practice. Threatening or intimidatingactions include acts against the possessions of persons, such as damageto automobiles or vandalism, which limit a person's ability to have fullenjoyment of a dwelling. In addition, the protections against discriminationreach any person, including persons selling or renting dwellings and personsengaged in activities promoting fair housing. Further, persons who arenot involved in any aspect of the sale or rental of a dwelling are nonethelessprohibited from engaging in conduct to coerce, intimidate, threaten orinterfere with persons in connection with protected activities, or fromretaliating against any person involved in any way in a proceeding underthe Fair Housing Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 103_Fair Housing Complaint Processing</ITAG>Enforcement responsibility within HUDGenerally, the proposed regulations placed the responsibility for the reasonablecause determination and the prosecutorial functions with the General Counsel,while retaining the investigation and conciliation functions with the AssistantSecretary for Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity.Several commenters urged that the Department modify the rule to leave allaspects of Fair Housing enforcement responsibility with the Assistant Secretaryfor Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity. Among other arguments, the experienceof the Assistant Secretary in administering the several civil rights-relatedresponsibilities of HUD was cited_particularly the twenty years of experiencein administering the Fair Housing Act itself. In addition, commenters pointedout that the Civil Rights Act of 1968 provided for the creation of a newHUD assistant secretary position_clearly intended to serve as the leadofficial for civil rights responsibilities of the Department.The Department agrees with the commenters that full utilization of theAssistant Secretary's experience must be assured, and that the originalFair Housing Act indeed intended that there be appointed an assistant secretaryspecializing in civil rights concerns. Had the proposed rule suggestedremoval of the responsibilities of the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housingand Equal Opportunity and the awarding of those responsibilities to theGeneral Counsel, the above-summarized arguments would be well-taken. Nosuch proposal has been made, however. Under the enforcement scheme setout in the proposed rule, the responsibilities of the Assistant Secretaryas they relate to Fair Housing enforcement have been retained. The AssistantSecretary continues to have full responsibility for complaint intake, investigations,conciliations and for all related communications with the parties concerningtheir procedural rights and obligations. Quite clearly, given the greatlyincreased enforcement authority provided by the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct and the addition of important newly protected classes, the responsibilitiesof the Assistant Secretary have been augmented greatly.It proves too much, however, to argue that the creation of a new assistantsecretary's position in the 1968 Act somehow implies a duty in the Secretaryto delegate subsequently enacted authority to that single officer. First,we note that the 1968 statute creating the new assistant secretary didnot provide for administration or judicial enforcement of the Act, butonly for the investigation and attempted conciliation of complaints. Moreimportantly, both the 1968 Act and the 1988 Amendments Act refer, in <T3>all</T3> their substantive provisions, to responsibilities of the <T3>Secretary</T3> of Housing and Urban Development. Nothing in eitherAct purports to require the Secretary to delegate this responsibility toany particular officer or officers. It is clear, then, that an argumentthat the Secretary is legally bound to delegate his authority in a particularmanner cannot be supported.Commenters also argued that as a matter of policy, the delegation to theGeneral Counsel is inappropriate. Commenters noted that the Assistant Secretaryfor Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity does not share responsibility withany other office of the Department relative to the Assistant Secretary'sexercise of authority under other civil rights statutes. These commentersare correct_up to a point_although they ignore the fact of HUD GeneralCounsel participation in any and all matters involving civil rights andequal opportunity at the stage where the Department becomes involved informal enforcement, either through the initiation of administrative enforcementproceedings or the referral of matters to the Department of Justice forthe initiation of civil actions.Given the clear intention of the amended Act that a HUD reasonable causedetermination will create a virtual certainty of litigation, either inan administrative tribunal or in a Federal District Court, it is not onlyrational and sensible but consistent with current delegations of authorityin the area of civil rights to provide that responsibility for such determinationsbe in the hands of the Department's legal officer. Similarly, the delegationof authority to the General Counsel to conduct hearings before administrativelaw judges under the Fair Housing Act seems to the Department not onlyto be a rational decision, but a rather obvious one. Such a division ofresponsibility is consistent with the practice of other agencies whoseadministrative processes make a separation of functions necessary or desirable.One commenter noted that proposed andSection; 109.16(a) provided that theAssistant Secretary is to make reasonable cause determinations in advertisingcases. The proposed rule intended to delegate all responsibility for reasonablecause determinations to the General Counsel. This section has been revised.Under the final rule, the General Counsel is delegated the responsibilityfor making the reasonable cause determination and for prosecuting administrativecases under the 1988 Amendments. One commenter noted that the General Counselalso has the responsibility to defend against charges that HUD has violatedthe Fair Housing Act. While the number of such cases may be small, thecommenter argued that proposed procedures cast suspicion on the impartialityof the General Counsel in such matters. In the rare instances that complaintsinvolving such circumstances are filed, the Secretary will delegate theGeneral Counsel's responsibility for the reasonable cause determinationand, where an administrative proceeding is conducted, HUD's prosecutingduties to another qualified employee of the Department. Since such circumstanceswill rarely, if ever, occur, the text of the rule has not been revisedto reflect this eventuality.The division of responsibility in the final rule has been modified slightlyto transfer certain duties from the General Counsel to the Assistant Secretary.These include: (1) The ability to elect to have the claims asserted ina charge decided in a civil action where HUD is the complainant (andSection;andSection;103.410 and 104.410); (2) the duty to notify the aggrieved person and therespondent when a reasonable cause determination can not be made withindescribed time periods (andSection; 104.400(c)); and (3) the duty to notifyFederal, State and local licensing and regulatory agencies under andSection;104.935(a). In addition, the final rule has been revised to require thenotification of the Assistant Secretary at certain points during the administrativeproceeding (see e.g. andSection;andSection; 104.700(a), 104.910(d), 104.920and 104.930(d)).Statutory limitations on HUD's complaint processing authority.In several instances, commenters suggested revisions to the proposed rulesthat cannot be adopted because they conflict with statutory limitationscontained in the Fair Housing Act. The statutorily impermissable proposalsincluded:1. Some commenters argued that the rules should require complainants tofile their complaint within 60 days of the date that an alleged discriminatorypractice has occurred or terminated. Section 810(a)(1)(A)(i) of the Actpermit complainants to submit complaints not later than one year afteran alleged discriminatory housing practice has occurred or terminated.(See Subpart A.)2. Commenters argued that respondents should have from 20 to 30 days torespond to the complaint. Section 810(a)(1)(B)(iii) of the Act providesthat each respondent may file an answer to the complaint not later than10 days from the date of receipt of the notice. (See andSection;andSection;103.50(b)(3) and 103.55.)3. Commenters argued that the final rule should not permit the referralof cases to agencies until they are found to be substantially equivalentunder the new law, or should be revised to permit the complainant to choosewhether to permit the referral under such circumstances. Under section810(f)(4), each agency certified for the purposes of Title VIII on theday before the enactment date must be considered certified with respectto those matters for which the agency was certified on that date. The transitionperiod is 40 months from the date of enactment. Under section 810(f)(1),HUD is required to make these referrals. (See Part 115)4. Several commenters urged HUD to retain the existing practice of makinga threshold determination to resolve based on facts developed in the investigationbefore commencing conciliation. Such procedures would be contrary to section810(b)(1) which requires HUD to engage in conciliation with respect tothe complaint, to the extent feasible, during the period <T3>beginning with the filing of the complaint and ending with the filingof the charge or dismissal by HUD.</T3>5. Commenters objected to andSection; 103.330(b) which permits the nondisclosureof conciliation agreements, where the aggrieved person and the respondentrequest the nondisclosure and the Assistant Secretary determines that disclosureis not required to further any purpose of the Fair Housing Act. Under section810(b)(4), nondisclosure is permitted under such circumstances.6. Commenters objected to the requirement for the public disclosure ofcomplaints dismissed based on a finding of no probable cause. Section 810(g)(3)requires public disclosure.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions</ITAG>Section 103.1 Purpose and applicability.<T3>Applicability. </T3>Except for complaints involving allegations ofdiscriminatory housing practices occurring before and continuing afterthe effective date of the 1988 Amendments (March 12, 1989), the proposedrule provided that:_Complaints alleging discriminatory housing practices that occurred beforethe effective date of the 1988 Amendments are governed by the proceduresin Part 105._Complaints alleging discriminatory housing practices that occur on orafter the effective date of the 1988 Amendments are governed by the proceduresin Part 103.For complaints alleging violations that occur before and continue afterMarch 12, 1989, the proposed rule provided:_Complaints filed after March 12, 1989 would be processed under Part 103._Complaints filed before March 12, 1989 would continue to be processedunder Part 105; however, the Department would provide the complainant witha reasonable opportunity to elect to have the complaint processed underPart 103 in lieu of the Part 105 procedures.Commenters argued that the final rules must be revised to provide retroactiveapplication of the Act's new remedies and enforcement procedures to allcomplaints pending on March 12, 1989, including those that do not involvecontinuing violations. Other commenters argued that the regulations shouldnot apply to any complaints filed under part 105 prior to March 12, 1989.HUD has reviewed its determination regarding the applicability of the 1988Amendments. Upon reconsideration, HUD believes that the proposed rulesunduly restrict the cases to which the new remedies under the 1988 Amendmentswill be applied. It is clear that Congress did not intend the Act to receivethe restricted application proposed by HUD. Significantly, the plain languageof section 815 places no limitation upon its applicability, but ratherprovides: ``This Act and the amendments made by this Act shall take effecton the 180th day beginning after the date of enactment of the Act.'' Atno point does the Act suggest that its provisions should receive less thanthe broadest application of the effective date provision.The general rule of statutory construction is that remedial and procedurallegislation not affecting vested rights must be applied to any claim cognizableunder the prior law that is pending on the effective date or that is filedthereafter. <T3>Bradley v. Richmond School Board</T3>, 416 U.S. 696 715-16 (1974).While it is true that statutes that affect substantive rights ordinarilymay not be applied retroactively, <T3>United States v. Security Industrial Bank</T3>, 459 U.S. 70, 79 (1982),this principle has no applicability here. The 1988 Amendments (except asto discriminatory housing practices involving handicap and familial status)do not create new legal duties or responsibilities. Rather, they merelyprovide a new process by which aggrieved persons may enforce existing rightsprotected under Title VIII. <T3>I.e., </T3>The 1988 Amendments create new procedures for the filing,investigation and conciliation of complaints concerning discriminatoryhousing practices and strengthen the remedies available to victims of housingdiscrimination by providing for administrative hearings, and by increasingthe availability of civil penalties, attorney's fees, etc. Because thenew remedies and enforcement procedures do not affect vested rights, retroactiveapplication is entirely appropriate, unless a manifest injustice wouldresult. <T3>See, e.g., Bradley, supra.</T3> (increased availability of attorney'sfees); <T3>Friel v. Cessna Aircraft Co., </T3>751 F.2d 1037 (9th Cir. 1985) (extensionof limitations period); <T3>Montana Power Co., v. Federal Power Comm., </T3>445 F.2d 739 (D.C.Cir. 1970) (change in tribunal); and <T3>Grummitt v. Sturgeon Bay Winter Sports Club, </T3>354 F.2d 564 (7thCir. 1965 (change in procedure)).To bring the final rule into conformance with the Act and the well-settledlaw, Parts 103 and 105 have been revised. Under the final rule, Part 103will be applicable to all complaints alleging discriminatory housing practiceson account of race, color, religion, sex or national origin pending onMarch 12, 1989 or filed thereafter; and to all complaints alleging discriminatoryhousing practices on account of handicap or familial status occurring onor after March 12, 1989. Part 105 will have no continuing validity andwill be removed.One commenter asked for clarification whether complaints that allege discriminatoryhousing practices involving handicap and familial status that occur beforeMarch 12, 1989 and will continue after that date may be filed prior toMarch 12, 1989. Discriminatory housing practices involving handicap orfamilial status do not violate the Act until March 12, 1989. Since it willbe impossible to predict whether an individual will continue a previouspractice after the practice becomes a violation of the Act, HUD will notaccept any complaints alleging such discrimination filed before March 12,1989. To ensure that complainants are aware of their right to file if thepractice continues, the rejection will be accompanied by an explanationof the complainant's right to refile after March 12, 1989.<T3>Applicability of Part 103 to State and local agencies. </T3>Severalcommenters sought clarification concerning the applicability of variousrequirements in Part 103 (and Part 104) to complaints filed with or referredto State and local agencies. Part 103 contains the procedures for the investigationand conciliation by HUD of complaints filed under section 810 of the Actand Part 104 contains the rules of practice and procedure applied by HUD'sALJs in administrative proceedings adjudicating charges issued under Part103. These parts do not, by themselves, impose any requirements on theprocessing of complaints at the State or local level. Part 115, on theother hand, sets forth the criteria for HUD's certification that a Stateor local law is substantially equivalent, and its requirements parallelmany of the requirements contained in Parts 103 and 104.Some commenters urged language specifically stating that certain provisions(e.g., HUD procedures for the investigation of complaints) are not bindingon State and local agencys. HUD believes that andSection;andSection; 103.1,104.10 and 115.1 clearly state the applicability of the parts and thatfurther clarification is unnecessary.<T3>Complaint processing and Section 504. </T3>Proposed andSection; 103.1(c)provided that HUD will conduct investigations and conciliations in accordancewith section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794). Onecommenter argued that this paragraph should only apply when a complaintinvolves an allegation of discrimination that is based on handicap. Theproposed section was designed to provide for the reasonable accommodationof persons with disabilities who are participants in the fair housing complaintprocess. The provisions of this section were not intended to be limitedto complaints involving allegations of discrimination based on handicap.This section has been clarified in the final rule.Section 103.9 Definitions.In addition to revisions of aggrieved person, dwelling unit and persondiscussed in the comments to Part 100 above, comments on the definitionsof personal service and receipt of notice were received.One commenter argued that HUD should delete these proposed definitionsand incorporate requirements for personal service and for receipt of servicecontained in the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure. Another commenter urgedHUD to abandon certified mail as a permissible means of service on non-agencyparticipants because service may be frustrated by an addressee's refusalto claim. HUD's current rules provide for the service of documents by certifiedmail or through personal service. (see andSection; 105.18). These methodshave not, as yet, presented significant practical difficulties in the processingof complaints and have been retained in the final rule.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Complaints </ITAG>Section 103.10 Submission of information.Proposed andSection; 103.10 contains provisions governing the submissionof information concerning alleged discriminatory housing practices andnotes that, if the submitted information warrants, HUD may concurrentlyinitiate compliance reviews under other civil rights authorities. In responseto commenters, the Age Discrimination Act of 1975 has been added to thelist of civil rights authorities in this section and andSection;103.5, andminor editorial change has been made for clarity. Section 103.15 Who may file complaints. Section andSection; 103.15 permits any aggrieved person or the AssistantSecretary to file a complaint. One commenter noted that individuals whoare subject to housing discrimination are likely to be low-income personswho cannot read, write, or express themselves articulately. The commentersuggested that andSection; 103.15 be amended to require HUD personnel toprovide full and comprehensive assistance throughout the complaint process,including assignment of an attorney. Similar revisions were requested forandSection;andSection; 103.10(a), 103.30(b), 103.300(b), and 104.10(b). Section103.15 also provides that a complaint may be filed with the assistanceof an authorized representative of an aggrieved person, including any organizationacting on behalf of an aggrieved person. One commenter would modify thisprovision to require HUD to notify the authorized representative actingon behalf of the aggrieved person, concerning the status of cases. The Department agrees that it is vital that HUD provide full assistanceto persons who wish to file a complaint and that HUD continue to provideassistance throughout the complaint processing procedure. Accordingly,the Department intends to pursue its current practice of providing appropriateassistance to such persons. In addition, HUD will, at the request of acomplainant, provide information concerning the status of the complaintto an authorized representative in the same manner as such notificationis provided to complainants. While the Department intends to provide suchinformation, HUD does not believe that it is necessary to codify thesepolicies in the regulations. Section 103.20 Persons against whom complaints may be filed. Under proposed andSection; 103.20(a), a complaint may be filed against anyperson alleged to be engaged, to have engaged, or to be about to engagein a discriminatory housing practice. Commenters urged the deletion oflanguage permitting complaints against respondents that are ``about toengage'' in a discriminatory housing practice. The cited language is anecessary adjunct to the definition of aggrieved person found in the statute(``Aggrieved person means any person who * * * believes that such personwill be injured by a discriminatory housing practice that is about to occur.'')The cited regulatory provision is retained. Proposed andSection; 103.20(b) provides that a complaint may also be filedagainst any person who directs or controls or has the right to direct orcontrol, the conduct of another person with respect to any aspect of thesale, rental, advertising, or financing of dwellings or the provision ofbrokerage services relating to the sale or rental of dwelling, if thatother person, acting within the scope of his or her authority as employeeor agent of the directing or controlling person, is engaged, has engagedor is about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice. Commenters argued that the definition of agency relationships describedin this paragraph is confusing, may be too narrow, and does not correspondto the standards established by case law. Other commenters suggested thatthis provision could be improved by the provision of examples drawn fromcase law and that problems concerning this section could be remedied bythe deletion of the language ``within the scope of his or her authority''.Paragraph (b) expands on the general provisions contained in andSection;103.20(a). This provision reflects HUD's current rules governing the typesof persons against whom complaints may be filed (see andSection; 105.13(b)).This Part 105 regulation was adopted in the final rule issued June 27,1988 (53 FR 24184). In that rule, HUD explained that the provision wasbased on judicial precedent to the effect that persons involved in thesale, rental or financing of dwellings have a nondelegable duty to assurethat all conduct relating to any aspect of the sale, rental or financingof dwellings complies with the Fair Housing Act and that a person who supervises,directs or employs other persons can be legally responsible for actionsof such other persons which violate the Fair Housing Act. See <T3>U.S. v. Youritan Construction Co., </T3>370 F.Supp. 643 (N.D. Calif.1973), modified as to relief and affirmed, 509 F.2d 623 (9th Cir. 1975);<T3>Northside Realty v. U.S., </T3>605 F.2d 1348 (5th Cir. 1979); <T3>Marr v. Rife, </T3>503 F.2d 735 (6th Cir. 1974); <T3>U.S. v. Northside Realty, </T3>474 F.2d 1164 (5th Cir. 1973); <T3>Moore v. Townsend, </T3>525 F.2d 482 (7th Cir. 1975); <T3>Johnson v. Jerry Pals, Real Estate, </T3>485 F.2d 528 (7th Cir. 1973);<T3>Dillion v. AFBIC Development Corp., </T3>420 F.Supp. 572 (S.D. Ala.1976); and <T3>U.S. v. Real Estate Development Corp., </T3>347 F.Supp. 776 (N.D. Miss.1972). Commenters on that rule asserted that the judicial decisions didnot establish a rule of liability without fault as the proposed rule (publishedOctober 16, 1984 (49 FR 40528)) suggested; and that the decided cases focusedonly on the liability of a broker for conduct of his or her salepersons,but did not manage absolute liability on the mere basis to direct or controlwithout reference to instructions, policies, compliance programs, and otheractions of the principal. In response to these comments, HUD announcedthat it was not its intent to impose absolute liability on any principal,but rather to follow the existing case law of the liability of the principal.As a result of this discussion, the language ``acting within his or herauthority'' was added. The commenters on the proposed rule implementingthe 1988 Amendments have presented no argument that convinces the Departmentthat its current analysis of the case law on this point is incorrect.Section 103.25 Where to file complaints.Section 103.25 permits aggrieved persons to provide information to be containedin a complaint by telephone to HUD Regional and Field Offices. While somecommenters have argued for the deletion of this procedure, HUD does notbelieve that the filing of complaints should be limited in the manner thecommenters suggest. The final rule continues HUD's practice of reducinginformation provided by telephone to writing on the complaint form andsending the form to the aggrieved person for signature and affirmation.A substantially equivalent agency complained that HUD's proposed proceduresdo not recognize that State and local agencies may have their own filingprocedures and complaint formats. The agency argued that HUD's regulationsshould state that complaints may be filed with such agencies in accordancewith their filing procedures and that complaints submitted on the agencyforms will be accepted if they meet the requirements of andSection; 103.30(c).These requirements are contained in the regulation at andSection;andSection;103.25(a)(3) and 103.30(b). The regulation is unchanged on this point.Section 103.30 Form and content of the complaint.In response to a commenter, andSection;andSection; 103.30(a) and 103.55(a)have been amended to delete the requirement that complaints and answersmust be attested to before a notary public or a duly authorized representativeof the Assistant Secretary. This attestation burden is unnecessary. Section810(a)(1)(D) requires only that complaints and answers be under oath andaffirmation. Under 24 U.S.C. 1746, the oath and affirmation requirementis satisfied if the complainant (or respondent) signs the following statement:``I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct.''Section 103.42 Amendment of complaint.Section 103.42 has been revised to clarify that complaints may be reasonablyand fairly amended at any time and that the list of circumstances underwhich complaints may be amended is illustrative only.Sections 103.45 Service of notice on aggrieved person and 103.50 Notificationof respondent; joinder of additional or substitute respondents.Section 810(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Act requires the Secretary to serve noticeupon the aggrieved person acknowledging the filing of a complaint and advisingthe person of the time limits and choice of forums provided under TitleVIII. Section 810(a)(1)(B)(ii) of the Act requires the Secretary to servea notice on the respondent within 10 days of the filing of the complaint(or within 10 days of the identification of a substitute or additionalrespondent). This notice must identify the alleged discriminatory housingpractice and advise the respondent of the procedural rights and obligationsof respondents under Title VIII, and include a copy of the complaint. Thesesections are implemented at andSection;andSection; 103.45 and 103.50 respectively.Commenters emphasized the importance of the notice to aggrieved personsand respondents and suggested various additions to and modifications ofthe proposed regulations. The suggested changes included the addition ofa requirement for the service of copies of Title VIII, applicable regulationsand forms, and revisions of the description of the procedural rights andobligations under Title VIII and related laws to provide greater detail.The regulation at andSection;andSection; 103.45 and 103.50 describes, in generalterms, the notification that will be provided to aggrieved persons andrespondents. HUD intends to develop forms consistent with these regulatoryprovisions that will define with greater detail the procedural rights andobligations of the parties under the complaint processing procedures, andthat will describe the additional information that will be provided toassist the parties. While HUD does not believe that it is necessary todetail these provisions in the regulations, HUD will take the commentson these sections into consideration in developing its notification forms.Section 103.55 Answer to complaint.One commenter argued that andSection; 103.55 (Answer to complaint) shouldbe revised to state that the respondent is under no obligation to filean answer and that a decision not to answer will have no impact on therespondent's position in the case. This section clearly provides that thefiling of an answer is permissive. Since answers will generally expeditecomplaint processing, the regulations should not include provisions thatwould discourage their filing.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_Referral of Complaints to State and Local Agencies</ITAG>Section103.100 Notification and referral to substantially equivalent State orlocal agencies.Section 103.100 states the procedures for the notification and referralof complaints to substantially equivalent State and local agencies andprovides for the notification of the aggrieved person and the respondentof the referrals, including the notification of the right of the aggrievedperson to commence a civil action under section 813 of the Fair HousingAct. A commenter suggested that the notification under this section (andunder andSection; 103.115_Notification upon reactivation) also state thata suit may be filed in State court as well as Federal court. The proposedrevision has not been made since State and local jurisdictions must providesuch notifications to the complainant and the respondent as a requirementof certification (see andSection; 115.3(a)(1) (ii) and (iii).Section 103.110 Reactivation of referred complaints.Under andSection; 103.110, HUD will reactivate a referral complaint underthree circumstances. Comments regarding each of these circumstances arediscussed below.<T3>Consensual reactivation.</T3> The complaint may be reactivated whena substantially equivalent State or local agency consents to the reactivation.In response to a comment, this section has been clarified to add that theAssistant Secretary may reactivate a complaint with the consent or at therequest of the agency.<T3>Prompt processing.</T3> The complaint may be reactivated if the substantiallyequivalent State or local agency fails to commence proceedings with respectto the complaint within 30 days of the date that the agency received thenotification and referral of the complaint, or the agency commenced proceedingswithin this 30-day period, but the Assistant Secretary determines thatthe agency has failed to carry the proceedings forward with reasonablepromptness. HUD will not reactivate a complaint under these conditions,however, until the appropriate HUD Regional Office has conferred with theagency to determine the reason for the delay in the processing of the complaint.If the Assistant Secretary believes that the agency will proceed expeditiouslyfollowing the conference, HUD may leave the complaint with the agency fora reasonable time.While commenters supported the provision for consultation prior to reactivation,several changes were recommended. Commenters suggested that the regulationsshould provide for a written notice announcing the time and place for theconference and stating the reasons that the proceeding may be reactivated.Consultation contemplated under this section will be an informal process.In many instances, HUD anticipates that the consultation will be best accomplishedthrough such measures as a telephone, rather than a face-to-face, consultation.To ensure that the procedures to be used are flexible and best suited tothe certified agency, the procedures for consultation will be negotiatedwith each certified agency and incorporated in the memorandum of understanding.The proposed change is not included in the final rule.In order to prevent arbitrary actions by the regional offices, commentersrecommended that HUD establish criteria for determining when an agencyhas failed to act with reasonable promptness. Specific suggestions includedplacing an upper limit on the amount of time that HUD may leave a complaintwith an agency; and establishing procedures for the identification andtime limits for processing of specific types of cases that require a greaterprocessing time (<T3>i.e.,</T3> systemic cases).The determination that an agency has failed to act with reasonable promptnessis one that must be made on a case-by-case basis through consultation withthe certified agency. Given the numerous factors that must be considered(e.g., the subject matter, the number of aggrieved persons, the complexityof the issues involved in the complaint, the progress made by the agencysince the referral of the case, the workload and resources available tothe certified agency, scheduling difficulties between the agency, the aggrievedperson and the respondent, etc.), HUD does not believe that it would beworthwhile to set forth the list of all relevant factors that may reflecta determination that an agency has failed to act with reasonable promptness.Some commenters have argued that HUD's failure to provide greater specificitywith regard to the issue of reasonable promptness and the reactivationof complaints is contrary to the goal of the 1988 Amendments to achieveexpeditious resolution of complaints. HUD notes, however, that certifiedagencies must meet various performance standards for initial and continuedcertification, including limitations on the time for processing of complaints(see andSection; 115.4). HUD believes that these limitations and the provisionsfor reactivation for failure to act with reasonable promptness are sufficientto serve the purposes of the Act.A commenter requested regulatory clarification defining what is meant by``commenced proceedings''. Because the 1988 Amendments provide for conciliationbeginning as early as the filing of the charge, this term, as used in thefinal rule, could mean the start of investigation or the start of conciliation.Since the initial investigation or conciliation activity to be conductedwill vary from agency to agency, HUD has not defined commencement of proceedingsin the regulation. This term will be defined in the memorandum of understandingwith each agency and will be based on the individual agency's procedures.<T3>Decertification.</T3> Complaints may also be reactivated if the AssistantSecretary determines that the agency no longer qualifies for recognitionas a substantially equivalent State or local agency and may not acceptinterim referrals with respect to the alleged discriminatory housing practice.No comments were received on this issue.Section 103.115 Notification upon reactivation.Under andSection; 103.115, the Assistant Secretary is required to notifythe certified State or local agency, the aggrieved person and the respondentof the reactivation of a complaint. A commenter noted that HUD staff oftenwill notify the parties that they do not need to continue to cooperatewith the certified agency after reactivation. The commenter argued thatthe notification in andSection; 103.115 should clearly indicate that theagency may continue to process the complaint after reactivation and thatthe parties should continue to cooperate with such efforts.HUD recognizes the certified agency's responsibility under State and locallaw to continue processing complaints following reactivation. The finalrule has been amended to assure that the parties are aware of these responsibilities.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Investigation Procedures</ITAG>Procedural steps prior toinvestigation and conciliationOne commenter, a mortgage banking association, feared that individualsfrustrated by the rejection of loan applications for legitimate underwritingreasons will use the fair housing complaint process to appeal their rejection.The commenter urged HUD to provide a screening process to eliminate thosecomplaints that fall outside of the fair housing area. If a complaint,on its face, sets forth an allegation of a discriminatory housing practice,HUD is obligated to accept the complaint and process it under its procedures.HUD cannot, and has not, provided a ``screening process'' to eliminatesuch complaints.Section 103.200 Investigations.<T3>HUD-initiated investigations.</T3> Upon the filing of a complaint,the Assistant Secretary is required to initiate an investigation. In additionto investigations initiated by complaints, the 1988 amendments permit HUDto initiate an investigation of housing practices to determine whethera complaint should be filed under Subpart B (see section 810(a)(1)(A)(iii)of the Act). The proposed rule would permit such investigations upon thewritten direction of the Assistant Secretary.While many commenters supported the provisions permitting HUD to initiatecomplaints, they opposed the requirement that these investigations maybe initiated only upon the written direction of the Assistant Secretary.Commenters argued that the requirement is impractical, will delay investigationsand should be stricken. As an alternative, the commenters suggested thatthe regulations provide that the Assistant Secretary may delegate authorityto the regions to initiate investigations under certain circumstances.HUD emphasizes that the requirement for prior approval applies only tothose investigations that are initiated by HUD. In the absence of a complaintalleging a discriminatory housing practice made by an aggrieved person,HUD believes that the approval of the Assistant Secretary is necessaryto ensure that sufficient grounds for investigation exist and to ensurethe efficient utilization of resources. While the text of the rule statesthat the <T3>Assistant Secretary </T3>will make such approvals, as the Departmentdevelops uniform internal standards to govern the initiation of investigationsand gains experience with HUD-initiated investigations, the Assistant Secretarywill make appropriate delegations of authority for the initiation of investigationsto the regional offices. Such delegations of authority can be made by <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice without the necessity of a rulemakingprocedure.<T3>Testing during investigations. </T3>One commenter argued that section103.200 should provide that HUD will conduct professional testing or willfund other groups to conduct testing during the investigation stage. Inconnection with this revision, the commenters urge HUD to establish (withthe assistance of housing professionals) the standards for conducting tests,what the tests should measure and the criteria to be used in determiningwhether discrimination exists.Testing has been sanctioned by court decisions as an appropriate and essentialtool of fair housing enforcement, and HUD will consider evidence developedthrough testing or auditing by fair housing groups or representatives ofan aggrieved person in its investigations. HUD staff, however, does notengage in testing. Funding for private entities conducting projects designedto enforce the Fair Housing Act and substantially equivalent fair housinglaws will be permitted under the Fair Housing Initiatives Program (proposedrule published July 7, 1988 (53 FR 25576)).Section 103.205 Systemic processing.Section 103.205 provides for the systemic processing of complaints. Onecommenter objected to the inclusion of this provision. The commenter arguedthat HUD's processing should be limited to the specific complaint, notother fair housing issues.Section 810 clearly contemplates the investigation of matters related to,but not specifically alleged in, the filed complaint. (E.g., section 810(g)(2)(B)provides that the charge need not be limited to the facts or grounds allegedin the filed complaint.) The purpose of systemic processing is to providefor the investigation of discriminatory housing practices that are pervasiveor institutional in nature and for the processing of complaints that involvecomplex issues, involve novel questions of fact or law, or affect a largenumber of persons. HUD believes that the cited revision is inconsistentwith the scope of HUD's investigative authority and would undermine HUD'sability to address complex issues. The proposed change has not been madein the final rule.Section 103.215 Conduct of investigations.Section 103.215(a) continues HUD's existing practice of seeking the voluntarycooperation of persons to obtain access to information necessary to furtherthe investigation. One commenter argued that this section serves no usefulpurpose. Much of the information obtained through HUD's investigationsis provided through cooperative efforts rather than through proceduraldiscovery techniques. In recognition of the success of these efforts, paragraph(a) is being retained.Section 103.215(b) states that the Assistant Secretary and the respondentmay conduct discovery in aid of the investigation by the same methods andto the same extent that parties may conduct discovery in an administrativehearing under Part 104, except that the Assistant Secretary would havethe power to issue subpoenas as described in andSection; 104.590 in supportof the investigation or at the request of the respondent. One commenterargued that paragraph (b) does not comport with the statute and appearsto unnecessarily complicate discovery. The commenter suggested the substitutionof language directing that discovery and subpoenas be issued in the samemanner as in civil actions in the United States District Court for thedistrict in which the investigation is taking place.The reference in the rule to the Part 104 procedures provides uniformityin discovery techniques while assuring compliance with the statutory requirementin section 811, which provide that discovery and subpoenas be issued inthe same manner as civil actions in the United States for the districtin which the investigation is taking place. (See andSection;andSection; 104.500(a)and 104.590(a)). The rule is unchanged.Another commenter argued that since HUD should be neutral with respectto the parties during the investigation, there is no reason to deny theaggrieved person the right to conduct discovery while providing this sameright to the respondent. While HUD is neutral with respect to the parties,the parties' positions during the investigation are not equal. The respondentis the focus of an investigation aimed at determining whether he or shehas committed a discriminatory housing practice and, thus, must be offeredthe ability to discover information in its own defense. The complainingparty, on the other hand, by filing a complaint rather than pursuing itsown civil action under section 813, places the conduct of the investigationin HUD's hands and will not be allowed to conduct separate discovery. HUDnotes that the Fair Housing Act does not foreclose a discovery avenue toaggrieved persons who have filed complaints, since the complainant mayfile a civil action under section 813(a) with regard to the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice and obtain discovery through the court proceeding.Subpoenas issued by the Assistant Secretary would require the approvalof the General Counsel before issuance. Some commenters argued that onlyone entity should be involved in the issuance of subpoenas during the investigation.These commenters would delete the references to General Counsel's approvalof subpoena issuances. Subpoenas issued by HUD in furtherance of an investigationmay be challenged or enforced through judicial proceedings. Since the legalsufficiency of the subpoena will be at issue, it is necessary to ensurethat the issuance is justified. Accordingly, the rule continues to providefor review by the General Counsel. A minor clarifying change has been includedlimiting the General Counsel's review to legal issues.Section 103.220 Cooperation of Federal, State and local agencies.Section andSection; 103.220 reflects provisions currently contained in Part105 which permit the Assistant Secretary, in processing Fair Housing Actcomplaints, to seek the cooperation and utilize the services of State andlocal agencies and of other appropriate Federal agencies. Proposed andSection;103.220 also contained language designed to ensure that other Federal agenciesare aware of their responsibility under section 808 (d) and (e) of theAct and under Executive Order No. 12259.Upon review, HUD has concluded that proposed andSection; 103.220 may generateconfusion concerning the agencies' obligations to provide information duringthe investigation process and their duty to ensure that programs and activitiesare administered in a manner that will affirmatively further fair housingand their duty to cooperate with the Assistant Secretary in furtheringthe purposes of the Fair Housing Act, including the conduct of investigations.To clarify these provisions, andSection; 103.220 has been revised to statethat the Assistant Secretary, in processing Fair Housing Act complaints,may seek the cooperation and utilize the services of Federal, State orlocal agencies, including any agency having regulatory or supervisory authorityover financial institutions. Provisions governing other agencies' dutiesto affirmatively further fair housing and for cooperating in furtheringthe purposes of the Fair Housing Act have been moved to a new andSection;103.515 entitled ``Actions by other agencies''.One commenter argued that this section does not clearly announce what typeof cooperation HUD will generally expect of banking regulators, or whatrole these agencies will play in providing material for investigations.The commenter also asserted that it is unclear whether material generatedby banking regulators or financial institutions in response to regulatoryrequirements and for purposes unrelated to the proposed rule would, contraryto existing banking policy, become public documents. Another commentersupported the aims of andSection; 103.220 but suggested specific regulatoryprovisions designed to address the duty of other agencies to cooperatein investigations and procedures to be followed in pursuing discovery fromsuch agencies.HUD intends to review and upgrade its memoranda of understanding with coveredagencies to cover our cooperative understandings concerning the provisionof in formation to HUD under the Fair Housing Act, including informationto be provided pursuant to investigations. All terms and conditions ofHUD access will be addressed in these agreements. Accordingly, it is notnecessary to provide more specific regulations in this area. Section 103.225 Completion of investigation. <T3>Completion of investigation. </T3>Section 103.230 states that the investigationwill remain open until the reasonable cause determination is made. A commenterargued that the General Counsel, who is charged with making the reasonablecause determination, could remove a case from the Assistant Secretary'scontrol by issuing a determination on reasonable cause before the complaintis fully investigated. This commenter felt that conciliation should beavailable until the complaint is transferred by the Assistant Secretaryto the General Counsel for a reasonable cause determination and the GeneralCounsel has filed a charge or dismissed the complaint. To remedy this problem,andSection; 103.400(c)(1) has been revised to provide that the General Counselshall make the reasonable cause determination only after the AssistantSecretary forwards the matter for consideration. <T3>Deadline for completion of investigation. </T3>Section 810(a)(1)(B)(iv)and (C) provide that HUD must complete investigations within 100 days afterthe filing of the compliant (or, when a complaint has been referred toa substantially equivalent State or local agency and reactivated, within100 days after service of the notification of reactivation), unless itis impracticable to do so. If the investigation cannot be completed withinthis time limit, HUD is required to notify the aggrieved person and therespondent of the reasons for the delay. Section 810(g)(1) requires HUDto make the reasonable cause determination within the same 100-day timeperiod, and to provide notification of the reasons for any delay. Theserequirements were included in andSection;andSection; 103.225 and 103.400(c)of the proposed rule. Several commenters requested deletion of the impracticability exception.The impracticability exception was a recognition by Congress that theremay be circumstances where investigations may not be completed, and thereasonable cause determination made, within the prescribed 100-day period.While HUD intends to meet these deadlines whenever it is within its powerto do so, it is concerned that the imposition of a strict 100-day deadlinewill not recognize the need for a lengthier investigation in complaintsinvolving complex issues or recalcitrant respondents, and that respondentscould argue for the dismissal of an otherwise meritorious complaint basedon the failure to complete an investigation. Since HUD perceives that novalid fair housing-related goal would be served by imposing a strict 100-daydeadline in all cases, the impracticability standard has been retained.Other commenters argued that the regulation must clearly identify the circumstancesunder which it will be impracticable to complete the investigation or issuea reasonable cause determination within the 100-day period. These commenterssuggested that impracticability be defined as extraordinary circumstancesin the specific case and that the rule should state that the routine processingof other cases will not be grounds for a finding of impracticability. Therange of circumstances that could legitimately cause delay in a case isnumerous, and HUD is not prepared to identify all possible circumstancesthat would make it ``impracticable'' to take the described actions withinthe prescribed time period. Moreover, even if HUD were to articulate allsuch circumstances, it would not preclude the consideration of the demandsupon HUD's resources caused by other docketed cases. Such a definitionwould fail to recognize that even the best-managed case inventory systemmay not posses sthe excess capacity to respond to extraordinary demandsupon resources. Section 103.230 Final investigative report (FIR).Requirements governing the contents of the investigative report are codifiedat andSection; 103.230. Paragraph (a)(1) of this section provides that theinvestigative report will disclose the names and dates of contacts withwitnesses, but will not disclose the names of witnesses that request anonymity.As noted in the rule, however, HUD may be required to disclose the namesof such witnesses during the course of an administrative hearing underPart 104 or in a civil action under Title VIII. Commenters argued thatthe provision for nondisclosure of the identity of witnesses should beeliminated. The questioned provision merely continues HUD's current policywith regard to the disclosure of the identity of witnesses. Contrary tothe allegations of the commenters, this policy has not undermined the credibilityof HUD's investigations nor has it stifled conciliation efforts. The provisionhas been retained in the final rule. One commenter argued that the regulations also should bar the disclosureof personal information about third parties and safeguard information thatpotentially could endanger the physical safety of the parties or of a thirdparty. While HUD's final investigative report will avoid the inclusionof extraneous information, it is impossible for HUD to bar the disclosureof all information about third parties and to guarantee the individualsafety of parties or of a third party. The proposed provision has not beenincluded. One commenter was concerned that the format for the investigative reportmay not provide an adequate basis for a reasonable cause determination.The investigative report will not be the only document available in connectionwith the making of a reasonable cause determination. The actual statementsof witnesses and documentary evidence as well as the analysis of the investigationalso will be considered. Internal procedures relating to these matterswill be developed by HUD. Such procedures are not appropriate for inclusionin this rule. Commenters urged that the FIR requirements be expanded to include a recommendationby the investigator on the reasonable cause determination and to includethe facts and legal basis for the investigator's recommendation. As a matterof internal policy, HUD anticipates that the views of the investigatorwith regard to the reasonable cause determination will be communicatedto the General Counsel's office. HUD does not believe that it is necessaryto incorporate this requirement in the regulation. As required under section 810(d)(2) of the Act, andSection; 103.230(c) providesthat the Assistant Secretary shall make information derived from an investigation,including the final investigative report, available to the aggrieved personand the respondent, upon request, at any time following the completionof the investigation. In response to a commenter, the final rule has beenrevised to require HUD, following the completion of the investigation,to notify the aggrieved person and the respondent that the FIR is completeand will be provided or upon request. Under most circumstances, the notificationwill be provided with the charge, where a charge is issued under andSection;103.405, or with the notice of dismissal under andSection; 104.400(a)(2).<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Conciliation Procedures</ITAG>Section 103.310 Conciliationagreement.If conciliation is successful, the terms of the settlement are reducedto a written conciliation agreement. Section 810(b)(2) of the Act providesthat a conciliation agreement shall be an agreement between the respondentand the complainant, and shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary.Section 103.310(b) incorporates these requirements and states that theAssistant Secretary will indicate HUD approval of the conciliation agreementby signing the agreement.The final rule makes a minor revision to this provision. Under the proposedrule, if HUD is the complainant, the Assistant Secretary would executethe agreement only if the aggrieved person is satisfied with the reliefprovided to protect his or her interest. The final rule recognizes thatthere may be circumstances where HUD may file a complaint that identifiesa class of aggrieved persons, rather than specific aggrieved persons. Undersuch circumstances it would be impossible to determine if all aggrievedpersons in the class are satisfied with the relief accorded. Accordingly,the final rule permits the Assistant Secretary to execute the agreementif all aggrieved persons named in the compliant filed by HUD are satisfiedwith the relief provided to protect their interests.Section 103.310(b)(2) would preserve the General Counsel's ability to issuea charge under andSection; 103.405, where the aggrieved person and the respondenthave executed a conciliation agreement that has not been approved by theAssistant Secretary.Commenters argued that HUD should not be permitted to commence or continuethe investigation once an agreement is reached between the aggrieved partyand the respondent. The commenters argued that the retention of this provisionwould ``chill'' conciliation agreements between the aggrieved person andthe respondent and would serve no purpose since the Assistant Secretarywill have right to initiate complaints under the 1988 Amendments. HUD couldlose the ability to initiate a new complaint if the time period for thefiling of the complaint has passed. Moreover, it would be wasteful of administrativeresources to require HUD to file another complaint and to maintain a secondcase file under these circumstances. The final rule does not adopt thecommenter's suggestion.Section 103.315 Relief sought for aggrieved persons.Section 103.315 lists the types of relief that may be sought for the aggrievedperson during conciliation. Under paragraph (a)(1), monetary relief inthe form of damages, including damages caused by humiliation or embarassmentand attorneys fees. One commenter argued that monetary relief should belimited to ``compensatory'' damages. Another commenter argued against theprovision of damages for humiliation or embarrassment, stating that sucha practice would result in extraordinary and unreasonable damage awards.HUD has left paragraph (a)(1) unchanged. Damages for humiliation and embarrassmentand noncompensatory damages (i.e., punitive and exemplary damages) canbe awarded in civil actions brought under Title VIII. Since respondentswill seek a full release of all claims as a part of the conciliation, theregulation should permit negotiations that take such factors into accountas a part of the settlement. Although monetary damages other than actualdamages are usually not provided for in a conciliation agreement, it isHUD's intent that the rule not preclude the possibility of seeking punitiveor exemplary damages for an aggrieved person in an appropriate situation.Paragraph (a)(2) provides for other make-whole relief, including accessto the dwelling at issue or to a comparable dwelling, the provision ofservices or facilities in connection with a dwelling, or other specificrelief. This provision has been amended to provide for ``other equitablerelief, including but not limited to'' the listed actions. While one commenterfelt that the provision for access to a comparable dwelling was redundant,HUD believes that the inclusion of this provision is appropriate to coversituations where the original dwelling at issue is no longer available.Commenters argued that the provisions permitting the binding arbitrationof disputes arising out of the complaint could be improved by the additionof a description of the rules and procedures that will be used in arbitration.This change has not been made. HUD wishes to keep the arbitration remedyas flexible as possible in order that individual aggrieved persons andrespondents will have the opportunity to adopt the procedures that willbest suit their circumstances.Section 103.320 Provisions sought for the public interest.Section 103.320 lists the types of provisions that may be sought for thevindication of the public interest. Commenters argued that the regulationsshould announce the standards that HUD will use in determining whethera conciliation agreement will adequately vindicate the public interest.No useful purpose would be served by listing every form of public interestthat HUD may protect with conciliation agreement provisions. These provisionsare often tailored to the circumstances of particular cases. The suggestedchange has not been adopted.One commenter noted that civil penalties may be assessed in the administrativeproceeding and the civil action. This commenter urged HUD to add a newprovision permitting the seeking of civil penalties of up to $50,000 inconciliation. As noted above, HUD has not precluded the negotiation ofdamages in lieu of possible court-awarded punitive damages on behalf ofthe aggrieved person in conciliation, because such agreements are madein return for the full release by the aggrieved person of all claims againstthe respondent. However, since the public interest is vindicated by ensuringfuture compliance and by rectifying the effects of past discriminatoryhousing practices, rather than penalizing the respondent for such practices,civil penalties have not been added under andSection;103.320.One commenter argued that HUD should be permitted to seek compensationfor private fair housing groups that have participated in mediation orinvestigation before the complaint is filed. HUD recognizes that privatefair housing groups often play a significant role in assisting and referringcomplaints on a Federal and State level, and in providing initial investigationand mediation assistance that is often useful in handling the complaintafter it is filed. However, HUD does not believe that the conciliationagreement is an appropriate device for the recovery of such compensationon behalf of the fair housing group in any case where the group is notan aggrieved person. In other instances, HUD fears that attempts to recovercompensation for such groups would be viewed as collusion between HUD andthe groups.Section 103.330 Prohibitions and requirements with respect to disclosureof information obtained during conciliation, and andSection;103.300(a) Participationas conciliator and investigator. Under section 810(d), nothing said or done in the course of conciliationmay be made public or used as evidence in a subsequent proceeding underTitle VIII without the written consent of the persons concerned. ProposedandSection;103.330(a) implemented this provision with the additional statementthat information disclosed during conciliation would not be used in theinvestigation of the complaint. Upon reconsideration, HUD has decided to remove the additional statementconcerning information disclosed during conciliation. By barring the useof conciliation statements or conduct ``in an investigation'', the proposedrule imposed greater restraints on the use of such information than areimposed under the statute. The statutory language represents a balancebetween the need to encourage candor in conciliation discussions and theneed for a full development of the facts in the investigation and litigationof the complaint. The proposed language, in striking a different balance,may not conform to the statutory intent. Although it is fairly obvious that statements made during conciliationmight provide useful investigative leads, Congress did not preclude theuse of such statements. The real concern of Congress was the effect onconciliation if statements made or conduct exhibited during conciliationwere admissible in a later administrative proceeding or civil action. By barring the investigative use of conciliation statements and conduct,HUD invites both complainants and respondents to argue that the investigationhas somehow been ``tainted'' by information obtained during the conciliation.This would invite wasteful litigation concerning whether HUD conductedits conciliation and investigation activities in accordance with its ownregulations and would provide parties with an incentive to insulate themselvesfrom the use of evidence at trial, by disclosing key facts during conciliation.In the final rule, the prohibition against the use of conciliation informationin investigations will be dropped. HUD notes that the use of such informationin administrative hearings and civil actions will be governed by Rule 408of the Federal Rules of Evidence. (See andSection;104.730) Rule 408 makesinadmissible at trial ``evidence of conduct or statements made in compromisenegotiations,'' but ``does not require the exclusion of any evidence otherwisediscoverable merely because it is presented in the course of compromisenegotiations.'' As a related matter, andSection;103.300(c) limits the participation of officers,employees, and agents of HUD engaged in the investigation of a complaintunder Part 103 in the conciliation of the same complaint or in any factuallyrelated complaint. While the original purpose of this general limitationwas to ensure that information gathered during the conciliation processis not used in the investigation of the complaint, HUD continues to believethat conciliation of individual complaints can be best promoted where theinvestigation and conciliation functions are kept separate, so andSection;103.300(c)is being retained despite the adjustments made in andSection;103.330, discussedabove. Section 103.300(c) continues to recognize that there may be circumstanceswhere a dual role for the HUD employee may be necessary. This section permitsthe investigator to suspend fact finding and engage in efforts to resolvethe complaint by conciliation where the rights of the aggrieved personand the respondent can be protected and the prohibitions with respect tothe disclosure of information obtained during conciliation can be observed.HUD emphasizes that such conciliations will generally occur where the investigator,during the course of investigation, is requested by the parties to conciliateand will rarely be initiated by the investigator. One commenter, concerned that any suspension of fact finding would undulydelay the completion of the investigation, opposed this provision. Thesuspension of the investigation envisioned under this provision shouldnot delay the investigation appreciably and should not prevent the Departmentfrom fulfilling its 100-day deadline for investigation and the reasonablecause determination. Section 103.330(b) provides an exception to the prohibition against disclosureof conciliation information. This section provides that conciliation agreementswill be made public, unless the aggrieved person and the respondent requestnondisclosure and the Assistant Secretary determines that disclosure isnot required to further the purposes of the Fair Housing Act. One commentersuggested that the provision should note that one of the purposes to beconsidered in determining whether disclosure should be required is theeducation of people about their fair housing rights and remedies and toshow that meaningful redress can result from reporting possible violationsto HUD and utilizing the conciliation process. While HUD agrees that thecited factor is significant in determining whether disclosure of a conciliationagreement will further the purposes of the Fair Housing Act, HUD is requiredto consider other purposes in making the disclosure determination. Thefinal rule has not been changed to highlight this purpose. One commenter asked how conciliation agreements would be made public. Wherethe terms of a conciliation agreement do not otherwise provide, HUD intendsto issue a press release setting out the fact of successful conciliationand outlining the major terms of the agreement. The statute also requires``public disclosure'' in the case of any complaint where the Secretaryhas determined that no reasonable cause exists to believe that a discriminatoryhousing practice has occurred or is about to occur, and has dismissed thecomplaint. The Department intends to employ press releases for this purposeas well. Where a complaint is dismissed on a finding of no reasonable causeand the respondent specifies that even public disclosure absolving therespondent would be unwelcome, the Department will refrain from issuinga press release. However, HUD interprets the Amendments Act as requiringsome form of public disclosure on the occasion of a dismissed complaint,and accordingly the Department's policy will be to disclose this informationto the public if a specific request is received. Section 103.335 Review of compliance with conciliation agreements. Proposed andSection;103.335 stated that HUD may, from time to time, reviewcompliance with the terms of any conciliation agreement. Whenever HUD hasreasonable cause to believe that a respondent has breached a conciliationagreement, HUD shall refer the matter to the Attorney General with a recommendationthat a civil action be filed under section 814(b)(2) of the Act for theenforcement of the terms of the conciliation agreement. One commenter argued that the language used in this section indicates thatreview of compliance agreements will be ``haphazard and perfunctory.''The commenter recommended the deletion of the phrase ``from time to time''and would make compliance review mandatory and periodic (at least oncea year) whether or not HUD has reasonable cause to believe that a breachhas occurred. Requiring HUD staff to monitor every conciliation agreement on a mandatoryand periodic basis is not the most effective used of HUD's limited resources.Compliance reviews under this section will not be performed on a haphazardor perfunctory basis. Rather, compliance reviews will be performed on arandom sampling basis, or if HUD has reason to believe that the signatoriesare not complying with the terms of a particular agreement. The final ruleis unchanged.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Issuance of Charge  </ITAG>Section 103.400 Reasonable causedetermination.  <T3>Reasonable cause standard.</T3> Proposed andSection; 103.400(a) providedthat if a conciliation agreement has not been executed by the complainantand the respondent and approved by the Assistant Secretary, the GeneralCounsel, within specified time limits, shall determine, based on the totalityof the factual circumstances known at the time of the decision, whetherreasonable cause exists to believe that a discriminatory housing practicehas occurred or is about to occur. The reasonable cause determination shallbe based on all the facts concerning the alleged discriminatory housingpractice, provided by the complainant and respondent and otherwise, disclosedduring the investigation. In making the reasonable cause determination,the General Counsel shall consider whether the facts concerning the allegeddiscriminatory housing practice are sufficient to warrant the initiationof a civil action in federal court.  A number of commenters objected to the reasonable cause standard announcedin this section. Some argued that the standard is overly restrictive andmay unduly limit the number of charges that will be issued by HUD. Othersalleged that the meaning of the proposed standard is unclear and may openthe door for subjective decisions and may permit the consideration of irrelevantfactors. (<T3>I.e., </T3>Some commenters suggested that the proposed language wouldpermit HUD to consider any matters that could have a bearing on a decisionto bring a lawsuit, including: an assessment of the strength of the suit,the amount of anticipated damages, the government's resources that wouldbe devoted to the proceeding, the availability of witnesses, docket scheduling,and other factors generally bearing on the exercise of prosecutorial discretion).Commenters argued that language of the statute and relevant legislativehistory limit HUD's assessment to the issue of liability alone.  Contrary to the allegations of the commenters, a fair reading of the regulationclearly demonstrates HUD's intent to limit the reasonable cause assessmentto the issue of whether a discriminatory housing practice has occurredor is about to occur. HUD, by repetition in the regulation, expressed itsposition that the reasonable cause determination is to be based solelyon the issue of liability. No less than three passages state this proposition.(<T3>I.e., </T3>the regulation states that the determination will be ``basedon the totality of the factual circumstances''; that the reasonable causedetermination ``shall be based on all facts concerning the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice''; and ``the General Counsel shall consider whether thefacts concerning the alleged discriminatory housing practice are sufficientto warrant the initiation of the civil action.'' While the proposed languagewould foreclose the consideration of extraneous matters not related tothe factual determination of liability, HUD has made an additional modificationin the final rule to reflect HUD's intent that the reasonable cause determinationis to be based <T3>solely on</T3> the facts determined during investigation.  The source of many commenters' dissatisfaction is the provision that requiresthe General Counsel to determine whether the facts concerning the allegeddiscriminatory housing practice are sufficient to warrant the initiationof a civil action. Rather than permitting consideration of the probabilityof winning the case, this standard is merely intended to require that thecharge is well-grounded in the facts and that the conduct that is the subjectof the complaint appears to constitute a violation of the Act.  Commenters suggested several alternative standards. These standards are,in some cases, identical to the standard contained in the proposed rule.For example, some commenters proposed that the standard should be whetherthe information disclosed warrants the initiation of a civil action <T3>or</T3> an administrative proceeding under Part 104. In other cases,the alternative standards are substantially the same as the standard containedin the proposed rule (e.g., whether a reasonable and fair-minded trierof fact could conclude that a discriminatory housing practice has occurredor is about to occur, etc.). Accordingly, the proposed standards have notbeen incorporated in the final rule.  Other commenters argued that, in addition to the reasonable cause standard,HUD should make certain presumptions in favor of the aggrieved person whenmaking the determination (e.g., to construe the facts in favor of the aggrievedperson or to assume that the evidence offered by the aggrieved person istrue) or that HUD should reserve all issues of material fact for determinationat the hearing or trial. Such presumptions and reservations are inconsistentwith HUD's duty to analyze and make a reasoned judgment concerning thealleged discriminatory housing practice and would obviate any need fora HUD investigation, as required by the statute. For this reason, the suggestionsare rejected.  <T3>Written reasonable cause determination. </T3>Commenters argued thatall determinations of reasonable cause or lack of reasonable cause mustbe in writing and set forth in an opinion which states the facts and legalconclusions. The commenters argued that such a requirement would discouragesubjective determinations and establish accountability on the part of thefact finder and respect for the administrative process.  HUD has made minor changes to the final rule to clarify that all determinationswill be made in writing and will set forth a brief summary of the factualbasis of the determination. An extensive factual recitation will be unnecessary,since the complete investigative report will contain this information andwill be available to the aggrieved person and the respondent. (The rulesalready provide that where a finding of reasonable cause is made, the chargewill include a short and plain statement of the facts upon which the GeneralCounsel has found reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatory housingpractice has occurred or is about to occur). The notification will notstate the legal theory upon which the determination is made since the Departmentfeels that such a statement would encourage needless litigation by encouragingthe participants to mount collateral attacks on the reasonable cause determination. <T3>Appeal of reasonable cause determination.</T3> The regulation providesno right to appeal a reasonable cause determination. Commenters arguedthat such an appeal is necessary to permit review of errors of law or facts,and that failure to provide such an appeal is contrary to standard administrativeprocedure. Some commenters would limit appeals to determinations of noreasonable cause.  The statute does not contemplate a review of the reasonable cause determination.Section 810(g)(1) requires HUD to make the reasonable cause determinationwithin a 100-day time period from the filing of the complaint and to takespecified actions immediately (or promptly) after the determination ismade. (The statute directs HUD to ``immediately'' issue a charge on behalfof the aggrieved person after reasonable cause is found (section 810(g)(2))and to ``promptly dismiss'' the complaint and make public disclosure ofthe dismissal where no reasonable cause is found (section 810(g)(3)).)In light of these directions, HUD believes that it is significant thatthe Act does not specifically provide for an appeal of the reasonable causedetermination, particularly where such procedures are specified withinother sections. (See section 812(h), which provides for Secretarial reviewof the ALJ's initial decision.) Moreover, HUD believes that appeals ofthe determination of reasonable cause would be contrary to the legislativehistory of the 1988 Amendments, which supports the expeditious resolutionof complaints. The additional review would delay the resolution of proceedingsby civil action or administrative hearings under Part 104.  HUD notes that the failure to provide for the review of the reasonablecause determination will not preclude an aggrieved person from filing acivil action under section 813 of the Act. Nor will the dismissal preventan aggrieved person from refiling a complaint based on newly discoveredor previously unavailable information, provided the one-year time limitfor the filing of a complaint is met. (In this regard, one commenter arguedthat the regulations should permit HUD to toll the statutory one-year statuteof limitation for filing where a complaint is refiled. This change hasnot been made since there is no statutory authority for such an action.) <T3>Reasonable cause determination and State and local zoning cases.</T3>Under proposed andSection; 103.400(a)(1), if the General Counsel determinesthat reasonable cause exists, the General Counsel shall immediately issuea charge on behalf of the aggrieved person, unless the matter involvesthe legality of a State or local zoning or other land use law or ordinance.If such a law or ordinance is involved, HUD is required to refer the matterto the Attorney General for appropriate action under section 814(b)(1)of the Act. One commenter argued that the rule should state that the referralof such a case will not be made until an investigation has been completedand conciliation has been attempted. It is HUD's intention to investigatecomplaints alleging discriminatory housing practices that involve the legalityof a State or local law and to forward its investigation to the Departmentof Justice. This section has been revised to provide further clarity onthis point. See andSection; 103.400(a)(2) of the final rule.  <T3>Adoption of a reasonable cause determination made by a certified agency.</T3>Commenters argued that the final rule should state that a finding of reasonablecause by a substantially equivalent agency will automatically be adoptedby HUD, and require the Secretary to issue a charge. Commenters arguedthat the failure to include this provision will deny complainants the fullprotection of the new law during the 40-month period that currently substantiallyequivalent agencies have to conform their procedures and remedies.The 1988 Amendments require HUD to make referrals for up to 40 months followingthe date of enactment to agencies that are certified (including agenciesthat are certified for interim referrals under Part 115) on the date ofenactment. As noted in the preamble to the proposed rule, it is unlikelythat such agencies will immediately provide the full range of remediesaccorded to complainants under the 1988 Amendments. Given the limited statutoryauthorization for reactivation provided under section 810(f)(2) of theAct, it does not appear that HUD has unilateral authority to reactivatethe complaint to provide the full range of remedies available under theAct absent other circumstances. Under the limited circumstance where HUD will be able to reactivate andwhere the State or local agency has issued a reasonable cause determination(the existence of such a determination is highly unlikely until the Stateor local agency has modified its existing procedures to conform to the1988 Amendments), HUD cannot automatically adopt the local agency's determination.HUD must ensure that the determination rests on a firm factual basis. WhileHUD may use the information gathered by such agencies (with appropriatesupplementation through a HUD investigation) to make its independent evaluationof the factual circumstances surrounding the alleged discriminatory housingpractice, the responsibility for making the reasonable cause determinationcannot be delegated in such a manner. <T3> Deadline for reasonable cause determination. </T3>Issues regarding100-day deadline for the reasonable cause determination are discussed above.<T3>Participation of the Assistant Secretary in the reasonable cause determination.</T3>Several commenters argued that the regulations should state that thereasonable cause determination will be made in consultation with the AssistantSecretary's office, and with due regard to the recommendations of the investigator.Another commenter feared that the investigation report, without furthersupporting data, may not be sufficient for the General Counsel to makethe reasonable cause determination. The commenter asked whether the GeneralCounsel would have access to the complete file, whether the General Counselmay send the case back for further investigation, and whether the GeneralCounsel would be permitted to conduct his or her own independent investigation.As noted under the discussion of the investigation report, the GeneralCounsel will provide due deference to the recommendations of the AssistantSecretary and the investigator. There obviously will be communicationsbetween the two offices concerning this determination and access to filesand additional investigative materials. Since such communications willbe a matter of internal administrative procedures at HUD, it is not necessaryto set forth the procedures in the regulation. With regard to the investigation of additional matters, the final ruleprovides that the investigation will remain open until the reasonable causedetermination is made. This provision was intended to permit the GeneralCounsel to request the Assistant Secretary to make a further investigationwhere the investigative report is insufficient to determine whether reasonablecause exists, and to make direct inquiries to supplement the investigation.Several commenters asserted that permitting the General Counsel to conducthis or her own investigation would be contrary to the intention of thelegislation, would undermine the Assistant Secretary's investigative function;may needlessly duplicate investigative activity; and would delay the dispositionof cases. The General Counsel does not have the resources to engage inextensive fact-finding. Accordingly, where such fact-finding is required,the Assistant Secretary will be requested to conduct further investigation.Whenever there are minor issues capable of expeditious resolution, however,nothing prevents the General Counsel from resolving the issues throughdirect inquiries. The internal procedures for the conduct of such furtherinquiries will be worked out through agreements between the Assistant Secretaryand the General Counsel. Section 103.405 Issuance of charge. Section 103.405 governs the issuance of the charge. Paragraph (a)(5) ofthis section provides that the charge need not be limited to the factsor grounds that are alleged in the complaint. A commenter argued that HUDshould not be able to set forth new facts or new grounds in the charge.The commenter argued that HUD should be required to amend the complaintif new acts or grounds are found. Following the amendment, the respondentand aggrieved person should be given an opportunity to enter a conciliationagreement based upon the additional facts or grounds. Section 810(g)(2)(B) expressly provides that the charge need not be basedon the facts or grounds alleged in the complaint. Where additional groundsare discovered during the processing of the complaint, HUD intends to informthe respondent of the additional grounds and to seek information from therespondent concerning such matters. HUD will not require the amendmentof the complaint as long as the record of the investigation clearly indicatesthat the respondent has been given notice and an opportunity to respondto the new allegations. The final rule at andSection; 103.405(a)(3) has beenamended to reflect this policy. Section 103.410 Election of civil action or provision of administrativeproceeding. Section 103.410 governs the election of a civil action under section 810(o)or the provision of an administrative proceeding under Part 104. One commenter stated that the rule should clarify whether the agreementof the complainant and the respondent is necessary for Part 104 procedureto apply. If no person makes a timely election to proceed with a civilaction under section 810(o) of the Act, Part 104 will apply. The Departmenthas made minor revisions to the regulations to clarify this point. Paragraph (e) of the proposed rule provided that the General Counsel shallbe available for consultation concerning any legal issues raised by theAttorney General regarding how best to proceed in the event that commencementof a civil action would implicate Rule 11 of the Federal Rules of CivilProcedure. Numerous commenters claimed that paragraph (e) is unnecessary,serves no useful purpose, may be used by the Department of Justice (DOJ)to reduce its litigation caseload, is not required by statute, and shouldbe deleted. Following the reasonable cause determination and an election, the statuteprovides that the Attorney General shall commence and maintain a civilaction not later than 30 days from the election (section 810(o)). Whilewe believe that the need for such consultation will be infrequent, we donot believe that Congress intended to preclude the two Federal agenciesfrom discussing an appropriate method of proceeding in light of new relevantfactual information or court decisions. Allowing 20 days for the election,the Attorney General's complaint may be filed as many as 50 days followingthe issuance of the charge. During that time period, new facts may be discoveredor court decisions rendered which demonstrate that there is no reasonablecause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred oris about to occur. In such circumstances, it would be senseless for theAttorney General to institute a civil action. Under such circumstances,HUD will take such action as is necessary to supplement the investigativereport (see section 810(b)(5)(B) which provides that a final investigativereport may be amended if additional evidence is later discovered) and,if further evidence to support a finding is not developed, to void thereasonable cause determination <T3>ab initio. </T3>This procedure is designed for the sole purpose ofassuring that all civil actions are supportable at the time of filing and,in line with the intention of Congress, to ensure that the Secretary isthe official making the determination whether to proceed with a chargeor civil action. At the same time, the procedure helps to ensure that theSecretary will have the necessary information to make the required decision.Some commenters argued that the reference in paragraph (e) to Rule 11 ofthe Federal Rules of Civil Procedure is unnecessary. As discussed above,the purpose of the DOJ/HUD consultation is to examine new court decisionsand newly discovered evidence that are relevant to the reasonable causedetermination. While the Rule 11 standard might be implicated if a civilaction is filed where a new decision or evidence indicates a lack of abasis for a reasonable cause determination, HUD agrees that the specificreference to this rule of procedure should be excluded from the final rule.The final rule has been revised to emphasize that the General Counsel willbe available for ``consultation concerning any legal issues raised by theAttorney General as to how best to proceed in the event that a new courtdecision or newly discovered evidence is regarded as relevant to the reasonablecause determination.'' Several commenters argued that DOJ must publish regulations or make publicall proposed procedures for handling the civil actions authorized undersection 812(o). DOJ's procedures for pursuing such actions are beyond thejurisdiction of the Secretary, and thus not appropriate for addressingin this rule. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart G_Other Actions by the Department</ITAG>Section 103.500 Promptjudicial action.  Proposed andSection;103.500(a) provided: ``If at any time following the filingof a complaint, the General Counsel concludes that prompt judicial actionis necessary to carry out the purposes of Part 103 or Part 104, the GeneralCounsel will request that the Attorney General commence a civil actionfor appropriate temporary or preliminary relief pending the final dispositionof the complaint.''  One commenter objected to the language stating that the General Counselwould ``request'' the Attorney General to commence a civil action. Thecommenter argued that the language implies that following the request,it is within the Attorney General's discretion to file the civil action.The commenter noted that section 810(e) <T3>requires </T3>the Attorney General promptly to commence action afterthe Secretary <T3>authorizes </T3>the action. The statute does provide that when theSecretary authorizes the civil action, the Attorney General shall promptlycommence and maintain such action and the final rule has been revised totrack the statute.  Before making the determination to request such action, the proposed rulestated that the General Counsel would consult with the Assistant AttorneyGeneral for the Civil Rights Division. Commenters urged deletion of theconsultation requirement. Commenters argued that the provision: (1) Addstime-consuming steps to the process of seeking emergency relief; (2) isnot necessary, since HUD is free to consult with DOJ at any time; (3) willbe unnecessary when HUD acquires enforcement experience; and (4) is inconsistentwith the statute and with the legislative intent to provide the simplestand fastest method to obtain emergency relief for discrimination victims. The final rule is unchanged on this point. As noted above, once the generalCounsel issues the authorization, the Attorney General is <T3>required </T3>to commence and maintain the action. In light of thismandate, it is crucial that authorized civil actions are justified on boththe facts and the law. As noted in the preamble to the proposed rule, priorconsultation will ensure that the civil action can be maintained by providingHUD with access to DOJ's extensive experience in seeking relief in differentfactual situations and in different forums.  Commenters' fears that the consultation requirement will impede the processof obtaining temporary and preliminary relief are unfounded. The consultationenvisioned under this section will not be a time-consuming process. Rather,HUD and DOJ plan to consult through informal contacts between representative,of the two agencies. Moreover, HUD expects and intends that the conferenceswill expedite, rather than delay, proceedings by providing DOJ with importantbackground information in individual proceedings before the issuance ofan authorization and by providing DOJ with advance information concerningupcoming litigation. With such information, DOJ should be better preparedto act expeditiously to preserve the aggrieved person's rights when theauthorization is issued. To emphasize this point, andSection;103.500(a) hasbeen revised to provide that the purpose of the DOJ consultation is toensure the prompt initiation of the civil action.  Section 103.500(b), which implements section 810(e)(2) of the Act, hasbeen revised slightly to more closely reflect the statutory provision.Section 103.510 Other action by HUD.  Section 103.510 addresses other actions that HUD may take with respectto matters asserted in a complaint. A commenter felt that the proposedrule's list of proceedings that may be initiated under other civil rightsauthorities was incomplete. The commenter urged the addition of the AgeDiscrimination Act of 1975 (42 U.S.C. 6101) and Executive Order 12259.The final rule has been amended to add the Age Discrimination Act. Thecited executive order addresses HUD's authority to coordinate the fairhousing efforts of federal agencies, is not an enforcement authority, andhas not been added.<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 104_Administrative Proceedings Under Section 812 of the FairHousing Act</ITAG>Statutory limitations applicable to administrative procedures  In many instances, commenters suggested revisions to the proposed administrativeprocedures that cannot be adopted because they conflict with statutoryrequirements contained in the Fair Housing Act. The statutorily impermissiblesuggestions included:  1. The deletion of the provision contained in andSection;104.590(e) whichstates that HUD will pay witness fees and mileage if the party requestingthe issuance of the subpoena is unable to pay. Section 811(b) of the Actrequires HUD to pay the fees under such circumstances.  2. The increase or decrease of the amount of the ceiling on civil penaltiesthat may be awarded. Section 812(g)(3) provides for civil penalty ceilingsranging from $10,000 to $50,000. These ceilings are reflected in andSection;104.910(b)(3). 3. The deletion of provisions contained in andSection;104.940 requiring HUDto pay attorney's fees to the extent provided under the Equal Access toJustice Act (5 U.S.C. 504). Section 812(p) imposes this liability on theUnited States.  4. The reconciliation of the proposed deadline for a petition for reviewof the final decision in a United States Court of Appeals (30 days fromissuance of decision); and the date that findings of fact and the finaldecision become conclusive in connection with a petition for enforcement(45 days after the date of issuance of the decision, if no petition forreview is filed). These time periods are imposed under sections 812 (i)and (<T3>l</T3>) of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_General Information</ITAG>Section 104.20 Definitions  Section 104.20 contains the definitions used in Part 104. In addition tothe comments on definitions addressed above, a commenter urged HUD to defineseparately ``hearing'' and ``hearing on the record''. While ``hearing''is defined and used in Part 104, the phrase ``hearing on the record'' doesnot appear in the part. While the commenter noted that a civil action undersection 813 is barred after the commencement of ``a hearing of the record''by the ALJ (see 813(a)(3)), it is inappropriate to prescribe by HUD regulationthe limitations on the jurisdiction of the United States District Courtimposed under section 813 of the Act.Section 104.30 Computation of time.  Section 104.30 governs the computation of time periods. A commenter suggesteda clarification in andSection;104.30(a) to provide that the time computationsrelate only to filing and serving papers. The section is intended to applyto all computations of time (e.g., deadlines for the commencement of thehearing (andSection;104.700); issuance of the initial decision (andSection;104.910(d));and the notification of appropriate governmental entities following theissuance of the final decision (andSection;104.935(a)(2)). Accordingly, theproposed change has not been made.Section 104.40 Service and filing.  Section 104.40 requires the filing of all documents in Washington, DC.One commenter argued that this provision places a burden on the aggrievedperson, could have a chilling effect and is contrary to legislative intentto provide relief to persons in outlying areas. This commenter would reviseandSection;104.40(a) to require filing in Washington, DC until the AssistantSecretary designates local addresses for filing. While HUD intends to conductthe hearing at a place in the vicinity in which the discriminatory housingpractice is alleged to have occurred or to be about to occur (andSection;104.700),all other administrative functions will be performed at the Office of theAdministrative Law Judges in Washington, DC. Since service and filing canbe accomplished by mail, HUD does not believe that this requirement willimpose an undue burden on persons outside the Washington, DC area. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Administrative Law Judge</ITAG>Section 104.100 Designation.  Section 104.100 provides that a presiding ALJ for the proceeding shallbe appointed by HUD's Chief ALJ. One commenter argued that, consistentwith statutory intent for the expeditious handling of complaints, the rulesmust include procedures for the appointment of the presiding ALJ. HUD believesthat the deadlines for the commencement of the hearing are sufficient toensure the timely appointment of a presiding ALJ and that there is no needto impose a regulatory deadline for appointments by the presiding ALJ. The commenter also argued that the rules must prescribe the qualificationsfor ALJ. The qualifications for the appointment of ALJs are fully set forthin 5 U.S.C. 3105, which is specifically cited at andSection;104.100. Section104.100 is unchanged.Section 104.130 Ex parte communications.  Section 104.130 governs the prohibitions of <T3>ex parte </T3>communications. One commenter argued that the listedsanctions for <T3>ex parte </T3>communications are too harsh, particularly where an aggrievedperson is unrepresented by counsel and inadvertently makes an impropercontact. To remedy this problem, the commenter would delete the list ofsanctions from the regulations. This section places the decision to sanctionand the choice of sanctions within the sound discretion of the ALJ. Therule clearly provides that the listed sanctions are illustrative and thatthe ALJ may provide for other, more appropriate, sanctions.Section 104.140 Separation of functions.  Under andSection;104.140, no officer, employee or agent of the Federal governmentengaged in the performance of investigative, conciliatory, or prosecutorialfunctions in connection with the proceeding or any factually related proceedingunder Part 104 may participate or advise in the decision of the ALJ, exceptas witness or counsel during the proceedings. One commenter would revisethis section to provide that no officer, employee, or agent * * * may participateor advise in the decision of the ALJ, except as a witness or counsel <T3>to a party </T3>during the proceedings. Persons filing <T3>amicus </T3>briefs are not ``parties'' to the proceedings under andSection;104.200.The proposed change has not been made since it could have the effect ofprohibiting participation by such persons.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_Parties</ITAG>Section 104.200 In general.  Under andSection;104.200 the parties to the proceedings are HUD, the respondentnamed in the charge and against whom relief is sought, and any intervenors.In accordance with section 812(c) of the Act, the proposed rule permittedthe intervention by any aggrieved person. No other internvention is permittedin the proceedings, although briefs of amicus curiae may be permitted atthe discretion of the ALJ (andSection;104.200(a) and (c)).  Commenters objected to the proposed rules governing intervention. One commenternoted that the proposed rule would permit any potential complainant tointervene without regard to the relevance of his or her concerns in thecase. HUD agrees that the proposed rules governing intervention are toobroad and has revised this section to permit any aggrieved person to filea timely request for intervention (see discussion below on the timelinessof petitions for intervention). Intervention shall be permitted where theintervenor is the aggrieved person on whose behalf the charge is issued.Intervention shall also be permitted where the intervenor is an aggrievedperson who claims an interest relating to the property or transaction thatis the subject matter of the charge and the disposition of the action may,as a practical matter, impair or impede the aggrieved person's abilityto protect that interest, unless the aggrieved person's interest is adequatelyrepresented by the existing parties. The revised provisions are based onthe rules of intervention as of right under Rule 24 of the Federal Rulesof Civil Procedure.  The commenters also noted that the rule would not permit non-aggrievedpersons to intervene. The statute addresses intervention only by aggrievedpersons (see section 812(c)). HUD is reluctant to expand the classes ofpersons that may be permitted to intervene, particularly in light of thestatutory time limitations on the issuance of administrative decisions.HUD notes, however, that other persons may be permitted to submit briefsof amicus curiae under andSection;104.205(c).Section 104.210 Representation.  Section 104.210 governs representation of the parties. Under andSection;104.210(b)(5),parties may be represented by an attorney admitted to practice before aFederal Court or before the highest court in any State. One commenter wouldpermit representation only by attorneys who are admitted to practice beforea Federal Court. Attorneys in good standing before State or Federal courtsmay be sufficiently qualified to represent the parties in a Part 104 proceeding.It is unnecessary to limit the parties' choice of representatives as proposedby the commenter.  Under andSection;104.210(d). the attorney or other representative must filea written notice of intent before withdrawal from the proceeding. One commenterurged HUD to limit the representative's ability to withdraw. The rule doesnot prescribe such limitations. To the extent that the commenter fearsthat withdrawals may be used to delay the proceeding, we note that suchdilatory tactics would be prohibited under the standards of conduct (andSection;104.220).The commenter suggested that the rule require, at a minimum, service ofthe written notification of withdrawal on all parties. This service isalready required under andSection;104.40.One commenter argued that the regulations do not unambiguously providethat complainants may employ private counsel to represent their interestsin the administrative hearings, in addition to the representation providedby HUD. The regulations clearly provide that aggrieved persons may interveneas parties (andSection; 104.200(b)) and that parties may be represented bycounsel (andSection; 104.210(a)(5)). HUD does not believe that further clarificationis necessary.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Pleadings and motions</ITAG>Section 104.410 The charge.The requirements governing the filing, service and contents of the chargeare found at andSection; 104.410. Paragraph (b)(2) of this section refersto ``an election * * * to use the administrative procedure.'' A commenterobserved that the administrative procedure will be used if no electionis made to have the claim litigated in a civil action and may not be theresult of a deliberate election by the parties. The final rule has beenrevised to clarify this point.Section 104.430 Requests for intervention.Within 30 days after the service of the charge, any aggrieved person mayfile a request for intervention and participate as a party to the proceeding.No other intervention was permitted under the proposed rule. Commenterssuggested the revision of this section to permit intervention after theexpiration of the 30-day period.While the 1988 Amendments require the commencement of a hearing and theissuance of an initial decision within specified periods, the statute imposesno absolute deadline for intervention. To ensure that aggrieved personswill not be unnecessarily excluded from a proceeding, the final rule hasbeen amended to permit the filing of a timely request for interventionafter the 30-day period. In determining whether intervention will be permitted,the ALJ may consider such factors as: the progress of the litigation whenintervention is sought; the delay in seeking intervention and the reasonsfor the delay; and the prejudice to other parties if intervention is permitted.All requests for intervention submitted within 30 days of the filing ofthe complaint will be considered to be timely filed.Section 104.450 Motions.Section 104.450(b) states that any party may file an answer to a writtenmotion. Further responsive documents are prohibited, unless otherwise orderedby the ALJ. One commenter would clarify further that prohibited responsivedocuments would not include exhibits, memoranda, or briefs. The Departmentdoes not believe that it is necessary to list all types of responsive documentsthat would be excluded under this rule. The final rule is unchanged.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Discovery</ITAG>Section 104.500 DiscoverySection 104.500 contains the general provisions governing discovery. Paragraph(d) provides that the frequency and sequence of the discovery methods arenot limited, unless otherwise ordered by the ALJ or restricted under SubpartE. One commenter suggested that the final rule require that the ALJ holdan initial pretrial conference addressing discovery issues as a part ofthe prehearing procedures under Subpart G. At the pretrial conference,the parties would be required to describe the nature and amount of discoveryto be undertaken. The discovery plans would be reduced to a written orderand all discovery would be completed in accordance with the order. Thecommenter noted that this procedure is consistent with limitations on discoveryimposed in the United States District Courts.It is not necessary to provide a pretrial discovery conference and orderfor every proceeding. Where such a procedure is required to expedite theproceeding, however, a pretrial discovery conference may be conducted anda discovery order issued as a part of a prehearing conference under proposedandSection; 104.610. The final rule is unchanged on this point.Section 104.500(e) provides that all discovery must be completed 15 daysbefore the date scheduled for the hearing. A commenter argued that thisdate was too close to the hearing. As an alternative, the commenter suggestedthat the rule provide that all discovery be completed within 80 days ofthe issuance of the charge.The 15-day deadline was imposed to ensure that parties' final preparationfor hearing will not be interrupted by late-filed discovery requests, andHUD continues to believe that the 15-day time period is a sufficient buffer.The Department notes that the proposed 80-day deadline would not alwaysensure more uninterrupted time for trial preparation, since hearings maybe commenced at any time within 120 days following the issuance of thecharge.Several commenters noted that the proposed rule will not always permitdiscovery from a non-intervening aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaintwas filed and who is the real party in interest. The commenters arguedthat such persons should be required to comply with discovery requests(and that the results of this discovery should be admissible in the hearing)as if the aggrieved person were a party to the charge.Because the administrative decision will depend upon the course of dealingsbetween the respondent and the aggrieved person and the extent of damagewill depend upon the injury suffered by the aggrieved person, HUD believesthat it is appropriate to allow all forms of discovery to be used againstnonintervening aggrieved persons. Accordingly, the final rule includesa new andSection; 104.500(f) stating that for the purposes of obtaining discoveryfrom a non-intervening aggrieved person, the term ``party'' as used inthe subpart includes the aggrieved person on whose behalf the charge wasissued.Section 104.510 Depositions. Section 104.510 govern depositions upon oral examination and written interrogatories.At the request of a commenter, paragraph (d), which explains the proceduresand grounds for requesting suspension of a deposition, has been clarifiedto permit the suspension of a deposition for improper conduct in additionto improper questioning. (For example, a deposition may be suspended ifthe party makes improper objections or improper instructions to a witnessduring the deposition.)Section 104.520 Use of deposition at hearings.Section 104.520 governs the use of depositions at hearings. One commenterwould amend this provision to deny third parties the right to use informationcontained in depositions. The 1988 Amendments contemplate that the administrativeproceeding is a public proceeding. As such, HUD cannot preclude the useof information contained in the record of the proceeding. HUD notes, however,that the discovery of information and the use of discovered informationmay be limited in accordance with protective orders issued under andSection;andSection;104.570 and 104.740.Section 104.530 Interrogatories.The proposed rule permitted unlimited use of interrogatories. One commentersuggested that the number of interrogatories that may be served withoutan ALJ order should be limited to 20 interrogatories. A rule limiting thenumber of interrogatories is consistent with practice in Federal courtsand will force the parties to focus on pertinent issues when drafting interrogatories.HUD believes, however, that a 20-interrogatory limitation would undulyrestrict discovery under this section. As revised, andSection; 104.530 permitsa party to serve up to 30 interrogatories on any other party without anALJ order. Where necessary for full and complete discovery, the partiesare permitted to serve additional interrogatories with an ALJ order.Section 104.570 Protective orders.One commenter argued that the ALJ must narrow discovery to specific mattersraised by the complaint. Part 104 contemplates that discovery will be pursuedthrough the voluntary efforts of the parties and that the ALJ will intervenein the process only where it is necessary to protect a party or personfrom annoyance, embarrassment, oppression or undue burden or expense. Wherenecessary to protect the person or party, the ALJ may issue an appropriateprotective order directing that certain irrelevant matters may not be thesubject of discovery (see andSection; 104.570(d)). Section 104.580 Failure to make or cooperate in discovery.Section 104.580 governs motions to compel discovery and the impositionof sanctions. One commenter requested the deletion of andSection; 104.580(d)(1),which permits an inference to be drawn in favor of a requesting party ifanother party fails to comply with a discovery order issued by the ALJ.The cited provision provides the ALJ with an effective method of compellingcompliance with orders by parties or persons who unjustifiably resist discovery.It is retained in the final rule. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Subpoenas</ITAG>Section 104.590 Subpoenas.Section 104.590 provides for the issuance of subpoenas in aid of administrativehearings. Paragraph (f) of the proposed rule addressed motions to quashor limit subpoenas. One commenter argued that all evidence must be allowedinto discovery and urged the deletion of this provision. While Part 104is designed to permit the discovery of any matter, not privileged, thatis relevant to the subject matter involved in the proceeding, andSection;104.590 recognizes that there may be occasions where a subpoena shouldbe quashed because it is unreasonable and oppressive or for other goodcause, or where the subpoena should be conditioned upon the discoveringparty's advancing the reasonable cost of producing subpoenaed books, papersor documents. The proposed provision is retained. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart G_Prehearing procedures</ITAG>Subpart G governs prehearing statements (andSection; 104.600); prehearingconferences (andSection; 104.610); and settlement negotiations before a settlementjudge (andSection; 104.620). Except for comments addressing the additionof a discovery conference discussed above, no commenters addressed thissubpart. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart H_Hearing Procedures </ITAG>Section 104.720 Waiver of rightto appear.Section 104.720 permits the parties to waive the right to an oral hearingand present the matter for decision on a written record. Commenters urgedthe revision of this section to prohibit waiver unless non-party aggrievedpersons agree to the waiver. Alternatively, the commenters would providenotice of the proposed waiver to non-party aggrieved persons and wouldpermit such persons to intervene within 15 days of the notice. Those aggrieved persons interested in participating in the proceeding asan intervenor and controlling the procedural conduct of the litigationas a party are permitted to intervene of right (aggrieved persons on whosebehalf the charge is issued) or by permission of the ALJ (other aggrievedpersons). Where such persons have not filed timely requests for intervention,or where their interest is not sufficient to justify intervention, HUDdoes not believe that any purpose would be served by a regulation permittingthe person the right to control the conduct of selected aspects of theproceeding. Part 104 was drafted with the expectation that the HUD representative,in the absence of intervention by the aggrieved person on whose behalfthe charge is issued, will keep that person informed of the course of theproceedings where necessary for the proper disposition of the charge. Therefore,provision for notification to such persons of this procedural step is notmandated by the rules. Section 104.740 In camera and protective orders. Section 104.740, which governs in camera inspections and protective orderscontains a minor editorial revision suggested by commenters. Section 104.750 Exhibits.Section 104.750 provides for the prehearing exchange of exhibits to beoffered into evidence. One commenter noted that some parties may attemptto use the requirement for the prehearing exchange of exhibits to preventthe use of rebuttal exhibits that have not been exchanged. At the requestof the commenter, HUD has revised this section to exclude unanticipatedrebuttal exhibits from the exchange requirement.Section 104.760 Authenticity.At the request of a commenter, andSection; 104.760 has been clarified tostate that the authenticity of all documents submitted ``<T3>and furnished to the parties as required under andSection; 104.750</T3>''as proposed exhibits in advance of the hearing shall be admitted. Section 104.780 Record of hearing.Under andSection; 104.780, all oral hearings must be recorded and transcribedby a reporter designated by and under the supervision of the ALJ. One commenterobserved that this section requires all hearings to be transcribed andargued that this requirement will be expensive. The commenter recommendedthat this section be revised to require transcripts only if requested bya party or an aggrieved party, or ordered by the ALJ. HUD believes thatthe provision of a transcript is necessary for the full and complete recordin the case and to ensure the adequate review of the proceeding by theSecretary under andSection; 104.930, and by the courts under section 812(i),and to permit court enforcement of the Administrative order under section812(j).<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart I_Dismissals and Decisions</ITAG>Section 104.900 Dismissal.Under andSection; 104.900, the ALJ is required to dismiss the proceeding:_Where the complainant, the respondent or the aggrieved person on whosebehalf the complaint was filed makes a timely election to have the claimsasserted in the charge decided in a civil action under section 812(o) ofthe Act (see andSection;104.900(a)); or_Where an aggrieved person has commenced a civil action under an Act ofCongress or a State law seeking relief with respect to the discriminatoryhousing practice and the trial of the civil action has commenced. The commencementof a civil action for appropriate temporary or preliminary relief undersection 810(e) or proceedings for such relief under section 813 of theFair Housing Act do not affect administrative proceedings under Part 104.(see andSection; 104.900(b)). At the suggestion of a commenter, this provisionhas been clarified to provide that the administrative proceeding will notbe affected by such proceedings as a hearing on the temporary or preliminaryrelief or the issuance of a decision or order granting or denying suchrelief.One commenter noted that Part 104 procedures are applicable where the respondentand the aggrieved person do not act (<T3>i.e.,</T3> neither the respondent nor the aggrieved person elects thecivil remedy). The commenter argued that Part 104 should include a procedurefor an ALJ order by default. Even though the aggrieved person and the respondentmay choose not to participate actively in a case, HUD`s representativewill be required to present sufficient evidence to make a <T3>prima facie</T3> case that a discriminatory housing practice has occurredor is about to occur. Accordingly, there are no provisions for defaultin the regulation.Section 104.910 Initial decision of administrative law judge.Under andSection; 104.910, if the ALJ determines that the respondent hasengaged, or is about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice, theALJ is required to issue an initial decision against the respondent andto order appropriate relief including damages; injunctive or other equitablerelief; and civil penalties. The following issues were raised regardingrelief.<T3>Injunctive or such other equitable relief.</T3> Under proposed andSection;104.910(b)(2) the ALJ may impose injunctive or such other equitable reliefas may be appropriate. One commenter argued that the regulations shoulddiscuss the types of affirmative relief (e.g., the posting of fair housingposters) that may be ordered by the ALJ. Given the range of affirmativeremedial activities that may be accorded to overcome discriminatory housingpractices, HUD believes that it would be counterproductive to undertakea listing of all types of such relief under this section.The proposed rule provides that no order for injunctive or other reliefmay affect any contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummated beforethe issuance of the initial decision that involves a <T3>bona fide</T3> purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant without actual knowledgeof the charge.Commenters noted that a considerable amount of the time may elapse betweenthe filing of the complaint and the issuance of the charge, and from theissuance of the charge to the issuance of the initial decision. They arguedthat the regulations do not provide a mechanism for providing third partieswith notice that a complaint or charge has been filed. They charged thatthe failure to include such requirements threatens the efficacy of theequitable relief provisions. Commenters asserted that a respondent seekingto avoid the injunctive or other equitable relief will have sufficienttime to contract for the sale, encumbrance or lease to another during thisperiod. The commenters suggested the addition of provisions requiring therespondent to give actual notice to such persons. Alternatively, commenterssuggested that the rule provide that, simultaneously with the issuanceof the charge, the Secretary will exercise the authority under section810(e) to secure an injunction which preserves the status of all propertyidentified in the charge until final resolution of the charge.HUD agrees that the proposed rule did not adequately address this issue.To remedy this problem, the final rule requires the respondent to giveactual notice to third parties with whom the respondent engages in a contract,sale, encumbrance, or lease involving the property that is the subjectof the charge. The copy of the charge would be provided before the respondentand the third party enter into the contract, sale, encumbrance or lease.Commenters also recommended that the final rule should provide that thefailure to give the notice would constitute a separate discriminatory housingpractice. HUD does not believe that such actions constitute an actionablediscriminatory housing practice. This change has not been made.Some commenters suggested that the respondent be required to provide thenotice to third parties following the issuance of the charge while otherswould require notice following the filing of the complaint. Section 812(g)(4)provides that no order shall affect the described transactions consummatedbefore the order and involving a third party without actual notice of the<T3>charge.</T3> Accordingly, the notice will be required only after theissuance of the charge. The proposed change is included at andSection;104.410(b)(3).<T3>Civil penalties.</T3> Under andSection; 104.910(b)(3), the ALJ may assessa civil penalty against the respondent. The amount of the civil penaltyis subject to ceilings of $10,000 to $50,000. The ceiling will depend onthe number of previous discriminatory housing practices the respondenthas been adjudged to have committed within designated time periods in anyadministrative hearing or civil action permitted under the Fair HousingAct or any State or local fair housing law, or in any licensing or regulatoryproceeding conducted by a Federal, State or local governmental agency.Under the proposed rule, if the ALJ determines that more than one respondenthas been engaged or is about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice,the ALJ would be permitted to assess the civil penalty, up to the maximumpermitted under the rule, against each respondent. One commenter arguedthat this provision penalizes the respondent who has not committed a prioract, simply for an association with another respondent that has committedsuch act. The commenter alleged that such a penalty is unfair. This sectionwas intended to address civil penalties where multiple respondents areinvolved and to permit the ALJ to assess a civil penalty against each respondent.The section has been revised for clarity.Section 104.925 Resolution of the charge.The resolution of the charge prior to the issuance of a final decisionby the ALJ is addressed in andSection; 104.925. Commenters argued that theproposed language does not account for the possibility that some, but notall, of the aggrieved persons of whose behalf the charge is issued mayagree to resolve the charge. The final rule has been revised to providefor such resolutions.Section 104.930 Final decision.Section 104.930 permits the Secretary to review the ALJ's initial decisionand issue a final decision. The Secretary may affirm, modify or set aside,in whole or in part, the initial decision, or remand the initial decisionfor further proceedings. If no final decision is issued by the Secretarywithin 30 days after the initial decision, the initial decision of theALJ would become the final decision of the Department.The proposed rule does not place any time limitation for issuance of theALJ decision on remand. Commenters claimed that this omission creates thepossibility for substantial delay in decisionmaking which is contrary tothe congressional goals of assuring expedited processing. The regulationhas been revised to state that the ALJ is required to issue the decisionon remand within 60 days of the date of issuance of the Secretary's decision,unless it is impracticable to do so. If the ALJ is unable to issue sucha decision on remand within this time period (or within any succeeding60-day period following the initial 60-day period), the ALJ is requiredto notify all parties and the aggrieved person on whose behalf the chargewas filed in writing of the reasons for the delay. This approach is consistentwith section 812(g)(2) of the Act. All remanded proceedings will be conductedin accordance with the requirements of Part 104.Section 812(h) provides that the Secretary may review any finding, conclusionor order issued by the ALJ. In accordance with this section, the finalrule has not been revised to include a standard for Secretarial reviewof the initial decision, as suggested by one commenter.Section 104.940 Attorney's fees and costs.Several commenters addressed andSection; 104.940, which provides for therecovery of fees and costs. While some commenters argued that the rulesregarding attorney's fees and costs were proper and identical to thosegoverning the Federal courts, others argued that the specificity of thissection was unnecessary.HUD continues to believe that the regulation should provide some regulatorydirection concerning the amount of attorney's fees that may be awarded.There appears to be no specific objection to andSection; 104.940(b)(1) whichgoverns the payment of attorney's fees by HUD to the respondent (see section812(p) which makes the Equal Access to Justice Act applicable to such payments)or to andSection; 104.940(b)(2) which states that intervenors should be liableto the respondent for reasonable attorney's fees only to the extent thatthe intervenor's participation in the administrative proceeding was frivolousor vexatious, or was for the purposes of harassment. (see<T3> Hughes v. Rowe,</T3> 449 U.S. 5, 11 (1980) and <T3>Christianberg Garment Co. v. E.E.O.C.,</T3> 434 U.S. 412, 422 (1978)).Numerous commenters raised the issue of the appropriate standard for therecovery of attorney's fees by prevailing intervenors. The Act providesin section 812(p) that the ALJ or the court may allow the prevailing partya reasonable attorney's fee. That statutory direction is applicable toprevailing intervenors. This entitlement to fees is identical to that providedin a private enforcement action under section 813 and an enforcement actionby the Attorney General under section 814. The Department believes thatsuch factors as the appropriateness, necessity and effectiveness of anywork performed by a prevailing party are among the factors relevant tothe factual determination by an ALJ or court as to whether or what amountof attorney's fees are ``reasonable''. Similarly, the issue of whetherthe amount of fees sought by a prevailing party is reasonable given theparticiption of federal attorneys is a question of fact to be determinedby the ALJ or the court. Accordingly, the rule is unchanged.<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 106_Fair Housing Administrative Meetings Under Title VIII ofthe Civil Rights Act of 1968</ITAG>Part 106 establishes procedures for public meetings or conferences to gatherinformation to assist the Assistant Secretary in achieving the aims ofthe Fair Housing Act for the promotion and assurance of equal housing opportunityunder the Fair Housing Act. No substantive comments were received on theproposed part. It is adopted without change.<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 109_Fair Housing Advertising</ITAG>The Fair Housing Advertising Regulations (Part 109) are being revised toreflect the expansion of the classes of persons protected under the FairHousing Act from discriminatory advertising.GeneralThe purpose of the HUD Fair Housing Advertising Regulations is to assistall advertising media, advertising agencies and advertisers in complyingwith the requirements of the Fair Housing Act with respect to advertisementsfor the sale, rental or financing of housing. These regulations also describethe matters which the Department will consider in evaluating compliancewith the Fair Housing Act in connection with the investigation of complaintsalleging discrimination in advertising.Section 804(c) of the Fair Housing Act has been amended to expand the prohibitionsor discrimination in advertising for the sale or rental of a dwelling.The amendment added ``handicap'' and ``familial status'' to the existingprohibitions of discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, sex,or national origin.The Department is revising the Fair Housing Advertising Regulations toreflect the expanded coverage of the Fair Housing Act with respect to discriminationin advertising. Following is a section-by-section description of the changesmade in Part 109.Section 109.5 Policy.This section describes the statutory provisions on which the Fair HousingAdvertising Regulations are based. The two new protected coverages of theamended statute_``handicap'' and ``familial status''_have been added intwo places to the existing list of bases on which discrimination is prohibited.In addition, a reference to appraisal services has been inserted in thelist of discriminatory practices specifically made unlawful under the FairHousing Act. Because of the exemption in section 807(b) of the Fair HousingAct for ``housing for older persons'', a sentence has been added to andSection;109.5 to explain that the prohibitions of the act regarding familial statusdo not apply with respect to such housing.In addition, references to Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 havebeen changed to the new short title of the statute, the ``Fair HousingAct'', both in this section and throughout the regulations.Section 109.10 Purpose.The Department has made only editorial changes in this section.Section 109.15 Definitions.This section contains definitions of the major terms used in Part 109.The Department has added definitions of the terms ``handicap'' and ``familialstatus'' in paragraphs (h) and (i), respectively. These new definitionsare the same as the definitions contained in the Fair Housing Act. In addition,the definition of ``Secretary'' has been eliminated since the term is notused in the regulations, a definition of ``General Counsel'' has been added,and the definitions of ``person'' and ``discriminatory housing practice''have been revised to reflect statutory changes.Section 109.16 Scope.This section explains the use of the criteria contained in Part 109 bythe Department with regard to action on complaints alleging discriminatoryadvertising with respect to advertising media and persons placing advertisements.The Department has made changes in the introductory language of paragraph(a) and in the language of paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) to reflect thechanges in complaint processing brought about by the Fair Housing Act amendments.Under the new procedure, the General Counsel will make determinations asto whether there is reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatory housingpractice has occurred or is about to occur. Thus, andSection; 109.16 wouldindicate that the General Counsel will consider the use or the failureto use the criteria in this part in making a determination of reasonablecause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred oris about to occur.Section 109.20 Use of words, phrases, symbols, and visual aids.Several commenters objected to the statement in the first sentence of proposedandSection; 109.20 that the words, phrases, symbols, and forms set forthin this section have been used in advertising to ``convey either overtor tacit discriminatory intent'' and that therefore their use should beavoided, because that statement appears to focus solely on the intent thatmay lie behind discriminatory real estate advertising. The Department agreesthat the language, which was already contained in andSection; 109.20, couldbe construed as a limitation on the types of activities considered to constituteunlawful conduct. Since the Department wishes to maintain a neutral positionon the issue of whether discriminatory intent is necessary for advertisingto be considered violative of the Fair Housing Act, the statement has beenrevised. In addition, similar revisions have been made in andSection; 109.20(e)and (f). These revisions also make it clear that this regulation does notprohibit the use of any of the words, phrases, symbols or visual aids inthis section, but instead is intended to suggest that the use of such words,phrases and symbols can indicate a preference in particular contexts.The undesignated introductory paragraph in andSection; 109.20 has also beenrevised to state that the Department will consider whether, in a particularcase, there is a need for ``further proceedings on'' the complaint, ratherthan a need for ``seeking resolution of'' the complaint. This change reflectsthe new complaint processing procedures under the amended act.In paragraph (a), which provides examples of words descriptive of dwelling,landlord, and tenants which should not be used in advertising, the Departmenthas added the phrase ``adult building''.In paragraph (b), which lists examples of words indicative of persons inthe protected groups covered by the Fair Housing Act, the Department hasadded specific provisions on words relating to handicap and familial status.In paragraph (b)(6), the rule provides that nothing in Part 109 restrictsthe inclusion of information about the availability of accessible housingin advertising of dwellings. In paragraph (b)(7), concerning familial status,the Department has included a statement making it clear that nothing inPart 109 would restrict advertisements of dwellings which are intendedand operated for occupancy by older persons and which constitute ``housingfor older persons'' as defined in section 807(b) of the Fair Housing Act.In addition, paragraph (b)(8) has been revised and the word ``exclusive''has been substituted for the words ``ghetto'' and ``disadvantaged''.In paragraphs (c) and (d), the words ``handicap'' and familial status''have been added to the list of protected groups.With regard to paragraph (e), one commenter expressed doubt that directionsto real estate could imply a discriminatory preference. However, it hasbeen the Department's experience that references to real estate locationin terms of landmarks significant with respect to race, national originor religion may indicate a preference to certain homeseekers or conveya negative implication to others. Accordingly, this paragraph has not beenchanged.Section 109.25 Selective use of advertising media or content.This section indicates examples of how the selective use of advertisingmedia or content can be used exclusively with respect to particular housingdevelopments or sites, with discriminatory results.In paragraph (c), which concerns selective use of human models when conductingan advertising campaign, the Department has made changes in the last twosentences of the paragraph to provide an example of selective advertisingwith respect to familial status.Section 109.30 Fair housing policy and practices.This section discusses actions that advertisers can take which would beconsidered as evidence of compliance with the prohibitions against discriminationin advertising under the Fair Housing Act.The Department has added the words ``handicap'' and ``familial status''where appropriate in paragraphs (a) and (b). In addition, the Departmenthas added language in paragraph (b), concerning use of human models, toindicate that models used in display advertising should represent familieswith children, when appropriate, as well as both majority and minoritygroups in the metropolitan area and both sexes.Two commenters suggested that paragraph (a) be revised to provide thatuse of the equal housing opportunity logotype, without more, would be sufficientto indicate compliance with the advertising provisions of the Fair HousingAct. However, the use of the logotype (or the equal housing opportunitystatement or slogan) is only one indication of compliance, and such usewould not preclude the use, in the same advertisement, or words, phrases,symbols, or forms which convey a discriminatory preference or limitation(see andSection; 109.20). Accordingly, suggested change has not been made.Minor editorial changes have been made in paragraphs (c) and (d) of andSection;109.30. Appendix to Part 109 The appendix to Part 109 contains three tables intended to serve as a guidefor the use of the Equal Housing Opportunity logotype, statement, slogan,and publisher's notice for advertising. The Department has added the words``handicap'' and ``familial status'' where appropriate in the three tables.<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 110_Fair Housing Poster </ITAG>Part 110 sets forth the procedures established by the Secretary of Housingand Urban Development with respect to the display of a fair housing posterby persons subject to sections 804 through 806 of the Fair Housing Act.The Department has amended Part 110 to reflect the changes made by theFair Housing Amendments Act of 1988. The major changes in the poster regulationsare in andSection; 110.25, Description of Posters. The legend of the posterhas been revised to add ``handicap'' and ``familial status'' to the basesof illegal discriminatory acts. The legend has also been revised to showthat discrimination in the appraising of housing is illegal. In additionto the above amendments, editorial modification has been made for clarificationpurposes and for consistency in terminology.<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 115_Recognition of Jurisdictions With Substantially EquivalentLaws </ITAG>Part 115 has been revised to comply with the requirements of the Fair HousingAct. This part: (1) Provides a revised process for certifying agenciesas substantially equivalent in place of the recognition process as providedin the current Part 115; (2) defines the requirements for certificationwith the specificity required by the Act; (3) defines the effect of theAct on agencies recognized on September 12, 1988 as substantially equivalentunder current Part 115; (4) requires that in order to become certified,agencies must provide protection against discrimination based on ``handicap''and ``familial status''; and (5) provides a prohibition against coercion,intimidation and threats. To obtain certification State and local agencies must administer laws whichprohibit all discriminatory housing practices which are prohibited by theAct and must include as protected classes all classes protected by theAct. Discrimination on the basis of handicap is described in the statutorylanguage and only those provisions of section 804 (f) of the Act whichclearly do not apply to State or local agencies may be omitted from thelaw or ordinance the agency administers if certification is to be granted.Further, the remedies available to a certified agency must be substantiallyequivalent to the remedies available under the Act. Final agency actionsmust be subject to judicial review and aggrieved persons must have theright of access to a State or local court. The Act also requires that theprocedures followed by a certified agency be shown to be substantiallyequivalent to those created by the Act. Such procedures as: Filing of complaintsby the agency; acknowledgment of receipt of complaints and notice of proceduralrights and obligations, completion of investigation and investigative reportwithin 100 days and notice of cause for delay; provision for conciliationand a conciliation agreement which shall be made public under certain conditions;were provided as examples of procedural matters which must be includedin the law or ordinance administered by a certified agency. The regulations require that the law or ordinance provide for resolutionof a complaint by a body empowered to grant relief substantially equivalentto the relief which may be granted by the Secretary under the Act. The Department received a number of comments. These comments can be dividedinto five major categories: (1) Should procedures in Fair Housing lawsof States and localities be required to mirror the Fair Housing Act ratherthan be ``substantially equivalent'' to the Act; (2) Should an agency becertified which protects less than all of the classes protected by theAct; (3) Should building codes and other laws or ordinances administeredby State or local agencies other than the agency administering the fairhousing law be considered in determining the adequacy of the law; (4) ShouldState or local fair housing laws be required to include an exemption fromdiscrimination based on familial status for housing of the elderly; and(5) Should State and local agency enforcement mechanisms be required tobe substantially equivalent to the Act. Significant comments in these areaswere focused principally on andSection;andSection; 115.3 and 115.3a of theproposed rule. It appears that many commenters misunderstood the requirements in andSection;115.3(e) for a determination that a State or local law ``on its face''satisfies the criteria for certification, indicating that they believedthe ordinance or law standing alone must meet the criteria. Both the preambleand the proposed rule indicate that a determination as to whether a Stateor local law ``on its face'' is adequate, is not limited to an analysisof the literal text of the law but must take into account regulations,directives and rules of procedure of a State or local agency, as well asother relevant matters of State or local law or interpretations by competentauthorities. However, in order to avoid any possible confusion as to matterswhich will be considered as part of a determination of the adequacy ofa law ``on its face,'' andSection; 115.3(e) has been clarified by substitutingthe word ``all'' for the word ``such'' in the second sentence thereof.Procedures for Investigations Several commenters suggested that time limits, provisions for notices tocomplainants and respondents and similar procedural criteria are inappropriate,burdensome and may require substantial amendments to current laws or ordinances.Under section 804(f)(3)(A) the Secretary is required to determine thatthe procedures followed by an agency administering a fair housing law aresubstantially equivalent to those in the Act. The Department believes theprocedural aspects which were contained in the proposed rule are essentialto providing adequate procedural protections to persons and that the absenceof such protections would substantially weaken a fair housing law. Theserequirements have been retained in the rule. A number of commenters objected to the requirement that investigationsbe commenced within 30 days of the filing of a complaint and that the processingof such complaints be completed within one year of filing. Both the Actand the regulations refer to commencement of proceedings within 30 daysof filing. The proposed regulations do not refer to a date for commencementof the investigation, and requiring that the disposition of the complaintbe completed within one year of filing of the complaint is reasonable.Protected Classes A number of commenters urged that the final rule provide that State andlocal fair housing laws should be eligible for certification even thoughthey do not include coverage of the new classes of persons protected bythe Act, if they meet all other requirements for recognition. Some commenterssuggested in the alternative that certification should be permitted basedon protections of a certain number of protected classes (e.g. coveragefor five or six of the seven protected classes). The Department believes that the legislative history of the Fair HousingAct supports the position in the proposed regulation that coverage of allprotected classes is essential to a substantial equivalency certification.In connection with the inclusion in section 810(f) of the Act of a provisionrelating to the grandfathering of substantially equivalent agencies, theHouse Judiciary Committee Report on the Fair Housing Amendments Act describedthe process as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Presently, there are 36 states and 76 local agencies certified bythe Secretary as substantially equivalent under existing federal law. Manyof these states provide for some degree of administrative enforcement,as well as protecting handicapped persons and families with children. TheCommittee expects that many states will be able to maintain their substantialequivalency status within the time period provided.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In order to provide a reasonable transition period for states to adjustto the new law, agencies currently certified on the day before the dateof enactment will continue to remain certified for 40 months. This allowsmost jurisdictions sufficient time to conform their laws to the new federalstandards so that they may remain certified. The Committee recognizes thatsome jurisdictions may need additional time because of the infrequencyof legislative sessions, and the Secretary may grant an additional 8 monthsfor this purpose. Report p. 35.</ITAG>Thus, it appears clear that Congress intended to provide grandfatheredagencies time to broaden their protections to encompass the new protectedclasses. For this reason the final regulation retains the requirement thatState and local laws provide protection to all the classes of persons protectedunder the Federal law.Enforcement ProceduresComments that the proposed regulations unreasonably require certified agenciesto amend their laws to provide relief which they are currently not authorizedto grant appear to be objections to the Act rather than to the regulations.The Fair Housing Amendments Act put ``teeth'' into the fair housing law.It grants the Department authority to take action against those who commitacts made unlawful by the Fair Housing Act. Consequently, those agenciesto which the Department must refer complaints must administer laws whichprovide the State or local agency with the same authority to take actionagainst those who commit unlawful acts.Some commenters in this area insisted that agencies be required to providefor administrative judges and alternative choices_administrative tribunalor civil court_by either complainant or respondent as well as an independentright to go immediately to civil court. We believe it is sufficient thata certified agency be authorized to obtain relief by whatever procedureits law or ordinance provides as long as those procedures provide rightsand protections substantially equivalent to those in the Fair Housing Act.This articulation recognizes that it is possible that agencies will beauthorized to provide more effective relief on behalf of aggrieved personsthrough judicial enforcement mechanisms, which are no more burdensome oncomplainants, without any administrative enforcement procedure. Under thefinal rule States and localities are permitted to provide such judicialenforcement mechanisms as an alternative to an administrative enforcement_civilaction mechanism such as that in the Fair Housing Act.Building CodesSeveral commenters indicated that incorporating into the certificationprocedures a requirement that States and localities provide accessibilityrequirements for new construction which are substantially equivalent tosection 804(f) of the Act was onerous and inconsistent with State and localfair housing enforcement procedures. These commenters pointed out thatbuilding code ordinances and mechanisms are not part of fair housing enforcementin most areas and that generally, enforcement of requirements is not handledin the same manner as fair housing cases. These commenters suggested thatthe requirement in andSection; 115.3a(b)(3) be deleted.The Department is aware that enactment of accessibility requirements willin some cases present problems for States and localities. However, theDepartment believes that the legislative history of the Act and particularlythe discussion of the importance of the involvement of States and localitiesin the implementation of new construction accessibility requirements inthe Statement of Managers in the Senate, 134 Cong. Rec. S10456 (daily ed.Aug. 1, 1988) supports the determination of the Department to require localconstruction requirements as part of the HUD certification process.Protection against housing discrimination because of handicap includingaccessibility requirements has been made a part of the Fair Housing Actand must be a part of a fair housing act of a State or locality which obtainscertification. A certified agency must have authority and responsibilityto receive and process complaints of discrimination based on handicap includingcomplaints of violations of the accessibility standards.Housing for Older PersonsThe Fair Housing Act exempts from the familial status provisions certainhousing for older persons. This exemption reflects the unique status ofhousing for older persons described in the House Report on the Fair HousingAmendments Act:<ITAG tagnum="21">The bill specifically exempts housing for older persons. The Committeerecognizes that some older Americans have chosen to live together withfellow senior citizens in retirement-type communities. The Committee appreciatesthe interest and expectation these individuals have in living in environmentstailored to their specific needs. (Report p. 21).</ITAG>The Act delineates with specificity the nature of housing for older personswhich is exempt from the prohibitions against discrimination because offamilial status. In the proposed rule, the department indicated that itintended to require that the State or local law assure that no prohibitionbased on familial status applies to housing for older persons as a conditionfor certification. The preamble noted that, while HUD had not previouslyrequired States or localities to include in their laws or ordinances anyexceptions or exemptions which the Federal law contains, in view of theCongressional concern that the prohibitions against discrimination becauseof familial status not impinge on housing for older persons, provisionsproviding for housing for older persons should be required in State orlocal fair housing laws.Many commenters objected to the requirement that certified agencies administera fair housing law which provides the same protections for housing forolder persons as those contained in the Fair Housing Act. Some commenterspointed out that as a result of the proposed requirement their fair housinglaws would have to be amended to limit existing protections for familieswith children in order to obtain certification.While the Department believes that Congress intended to promote housingopportunities to address the needs of older persons, there is nothing inthe statute or legislative history to indicate that Congress sought tolimit the ability of States and localities to provide additional protections.For this reason, the final rule has been revised to delete the requirementfor an exemption for housing for older persons in State or local laws.However, in order to reflect the congressional interest in the protectionof housing opportunities for older persons, the final rule specificallyindicates that State and local fair housing laws may include an exemptionfor housing for older persons. This provision is intended to encourageStates and localities to consider the needs of older persons in connectionwith the development of fair housing laws.In addition to the above comments some commenters objected to the provisionthat certified agencies administer a law requiring that conciliation agreementsbe made public. (Section 115.3(a)(2)(vi)).The Department is aware that there are strong arguments for and againstdisclosure of conciliation agreements. However, Congress has chosen torequire such disclosure (The Fair Housing Act (Sec. 810(b)(4))). Uniformityof procedures, in this regard, followed by the Department and certifiedagencies is preferable to dissimilar practices from State to State andlocality to locality. Both complainants and respondents will have the knowledgethat no matter the location of the discriminatory housing practice resultingin a Title VIII complaint, any conciliation agreement arising out of conciliationengaged in by the Department or any certified agency will be governed bythe same disclosure rules.Finally, in order to provide consistency in connection with State and localenforcement procedures, andSection; 115.3(b)(1)(iv) has been amended to clarifythat a certified agency must have authority to seek injunctive or otherequitable relief in a court of competent jurisdiction, as an alternativeto the stated authority to grant such relief. This change allows the agencyan alternative similar to the alternatives provided in andSection; 115.3(b)(1)(iii) and (v).<ITAG tagnum="84">Part 121_Collection of Data</ITAG>The Department is recodifying 24 CFR Part 100, entitled ``Racial, Sex,and Ethnic Data'', as a new Part 121 of Title 24. Part 100 was originallyadopted in 1971 under the heading ``Racial and Ethnic Data'', to enablethe Secretary of Housing and Urban Development to obtain information concerningminority-group identification to assist the Secretary in carrying out responsibilityfor administering the national policies prohibiting discrimination andproviding for fair housing. In 1975, in light of the 1974 amendment ofTitle VIII to prohibit discrimination on the basis of sex, Part 100 wasamended to provide for obtaining information on sex, as well as minority-group,identification.Section 562 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (Pub.L. 100-242, approved February 5, 1988) requires the Secretary of Housingand Urban Development to collect data on the racial and ethnic characteristicsof persons eligible for, assisted, or otherwise benefitting under eachcommunity development, housing assistance, and mortgage and loan insuranceand guarantee program administered by the Secretary, and to include a summaryand evaluation of such data in the Secretary's annual report to the Congress.Section 808(e)(6) of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3608(e)(6), as addedby section 7(b)(1)(D) of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, requiresthe Secretary to collect data on the race, color, religion, sex, nationalorigin, age, handicap and family characteristics of persons and householdswho are applicants for, participants in, or beneficiaries or potentialbeneficiaries of, programs administered by the Department, to the extentthat such persons and households are within the coverage of the civil rightslaws and executive orders referred to in section 808(f) of the Fair HousingAct or specified by the Secretary by publication in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and to the extent that the Secretary determinesthe data to be necessary or appropriate.Since Part 100 is now being used for regulations setting forth the coverageof the Fair Housing Act, the regulations concerning collection of datahave been moved to a new Part 121_Collection of Data. The Department proposeda revision of the provisions contained in the old Part 100 to provide amore specific regulatory framework for the Secretary to use in carryingout the new data collection and reporting responsibilities mandated bythe legislation described above.A number of commenters asserted that the Department has had authority forsome time to collect the types of data which are needed for reporting toCongress but that it has failed to generate such data. These commentersoffered various suggestions for the restructuring of Part 121 to accomplishthat purpose.The Department does not believe that any restructuring of Part 121 is necessary.The language of proposed andSection; 121.2 was drawn largely from that containedin section 808(e)(6) of the Fair Housing Act, described above, to enableHUD to meet the responsibilities mandated by that legislation. HUD remainscommitted to that objective and believes that the provisions of Part 121,as proposed, will enable HUD to achieve that purpose.Accordingly, the Department has adopted Part 121 in this final rule withno changes from the proposed rule.Legislative review issuesA number of commenters, including members of the Banking Committees ofthe House and Senate and two leading Senate Judiciary Committee proponentsof the Fair Housing Amendments Act, asserted that the Department violatedsection 7(o) of the Department of HUD Act_HUD's legislative review statute_byfailing to supply the Banking Committees with copies of HUD's proposedrule for 15 session days before the rule's publication.Aside from the substantial constitutional question whether the section7(o) rule-request process is valid and enforceable against HUD (See <T3>INS</T3> v. <T3>Chadha,</T3> 462 U.S. 910 (1983)), HUD had <T3>no duty</T3> to submit this rule for prepublication review for tworeasons, either of which is dispositive:_the explicit direction contained in the Fair Housing Amendments Act regardingpublication of rules for comment, and for effect within 180 days of enactment,coupled with the then-pending adjournment of the Congress, made compliancewith section 7(o)(2) impossible (and therefore unnecessary); and_there was no timely request from either Committee for prepublication reviewof the rule, as required by section 7(o)(2) of the Department of HUD Act.<T3>Impossibility of compliance with section 7(o).</T3> In the proposedrule, the Department compared the specific rule-production requirementsset out in the Fair Housing Amendments Act with the legislative reviewrequirements in section 7(o). The Department looked at the 1988 legislativecalendar, which called for October 5, 1988 adjournment <T3>sine die.</T3> The Department looked at the September 13, 1988 approvaldate for the Fair Housing Amendment Act, and concluded that the Congresscould not possibly have intended for HUD to adhere to the requirementsof both Acts.If the Department had waited for the opening of the new session to exposeits rule to the required 15-session-day review, a <T3>proposed</T3> rule could not have been published before February 6,1989. (HUD published its proposed rule at its earliest opportunity, afterdeveloping it on an accelerated schedule. The Department could not possiblyhave completed the 15-day prepublication review <T3>before</T3> the Congress adjourned on October 22, 1988, notwithstandingthe fact that adjournment was delayed beyond the earlier October 5 projection.)HUD's long experience with section 7(o) compliance does not comport withthe commenters' suggestion that HUD could have followed the dictates of<T3>both</T3> laws_the rapid-pace rulemaking requirements of the AmendmentsAct, and the leisurely, all-purpose dictates of section 7(o). The requirementsof these two statutes could not be in greater conflict, and the Departmentfollowed the correct course in choosing the Amendment Act's particularityover section 7(o)'s generality.Many of the same public commenters who insisted that prepublication reviewshould have been afforded to the Banking Committees under section 7(o)also complained that the Department should have afforded the public a longerperiod for public comment on its published proposed rule. HUD notes thatif both of these requests had been honored the public comment period wouldhave expired approximately one month after the March 12, 1989 effectivedate of the Amendments Act, and that no rules for implementation of therights granted by the Fair Housing Amendments Act could have been publishedfor effect until at least June 1989.<T3>Lack of timely request for congressional review.</T3> Beyond the questionof statutory interpretation, prepublication review under section 7(o) wasnot required because the Banking Committees failed to make a timely requestfor such review. The following facts are relevant to this issue:1. By letter of September 14, 1988, the General Counsel submitted to theBanking Committees of both Houses HUD's semiannual agenda of rules, asrequired by section 7(o). This agenda, normally submitted in October ofeach year, was provided to the Committees one month early because adjournmentwas scheduled for October 5, 1988. (Under section 7(o), the Committeeshave a period of 15 <T3>session</T3> days to review the agenda and request that particularHUD rules be submitted to the Committees for prepublication review.)2. In the letter transmitting the semiannual agenda, the General Counselasked for committee restraint in requesting proposed rules from the agenda,since the effect of any such request made during September would be todelay HUD publication of the requested rules until the following February.The General Counsel also notified the Committees that HUD did not regardcertain rules arising out of statutory enactments that contained theirown rules-production deadlines as <T3>subject</T3> to the requirements of legislative review. ``Notably,''the General Counsel's letter continued, ``the Fair Housing Amendments Actand the Indian Housing Act contain difficult production deadlines for rulemakingthat coincide with congressional recess and adjournment periods. Sinceit is clearly not possible to honor these deadlines <T3>and</T3> those in the legislative review statute, we intend to focusour efforts on meeting the explicit production deadlines contained in thesestatutes.''3. The Committees' statutory review period for the submitted agenda expiredon September 30, 1988. Neither the House nor the Senate Banking Committeemade a timely response to HUD's semiannual agenda submission by that date.By letter dated October 18, 1988 (and apparently forwarded to HUD six dayslater), the Secretary received a request from the Chairmen of the Houseand Senate Banking Committees that HUD ``follow the requirements of section7(o) and provide the proposed Fair Housing Amendments Act rules for reviewby the Committees before publication.'' A similar letter was received fromSenators Kennedy and Specter of the Senate Judiciary Committee. In deferenceto these requests, the Banking Committees and Senators Kennedy and Specterwere provided copies of the proposed rule shortly before its publication.The Department, however, did <T3>not </T3>delay the rule's publication for 15 session days, or for anyother designated period, pending their review.Public comment periodSection 13 of the 1988 Amendments requires the Department to provide anopportunity for public notice and comment. While HUD's general policy isto afford the public not less than 60 days for the submission of publiccomments (see 24 CFR 10.1), based on the 180-day production schedule andthe requirement that a final rule be effective by March 12, 1989, the Departmentprovided 30 days for public comment on this proposed rule.The Department agrees with the commenter that the period available forpublic comment, coupled with the size and scope of the proposed rule, madepublic response difficult. Despite the abbreviated comment period, however,the rule attracted more than 6,400 timely comments_by far the greatestnumber in HUD's recent history. Many hundreds of these comments reflectedthoughtful consideration of the rule and the issues it raised, and lengthyanalytical comments were received from virtually all major housing industryorganizations, civil rights and handicapped rights groups, and other interestedorganizations. Hundreds of additional comments have been received sincethe close of the December 7, 1988 public comment period, and all of thesehave been read to determine whether any novel issues were raised that werenot treated in the timely comments. The Department is convinced that thepublic comment period permitted full exploration of the issues.Equally important, as a result of providing less time for the receipt ofpublic comments, the Department has been able to issue this final rulein advance of the law's March 12, 1989 effective date. It is vital thatpersons subject to the law's greatly increased penalties and newly proscribedconduct have as much advance notice as possible concerning the types ofconduct made illegal under the amended statute. Issuance of this rule onor near the effective date of the statute would have ill-served housingsuppliers subject to the law's requirements and to HUD regulations interpretingthose requirements.As indicated earlier, HUD found it impossible to follow both the regulation-writingrequirements specified in the Amendments Act and the more general requirementsof section 7(o) of the Department of HUD Act. Nevertheless, publicationof this rule in January permits the Department to provide for a waitingperiod following publication before the final rule takes effect_a procedurethat comports with HUD's rule on rules, 24 CFR Part 10, and which meetsthe requirements of section 7(o)(3) of the Department of HUD Act, whichrequires 30 session days after publication before HUD final rules may becomeeffective. While HUD does not believe that this rule, with its difficultstatutory production schedule, is technically subject to the 30-session-daywaiting period required by section 7(o)(3), we nevertheless believe thatgiven the controversial issues involved, it is useful and helpful to providethe Congress with time to consider whether any facet of this rule makingcalls for a legislative response.In summary, the Department believes that the public interest was well-servedby HUD's early publication of a proposed rule, that the public commentsreceived on that rule were of unusually high quality and were completein their exploration of legal and policy issues, and that early publicationof the final rule_well before its scheduled effectiveness_also serves thepublic interest and provides the Congress time to assess whether the rulecomports fully with congressional intent.The Department regrets that resource constraints prevented the proposedrule's being made more widely available on tape. However, the RegulationsDivision of HUD (the Office of the Rules Docket Clerk) received no requeststhat the tape be made available for the specific use of any person outsidethe Washington, DC area.Codification of analysis of regulationsOne commenter recommended that the final regulations include, as an appendix,an analysis of the regulations, similar in form to the preamble to theproposed rule.The Department has attempted to make the guidance provided by its ruletext as helpful as possible, and has provided examples of conduct whereappropriate to assist in understanding the text. In addition, we have addedthe analytical guidance contained in the preamble to the final rule asan appendix to the regulation. The preamble will, thus, be codified inthe 1989 edition of the Code of Federal Regulations. This will assure theavailability of the preamble to interested persons in the future.Regulatory Impact AnalysisOne commenter argued that a preliminary regulatory impact analysis shouldhave been prepared based upon the proposed rule's impact on consumers.The Director of the Office of Management and Budget waived the requirementfor the preparation of a preliminary Regulatory Impact Analysis under section3 of the Executive Order based on a determination that compliance withthe requirement for a preliminary Regulatory Impact Analysis may undulydelay the rule and may prohibit the issuance of a final rule effectiveby March 12, 1989. The proposed rule announced that the final RegulatoryImpact Analysis would be prepared before the publication of the final rule.Commenters argued that the effects of the proposed rule on consumers andthe housing industry are significant and complex. Commenters also arguedthat HUD's finding that the proposed rule would not cause a major increasein costs or prices for consumers is incorrect. A commenter noted that thechanging of all-adult communities to family communities will result inmajor expenditures which will require commensurate increases in rents.Increased costs would include redesign of advertising, brochures, signs,etc., rewriting and reprinting of management documents, increased managementand maintenance staff, the addition of playgrounds and play areas for children,higher repair and maintenance expenses because of children, higher potentiallegal liability and increased insurance rates. One commenter argued thata housing affordability analysis based upon current data should be conducted.The Department agrees that this rule constitutes a ``major rule'' as definedin section 1(b) of Executive Order 12291 and has prepared a final RegulatoryImpact Analysis as required by the Executive Order. This analysis is availablein the Office of HUD's Rules Docket Clerk at the address cited above.EnvironmentA Finding of No Significant Impact with respect to the environment hasbeen made in accordance with HUD regulations in 24 CFR Part 50, which implementssection 102(C) of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969. The Findingof No Significant Impact is available for public inspection during regularbusiness hours in the Office of General Counsel, Rules Docket Clerk, atthe address listed above.Regulatory Flexibility ActSeveral commenters objected to HUD's finding that this rule making wouldnot have a significant economic impact on small entities. The commentersargued that the date in the Steinfeld study (cited in the proposed rule)was over ten years old, and the study's assumptions did not reflect commonconstruction practices. Because HUD did not update this data for OMB, neitherHUD nor OMB have considered the major increases in costs or prices adverselyimpacting housing affordability for consumers, a commenter claimed. Incontrast to the Steinfeld study, the commenter asserted that 1988 dataindicates a 25 percent loss in profitability of garden-style multifamilyunits alone. The commenter asserted that it could find no basis for theminimal increases in costs contemplated by the Steinfeld study, unlessexterior design site planning and construction considerations bearing ondensity loss were omitted from the calculations. The minimal expenditureof funds envisioned by HUD is therefore seriously flawed and the impactof the rule upon consumers is vastly understated.In addition to these issues, commenters also felt that the proposed ruledid not adequately consider the fiscal impact on small governmental entities.The commenter stated that there will be an increase in costs to becomecertified a substantially equivalent, to make required changes, and tohandle the increased caseload associated with the addition of handicapand familial status. The commenter noted that this will require additionalFHAP funds to permit the increase in staff once local laws are amended.Other commenters argued that the regulatory flexibility analysis shouldhave considered the economic impact on communities and municapalities plannedfor senior citizens. (<T3>I.e., </T3>The design of such homes on small lots with significantcommon areas and facilities and which have a direct effect on the demandfor service from municipalities in which they are located. Such communitiesalso have significantly reduced demand for schools and certain recreationalactivities). Each of these factors will have an impact on the organizationof municipal governments and their budgets and facilities, a commenterasserted.While all of these comments reflect what may well be realistic difficultiesassociated with compliance with the requirements of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct, and while the economic impact of the statute may in fact be greaterthan HUD's preliminary analysis indicated, the Department fails to seewhat latitude exists for affording regulatory relief based upon the factthat some businesses or governmental entities affected by the statute'srequirements are ``small entities''. The purpose of the Regulatory FlexibilityAct is to establish, as a principle of regulatory issuance,<ITAG tagnum="21">that agencies shall endeavor, consistent with the objectives of therule and of applicable statutes, to fit regulatory and informational requirementsto the scale of the businesses, organizations, and governmental jurisdictionssubject to regulations. (5 U.S.C. 601 note)</ITAG>The Department has reviewed the objectives of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct and finds that its principal objective is stepped-up law enforcementand the expansion of civil rights. There is no suggestion in the statutethat HUD is being provided with discretion to apply the law's requirementsdifferentially, depending upon whether a prospective respondent is a largecorporation, or a small entity within the meaning of the Regulatory FlexibilityAct. While it is true that future regulation by HUD in such limited areasas compliance reporting or other record-maintenance functions may permitprovisions calling for lesser burdens on small entities, the basic prohibitions,compliance procedures, discovery procedures, hearing rights, and otherrequirements of this final rule are not of a nature that invites regulatoryflexibility. To the extent that small entities are subject to the FairHousing Act's requirements, they are subject as well to the requirementsof the rule_to the same extent and in the same manner that larger entitiesare so subject. Accordingly, HUD's Regulatory Impact Analysis and RegulatoryFlexibility Analysis are concerned with the costs of compliance with thelaw, but having accomplished those analyses, the Department sees its discretionto alter the impact of this rule on small entities as extremely limitedby the statute. There are no significant alternatives to the regulatoryscheme provided for in the rule that are consistent with the objectivesof the Fair Housing Amendment Act.``Takings'' AnalysisA commenter suggested that HUD should conduct a ``takings analysis'' inaccordance with Executive Order 12630 of March 15, 1988, ``GovernmentalActions and Interference with Constitutionally Protected Property Rights''.A takings analysis involves assessing the economic impact of a proposedpolicy or action to determine, to the extent possible, what economic orproperty interests are likely to be affected by the proposed action ofgovernment.The economic impact of this rule on identified property interests, accordingto many commenters, is expected to be significant, but this fact alonedoes not end the inquiry. Additionally, in accordance with Guidelines issuedby the Attorney General relative to agency analyses under Executive Order12630, consideration is to be given to:<ITAG tagnum="21">. . . Whether the proposed policy or action carries benefits to theprivate property owner that offset or otherwise mitigate the adverse economicimpact of the proposed policy or action; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Whether alternative actions are available that would achieve the underlyinglawful governmental objective </T3>and would have a lesser economic impact(Emphasis Added)</ITAG>As indicated earlier in our discussion of Regulatory Impact and RegulatoryFlexibility Act considerations, the Department does not perceive any ``alternativeactions'' available to the rule maker except to follow the expressed intentionof the Congress and provide for enforcement of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct. Nor does the Department regard the effects of this rule on privateproperty rights as being sufficiently severe as to ``effectively deny economicallyviable use of any distinct legally protected property interest of [a propertyowner], or to have the effect of, or result in, a permanent or temporaryphysical occupation, invasion, or deprivation.'' (The quoted phrase ispart of the Attorney General's advisory to agencies with reference to determinationsof policies having ``takings'' implications.)Agencies conducting takings analyses are encouraged by the Executive Orderand the accompanying Guidelines to strive, to the extent permitted by law,to undertake policies or actions in a way which minimizes their takingsimplications. This, the Department has done. Compliance with the Fair HousingAmendments Act will, in some circumstances, limit owner discretion concerningadmissions policies and will require builders of multifamily housing tocomply with additional construction-related criteria associated with accessibilityby handicapped persons. There are other aspects of the Amendments Act thatwill have some economic impact and will thus affect property rights. Noneof these impacts, in the Department's view, rises to the level of a ``taking''within the meaning of the Fifth Amendment of the United States Constitution.Paperwork Reduction ActThe information collection requirements contained in this rule have beensubmitted to OMB for review under section 3504(h) of the Paperwork ReductionAct of 1980. Sections 100.304(c)(2), 103.30, 115.3(a)(i), 115.5, 115.7and 115.9 of this proposed rule have been determined by the Departmentto contain collection of information requirements. Information on theserequirements are provided as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Tabulation of Annual Reporting Burden Proposed Rule_Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of </T4>1988<H1>Description of information collection and section of 24 CFR affected</H1><H1>Number of respondents </H1><H1>Number of responses per respondent </H1><H1>Total annual responses </H1><H1>Hours per response </H1><H1>Total hour</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Policy and Procedures_Housing for Persons 55 years and older_andSection;100.304(c)(2)<D>1,231</D><D>1</D><D>1,231</D><D>1</D><D>1,231</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Housing Discrimination Complaint Forms HD-903 andamp; 903A Spanish Version(2529-0011)_andSection;andSection; 103.30 andamp; 115.3(a)(1)<D>8,400</D><D>1</D><D>8,400</D><D>1</D><D>8,400</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Certification Request Documentation (2529-0025)_andSection;andSection;115.5, 115.7 andamp; 115.9<D>30</D><D>1</D><D>30</D><D>17</D><D>510</D><R>n,n,n,n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total annual burden<D/><D/><D/><D/><D>10,141</D></ITAG></ITAG>Collections of information conducted or sponsored by HUD during the conductof an administrative action or investigation against specific individualsor entities after a case file is opened are not covered by 5 CFR Part 1320_ControllingPaperwork Burdens on the Public (see 5 CFR 1320.3(c)). Accordingly, thetabulation above, does not include the information collection hours associatedwith andSection;andSection; 104.420, 104.530, 104.540(b)(4), 104.540(c), 104.550(a),104.550(b), 104.590, 104.600(b), 104.620(b)(2), 104.700(a), 104.720, 104.790(b),104.910(d), 115.3(a)(ii), (iii) and (iv), and 115.4(b)(2)(i). No burdenhours are reported for Part 110 since public disclosure of informationoriginally supplied by the Federal Government to the recipient for thepurposes of disclosure is not a collection of information. (See 5 CFR 1230.7(c)(2)).No burden hours are included for andSection;121.2 because information collectionrequirements on race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, handicap,and family characteristics will be imposed under the regulations applicableto the specific HUD program.Impact on FamilyThe General Counsel, as the Designated Official under Executive Order No.12606_The Family, has determined that this rule, if implemented, may havea significant impact on family formation, maintenance and general well-beingbecause the rule provides Federal law enforcement assistance to familiesconfronting housing discrimination based on race, color, religion, nationalorigin, familial status or handicap. However, review under the Order isnot required because the statutory mandate leaves little effective discretionin the Department to lessen the family impact. In any event, the purposeof the statute is to have a positive impact on family values by offeringa measure of protection to persons confronting illegal discrimination.FederalismThe General Counsel, as the Designated Official under section 6(a) of ExecutiveOrder No. 12612_Federalism, has determined that the policies containedin this rule would, if implemented, have federalism implications and aresubject to review under the Order. Specifically, the amended statute continuesto provide for referral to State and local fair housing enforcement agencies.However, in the future the determination of substantial equivalency willdepend upon State and local enforcement machinery that matches up withthe much-strengthened Federal law. Accordingly, the effect of the amendedFair Housing Act will be to encourage States and localities to amend theirlaws to match the Federal enforcement machinery, or suffer the eventualloss of recognition as substantially equivalent State or local agenciesand possible loss of function if citizens of the jurisdiction do not chooseto file complaints with State or local officials. Additionally, jurisdictionslosing equivalency status will lose eligibility for grant funds availableto co-enforcers of fair housing laws.While the rule would have federalism impacts, review under the FederalismExecutive Order is not required because the implementation of the statuteleaves little discretion with HUD to lessen these impacts. HUD's statutorymandate is clear_it must accept complaints nationwide, and refer complaintsfor processing (after the initial grandfather period) only to jurisdictionswith substantially equivalent laws. Moreover, since the statute addressesthe Federalism issue by declaring that certain conduct will be illegaland by providing machinery for referral to State and local authority underappropriate circumstances, further study of Federalism implications couldnot appreciably affect the approach taken in the implementing regulations.Other mattersThis rule was listed in the Department's Semiannual Agenda of Regulationspublished October 24, 1988 (53 FR 41974, 42605) under Executive Order 12291and the Regulatory Flexibility Act.The Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance program number and title is14.400 Equal Opportunity in Housing.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>24 CFR Part 14Equal access to justice, Lawyers, Claims24 CFR Part 100Fair housing, Incorporation by reference, Nondiscrimination 24 CFR Part 103Administrative practice and procedure, Fair housing24 CFR Part 104Administrative practice and procedure, Fair housing24 CFR Part 105Administrative practice and procedure, Fair housing24 CFR Part 106Administrative practice and procedure, Fair housing24 CFR Part 109Advertising, Fair housing, Signs and symbols24 CFR Part 110Fair housing, Signs and symbols24 CFR Part 115Fair housing, Intergovernmental relations.24 CFR Part 121Fair housing, statistics, Reporting and Recordkeeping requirements.Accordingly, Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amended asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 14_IMPLEMENTATION OF THE EQUAL ACCESS TO JUSTICE ACT IN ADMINISTRATIVEPROCEEDINGS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 14 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 504(c)(1) of the Equal Access to Justice Act (5U.S.C. 504(c)(1); sec. 7(d) of the Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)). </ITAG>2. In andSection;14.115, the phrase ``or'' at the end of paragraph (a)(8)is removed, the period  at  the  end  of  paragraph  (a)(9) is removedand in its place the phrase ``; or'' is added, and new paragraph (a)(10)is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 14.115 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proceedings covered. </ITAG>(a) * * * (10) Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620) and24 CFR Part 104. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>3. Part 100 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 100_DISCRIMINATORY CONDUCT UNDER THE FAIR HOUSING ACT </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.1 Authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.5 Scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.10 Exemptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.20 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart B_Discriminatory Housing Practices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.50 Real estate practices prohibited. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.60 Unlawful refusal to sell or rent or to negotiate for the saleor rental. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.65 Discrimination in terms, conditions and privileges and in servicesand facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.70 Other prohibited sale and rental conduct.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.75 Discriminatory advertisements, statements and notices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.80 Discriminatory representations on the availability of dwellings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.85 Blockbusting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.90 Discrimination in the provision of brokerage services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart C_Discrimination in Residential Real Estate-Related Transactions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.110 Discriminatory practices in residential real estate-relatedtransactions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.115 Residential real estate-related transactions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.120 Discrimination in the making of loans and in the provisionof other financial assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.125 Discrimination in the purchasing of loans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.130 Discrimination in the terms and conditions for making availableloans or other financial assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.135 Unlawful practices in the selling, brokering, or appraisingof residential real property. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart D_Prohibitions Against Discrimination Because of Handicap</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.200 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.201 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.202 General prohibitions against discrimination because of handicap.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.203 Reasonable modifications of existing premises. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.204 Reasonable accommodations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.205 Design and construction requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart E_Housing for Older Persons </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.300 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.301 Exemption. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.302 State and Federal elderly housing programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.303 62 or over housing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.304 55 or over housing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart F_Interference, Coercion or Intimidation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.400 Prohibited interference, coercion or intimidation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Autority:</T4> Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. 3600-3620;section 7(d), Department of HUD Act, 42 U.S.C. 3535(d). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authority. </ITAG>This regulation is issued under the authority of the Secretary of Housingand Urban Development to administer and enforce Title VIII of the CivilRights Act of 1968, as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988(the Fair Housing Act). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope. </ITAG>(a) It is the policy of the United States to provide, within constitutionallimitations, for fair housing throughout the United States. No person shallbe subjected to discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin in the sale, rental, or advertisingof dwellings, in the provision of brokerage services, or in the availabilityof residential real estate-related transactions. (b) This part provides the Department's interpretation of the coverageof the Fair Housing Act regarding discrimination related to the sale orrental of dwellings, the provision of services in connection therewith,and the availability of residential real estate-related transactions. (c) Nothing in this part relieves persons participating in a Federal orFederally-assisted program or activity from other requirements applicableto buildings and dwellings. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;100.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exemptions.</ITAG>(a) This part does not: (1) Prohibit a religious organization, association, or society, or anynonprofit institution or organization operated, supervised or controlledby or in conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society,from limiting the sale, rental or occupancy of dwellings which it ownsor operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of the samereligion, or from giving preference to such persons, unless membershipin such religion is restricted because of race, color, or national origin;(2) Prohibit a private club, not in fact open to the public, which, incidentto its primary purpose or purposes, provides lodgings which it owns oroperates for other than a commercial purpose, from limiting the rentalor occupancy of such lodgings to its members or from giving preferenceto its members; (3) Limit the applicability of any reasonable local, State or Federal restrictionsregarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling;or (4) Prohibit conduct against a person because such person has been convictedby any court of competent jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distributionof a controlled substance as defined in Section 102 of the Controlled SubstancesAct (21 U.S.C. 802). (b) Nothing in this part regarding discrimination based on familial statusapplies with respect to housing for older persons as defined in SubpartE of this part.  (c) Nothing in this part, other than the prohibitions against discriminatoryadvertising, applies to: (1) The sale or rental of any single family house by an owner, providedthe following conditions are met: (i) The owner does not own or have any interest in more than three singlefamily houses at any one time. (ii) The house is sold or rented without the use of a real estate broker,agent or salesperson or the facilities of any person in the business ofselling or renting dwellings. If the owner selling the house does not residein it at the time of the sale or was not the most recent resident of thehouse prior to such sale, the exemption in this paragraph (c)(1) of thissection applies to only one such sale in any 24-month period. (2) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied orintended to be occupied by no more than four families living independentlyof each other, if the owner actually maintains and occupies one of suchliving quarters as his or her residence. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;100.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part: ``Aggrieved person'' includes any person who_ (a) Claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice; or(b) Believes that such person will be injured by a discriminatory housingpractice that is about to occur. ``Broker'' or ``Agent'' includes any person authorized to perform an actionon behalf of another person regarding any matter related to the sale orrental of dwellings, including offers, solicitations or contracts and theadministration of matters regarding such offers, solicitations or contractsor any residential real estate-related transactions. ``Department'' means the Department of Housing and Urban Development. ``Discriminatory housing practice'' means an act that is unlawful undersection 804, 805, 806, or 818 of the Fair Housing Act.``Dwelling'' means any building, structure or portion thereof which isoccupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by oneor more families, and any vacant land which is offered for sale or leasefor the construction or location thereon of any such building, structureor portion thereof. ``Fair Housing Act'' means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968,as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620).``Familial status'' means one or more individuals (who have not attainedthe age of 18 years) being domiciled with_ (a) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individualor individuals; or (b) The designee of such parent or other person having such custody, withthe written permission of such parent or other person.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The protections afforded against discrimination on the basis of familialstatus shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process ofsecuring legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of18 years.``Handicap'' is defined in andSection;100.201. ``Person'' includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers,and fiduciaries. ``Person in the business of selling or renting dwellings'' means any personwho: (a) Within the preceding twelve months, has participated as principal inthree or more transactions involving the sale or rental of any dwellingor any interest therein; (b) Within the preceding twelve months, has participated as agent, otherthan in the sale of his or her own personal residence, in providing salesor rental facilities or sales or rental services in two or more transactionsinvolving the sale or rental of any dwelling or any interest therein; or(c) Is the owner of any dwelling designed or intended for occupancy by,or occupied by, five or more families. ``Secretary'' means the Secretary of the Department. ``State'' means any of the several states, the District of Columbia, theCommonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any of the territories and possessionsof the United States. <ITAG tagnum="82">Subpart B_Discriminatory Housing Practices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Real estate practices prohibited.</ITAG>(a) This subpart provides the Department's interpretation of conduct thatis unlawful housing discrimination under section 804 and section 806 ofthe Fair Housing Act. In general the prohibited actions are set forth undersections of this subpart which are most applicable to the discriminatoryconduct described. However, an action illustrated in one section can constitutea violation under sections in the subpart. For example, the conduct describedin andSection; 100.60(b)(3) and (4) would constitute a violation of andSection;100.65(a) as well as andSection; 100.60(a). (b) It shall be unlawful to: (1) Refuse to sell or rent a dwelling after a <T3>bona fide</T3> offer has been made, or to refuse to negotiate for thesale or rental of a dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex, familialstatus, or national origin, or to discriminate in the sale or rental ofa dwelling because of handicap. (2) Discriminate in the terms, conditions or privileges of sale or rentalof a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connectionwith sales or rentals, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (3) Engage in any conduct relating to the provision of housing which otherwisemakes unavailable or denies dwellings to persons because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. (4) Make, print or publish, or cause to be made, printed or published,any notice, statement or advertisement with respect to the sale or rentalof a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation or discriminationbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin, or an intention to make any such preference, limitation or discrimination.(5) Represent to any person because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin that a dwelling is not available forsale or rental when such dwelling is in fact available. (6) Engage in blockbusting practices in connection with the sale or rentalof dwellings because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin. (7) Deny access to or membership or participation in, or to discriminateagainst any person in his or her access to or membership or participationin, any multiple-listing service, real estate brokers' assocation, or otherservice organization or facility relating to the business of selling orrenting a dwelling or in the terms or conditions or membership or participation,because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin. (c) The application of the Fair Housing Act with respect to persons withhandicaps is discussed in Subpart D of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Unlawful to sell or rent or to negotiate for the sale or rental. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to refuse to sell or rent a dwellingto a person who has made a <T3>bona fide</T3> offer, because of race, color, religion, sex, familialstatus, or national origin or to refuse to negotiate with a person forthe sale or rental of a dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex,familial status, or national origin, or to discriminate against any personin the sale or rental of a dwelling because of handicap. (b) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Failing to accept or consider a <T3>bona fide</T3> offer because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (2) Refusing to sell or rent a dwelling to, or to negotiate for the saleor rental of a dwelling with, any person because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. (3) Imposing different sales prices or rental charges for the sale or rentalof a dwelling upon any person because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (4) Using different qualification criteria or applications, or sale orrental standards or procedures, such as income standards, application requirements,application fees, credit analysis or sale or rental approval proceduresor other requirements, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (5) Evicting tenants because of their race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin or because of the race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin of a tenant's guest.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.65 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in terms, conditions and privileges and in servicesand facilities. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin, to impose different terms, conditionsor privileges relating to the sale or rental of a dwelling or to deny orlimit services or facilities in connection with the sale or rental of adwelling. (b) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Using different provisions in leases or contracts of sale, such asthose relating to rental charges, security deposits and the terms of alease and those relating to down payment and closing requirements, becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(2) Failing or delaying maintenance or repairs of sale or rental dwellingsbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin. (3) Failing to process an offer for the sale or rental of a dwelling orto communicate an offer accurately because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin. (4) Limiting the use of privileges, services or facilities associated witha dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin of an an owner, tenant or a person associated with himor her. (5) Denying or limiting services or facilities in connection with the saleor rental of a dwelling, because a person failed or refused to providesexual favors. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.70 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other prohibited sale and rental conduct. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin, to restrict or attempt to restrictthe choices of a person by word or conduct in connection with seeking,negotiating for, buying or renting a dwelling so as to perpetuate, or tendto perpetuate, segregated housing patterns, or to discourage or obstructchoices in a community, neighborhood or development. (b) It shall be unlawful, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin, to engage in any conduct relatingto the provision of housing or of services and facilities in connectiontherewith that otherwise makes unavailable or denies dwellings to persons.(c) Prohibited actions under paragraph (a) of this section, which are generallyreferred to as unlawful steering practices, include, but are not limitedto:(1) Discouraging any person from inspecting, purchasing or renting a dwellingbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin, or because of the race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin of persons in a community, neighborhood or development. (2) Discouraging the purchase or rental of a dwelling because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin, byexaggerating drawbacks or failing to inform any person of desirable featuresof a dwelling or of a community, neighborhood, or development. (3) Communicating to any prospective purchaser that he or she wold notbe comfortable or compatible with existing residents of a community, neighborhoodor development because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin. (4) Assigning any person to a particular section of a community, neighborhoodor development, or to a particular floor of a building, because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(d) Prohibited activities relating to dwellings under paragraph (b) ofthis section include, but are not limited to: (1) Discharging or taking other adverse action against an employee, brokeror agent because he or she refused to participate in a discriminatory housingpractice. (2) Employing codes or other devices to segregate or reject applicants,purchasers or renters, refusing to take or to show listings of dwellingsin certain areas because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin, or refusing to deal with certain brokers oragents because they or one or more of their clients are of a particularrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(3) Denying or delaying the processing of an application made by a purchaseror renter or refusing to approve such a person for occupancy in a cooperativeor condominium dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (4) Refusing to provide municipal services or property or hazard insurancefor dwellings or providing such services or insurance differently becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discriminatory advertisements, statements and notices. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful to make, print or publish, or cause to be made,printed or published, any notice, statement or advertisement with respectto the sale or rental of a dwelling which indicates any preference, limitationor discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin, or an intention to make any such preference,limitation or discrimination. (b) The prohibitions in this section shall apply to all written or oralnotices or statements by a person engaged in the sale or rental of a dwelling.Written notices and statements include any applications, flyers, brochures,deeds, signs, banners, posters, billboards or any documents used with respectto the sale or rental of a dwelling. (c) Discriminatory notices, statements and advertisements include, butare not limited to: (1) Using words, phrases, photographs, illustrations, symbols or formswhich convey that dwellings are available or not available to a particulargroup of persons because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin. (2) Expressing to agents, brokers, employees, prospective sellers or rentersor any other persons a preference for or limitation on any purchaser orrenter because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin of such persons. (3) Selecting media or locations for advertising the sale or rental ofdwellings which deny particular segments of the housing market informationabout housing opportunities because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (4) Refusing to publish advertising for the sale or rental of dwellingsor requiring different charges or terms for such advertising because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(d) 24 CFR Part 109 provides information to assist persons to advertisedwellings in a nondiscriminatory manner and describes the matters the Departmentwill review in evaluating compliance with the Fair Housing Act and in investigatingcomplaints alleging discriminatory housing practices involving advertising.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discriminatory representations on the availability of dwellings. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin, to provide inaccurate or untrue informationabout the availability of dwellings for sale or rental. (b) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto: (1) Indicating through words or conduct that a dwelling which is availablefor inspection, sale, or rental has been sold or rented, because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. (2) Representing that covenants or other deed, trust or lease provisionswhich purport to restrict the sale or rental of dwellings because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin precludethe sale of rental of a dwelling to a person. (3) Enforcing covenants or other deed, trust, or lease provisions whichpreclude the sale or rental of a dwelling to any person because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. (4) Limiting information, by word or conduct, regarding suitably priceddwellings available for inspection, sale or rental, because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(5) Providing false or inaccurate information regarding the availabilityof a dwelling for sale or rental to any person, including testers, regardlessof whether such person is actually seeking housing, because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Blockbusting.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful, for profit, to induce or attempt to induce aperson to sell or rent a dwelling by representations regarding the entryor prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of aparticular race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national originor with a handicap.(b) In establishing a discriminatory housing practice under this sectionit is not necessary that there was in fact profit as long as profit wasa factor for engaging in the blockbusting activity.(c) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Engaging, for profit, in conduct (including uninvited solicitationsfor listings) which conveys to a person that a neighborhood is undergoingor is about to undergo a change in the race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin of persons residing in it, in orderto encourage the person to offer a dwelling for sale or rental.(2) Encouraging, for profit, any person to sell or rent a dwelling throughassertions that the entry or prospective entry of persons of a particularrace, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin, or withhandicaps, can or will result in undesirable consequences for the project,neighborhood or community, such as a lowering of property values, an increasein criminal or antisocial behavior, or a decline in the quality of schoolsor other services or facilities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in the provision of brokerage services.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or membership orparticipation in any multiple listing service, real estate brokers' organizationor other service, organization, or facility relating to the business ofselling or renting dwellings, or to discriminate against any person inthe terms or conditions of such access, membership or participation, becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(b) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Setting different fees for access to or membership in a multiple listingservice because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin.(2) Denying or limiting benefits accruing to members in a real estate brokers'organization because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin.(3) Imposing different standards or criteria for membership in a real estatesales or rental organization because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(4) Establishing geographic boundaries or office location or residencerequirements for access to or membership or participation in any multiplelisting service, real estate brokers' organization or other service, organizationor facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings, becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Discrimination in Residential Real Estate-Related Transactions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.110</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discriminatory practices in residential real estate-related transactions.</ITAG>(a) This subpart provides the Department's interpretation of the conductthat is unlawful housing discrimination under section 805 of the Fair HousingAct.(b) It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose businessincludes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminateagainst any person in making available such a transaction, or in the termsor conditions of such a transaction, because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.115</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Residential real estate-related transactions.</ITAG>The term residential ``real estate-related transactions'' means:(a) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance_(1) For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing or maintaining adwelling; or(2) Secured by residential real estate; or(b) The selling, brokering or appraising of residential real property.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.120</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in the making of loans and in the provision of otherfinancial assistance.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or entity whose business includesengaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminateagainst any person in making available loans or other financial assistancefor a dwelling, or which is or is to be secured by a dwelling, becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(b) Prohibited practices under this section include, but are not limitedto, failing or refusing to provide to any person, in connection with aresidential real estate-related transaction, information regarding theavailability of loans or other financial assistance, application requirements,procedures or standards for the review and approval of loans or financialassistance, or providing information which is inaccurate or different fromthat provided others, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.125</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in the purchasing of loans. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or entity engaged in the purchasingof loans or other debts or securities which support the purchase, construction,improvement, repair or maintenance of a dwelling, or which are securedby residential real estate, to refuse to purchase such loans, debts, orsecurities, or to impose different terms or conditions for such purchases,because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin. (b) Unlawful conduct under this section includes, but is not limited to:(1) Purchasing loans or other debts or securities which relate to, or whichare secured by dwellings in certain communities or neighborhoods but notin others because of the race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin of persons in such neighborhoods or communities.(2) Pooling or packaging loans or other debts or securities which relateto, or which are secured by, dwellings differently because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. (3) Imposing or using different terms or conditions on the marketing orsale of securities issued on the basis of loans or other debts or securitieswhich relate to, or which are secured by, dwellings because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. (c) This section does not prevent consideration, in the purchasing of loans,of factors justified by business necessity, including requirements of Federallaw, relating to a transaction's financial security or to protection againstdefault or reduction of the value of the security. Thus, this provisionwould not preclude considerations employed in normal and prudent transactions,provided that no such factor may in any way relate to race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status or national origin. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.130</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in the terms and conditions for making available loansor other financial assistance. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or entity engaged in the makingof loans or in the provision of other financial assistance relating tothe purchase, construction, improvement, repair or maintenance of dwellingsor which are secured by residential real estate to impose different termsor conditions for the availability of such loans or other financial assistancebecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin. (b) Unlawful conduct under this section includes, but is not limited to:(1) Using different policies, practices or procedures in evaluating orin determining creditworthiness of any person in connection with the provisionof any loan or other financial assistance for a dwelling or for any loanor other financial assistance which is secured by residential real estatebecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin. (2) Determining the type of loan or other financial assistance to be providedwith respect to a dwelling, or fixing the amount, interest rate, durationor other terms for a loan or other financial assistance for a dwellingor which is secured by residential real estate, because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.135 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Unlawful practices in the selling, brokering, or appraising of residentialreal property. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose businessincludes engaging in the selling, brokering or appraising of residentialreal property to discriminate against any person in making available suchservices, or in the performance of such services, because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. (b) For the purposes of this section, the term appraisal means an estimateor opinion of the value of a specified residential real property made ina business context in connection with the sale, rental, financing or refinancingof a dwelling or in connection with any activity that otherwise affectsthe availability of a residential real estate-related transaction, whetherthe appraisal is oral or written, or transmitted formally or informally.The appraisal includes all written comments and other documents submittedas support for the estimate or opinion of value. (c) Nothing in this section prohibits a person engaged in the businessof making or furnishing appraisals of residential real property from takinginto consideration factors other than race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (d) Practices which are unlawful under this section include, but are notlimited to, using an appraisal of residential real property in connectionwith the sale, rental, or financing of any dwelling where the person knowsor reasonably should know that the appraisal improperly takes into considerationrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Prohibition Against Discrimination Because of Handicap </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.200 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>The purpose of this subpart is to effectuate sections 6 (a) and (b) and15 of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>As used in this subpart: ``Accessible'', when used with respect to the public and common use areasof a building containing covered multifamily dwellings, means that thepublic or common use areas of the building can be approached, entered,and used by individuals with physical handicaps. The phrase ``readily accessibleto and usable by'' is synonymous with accessible. A public or common usearea that complies with the appropriate requirements of ANSI A117.1-1986or a comparable standard is ``accessible'' within the meaning of this paragraph.``Accessible route'' means a continuous unobstructed path connecting accessibleelements and spaces in a building or within a site that can be negotiatedby a person with a severe disability using a wheelchair and that is alsosafe for and usable by people with other disabilities. Interior accessibleroutes may include corridors, floors, ramps, elevators and lifts. Exterioraccessible routes may include parking access aisles, curb ramps, walks,ramps and lifts. A route that complies with the appropriate requirementsof ANSI A117.1-1986 or a comparable standard is an ``accessible route''.``ANSI A117.1-1986'' means the 1986 edition of the American National Standardfor buildings and facilities providing accessibility and usability forphysically handicapped people. This incorporation by reference was approvedby the Director of the Federal Register in accordance with 5 U.S.C. 552(a)and 1 CFR Part 51. Copies may be obtained from American National StandardsInstitute, Inc., 1430 Broadway, New York, New York 10018. Copies may beinspected at the Department of Housing and Urban Development, 451 SeventhStreet, S.W., Room 10276, Washington, D.C., or at the Office of the FederalRegister, 1100 L Street, N.W., Room 8401, Washington, D.C. ``Building'' means a structure, facility or portion thereof that containsor serves one or more dwelling units. ``Building entrance on an accessible route'' means an accessible entranceto a building that is connected by an accessible route to public transportationstops, to accessible parking and passenger loading zones, or to publicstreets or sidewalks, if available. A building entrance that complies withANSI A117.1-1986 or a comparable standard complies with the requirementsof this paragraph. ``Common use areas'' means rooms, spaces or elements inside or outsideof a building that are made available for the use of residents of a buildingor the guests thereof. These areas include hallways, lounges, lobbies,laundry rooms, refuse rooms, mail rooms, recreational areas and passagewaysamong and between buildings. ``Controlled substance'' means any drug or other substance, or immediateprecursor included in the definition in section 102 of the Controlled SubstancesAct (21 U.S.C. 802). ``Covered multifamily dwellings'' means buildings consisting of 4 or moredwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and groundfloor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of 4 or more dwellingunits. ``Dwelling unit'' means a single unit of residence for a family or oneor more persons. Examples of dwelling units include: a single family home;an apartment unit within an apartment building; and in other types of dwellingsin which sleeping accommodations are provided but toileting or cookingfacilities are shared by occupants of more than one room or portion ofthe dwelling, rooms in which people sleep. Examples of the latter includedormitory rooms and sleeping accommodations in shelters intended for occupancyas a residence for homeless persons. ``Entrance'' means any access point to a building or portion of a buildingused by residents for the purpose of entering. ``Exterior'' means all areas of the premises outside of an individual dwellingunit. ``First occupancy'' means a building that has never before been used forany purpose. ``Ground floor'' means a floor of a building with a building entrance onan accessible route. A building may have more than one ground floor. ``Handicap'' means, with respect to a person, a physical or mental impairmentwhich substantially limits one or more major life activities; a recordof such an impairment; or being regarded as having such an impairment.This term does not include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlledsubstance. For purposes of this part, an individual shall not be consideredto have a handicap solely because that individual is a transvestite. Asused in this definition: (a) ``Physical or mental impairment'' includes: (1) Any physiological disorder or condition, cosmetic disfigurement, oranatomical loss affecting one or more of the following body systems: Neurological;musculoskeletal; special sense organs; respiratory, including speech organs;cardiovascular; reproductive; disgestive; genito-urinary; hemic and lymphatic;skin; and endocrine; or (2) Any mental or psychological disorder, such as mental retardation, organicbrain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning disabilities.The term ``physical or mental impairment'' includes, but is not limitedto, such diseases and conditions as orthopedic, visual, speech and hearingimpairments, cerebral palsy, autism, epilepsy, muscular dystrophy, multiplesclerosis, cancer, heart disease, diabetes, Human Immunodeficiency Virusinfection, mental retardation, emotional illness, drug addiction (otherthan addiction caused by current, illegal use of a controlled substance)and alcoholism. (b) ``Major life activities'' means functions such as caring for one'sself, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing,learning and working. (c) ``Has a record of such an impairment'' means has a history of, or hasbeen misclassified as having, a mental or physical impairment that substantiallylimits one or more major life activities. (d) ``Is regarded as having an impairment'' means: (1) Has a physical or mental impairment that does not substantially limitone or more major life activities but that is treated by another personas constituting such a limitation; (2) Has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one ormore major life activities only as a result of the attitudes of other towardsuch impairment; or (3) Has none of the impairments defined in paragraph (a) of this definitionbut is treated by another person as having such an impairment. ``Interior'' means the spaces, parts, components or elements of an individualdwelling unit. ``Modification'' means any change to the public or common use areas ofa building or any change to a dwelling unit. ``Premises'' means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components orelements of a building, including individual dwelling units and the publicand common use areas of a building. ``Public use areas'' means interior or exterior rooms or spaces of a buildingthat are made available to the general public. Public use may be providedat a building that is privately or publicly owned. ``Site'' means a parcel of land bounded by a property line or a designatedportion of a public right or way.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.202</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General prohibitions against discrimination because of handicap. </ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful to discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwisemake unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because ofa handicap of_ (1) That buyer or renter; (2) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling afterit is so sold, rented, or made available; or (3) Any person associated with that person. (b) It shall be unlawful to discriminate against any person in the terms,conditions, or privileges of the sale or rental of a dwelling, or in theprovision of services or facilities in connection with such dwelling, becauseof a handicap of_ (1) That buyer or renter;(2) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling afterit is so sold, rented, or made available; or (3) Any person associated with that person. (c) It shall be unlawful to make an inquiry to determine whether an applicantfor a dwelling, a person intending to reside in that dwelling after itis so sold, rented or made available, or any person associated with thatperson, has a handicap or to make inquiry as to the nature or severityof a handicap of such a person. However, this paragraph does not prohibitthe following inquiries, provided these inquiries are made of all applicants,whether or not they have handicaps:(1) Inquiry into an applicant's ability to meet the requirements of ownershipor tenancy;(2) Inquiry to determine whether an applicant is qualified for a dwellingavailable only to persons with handicaps or to persons with a particulartype of handicap;(3) Inquiry to determine whether an applicant for a dwelling is qualifiedfor a priority available to persons with handicaps or to persons with aparticular type of handicap;(4) Inquiring whether an applicant for a dwelling is a current illegalabuser or addict of a controlled substance;(5) Inquiring whether an applicant has been convicted of the illegal manufactureor distribution of a controlled substance.(d) Nothing in this subpart requires that a dwelling be made availableto an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threat to thehealth or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would result insubstantial physical damage to the property of others.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reasonable modifications of existing premises.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to refuse to permit, at the expenseof a handicapped person, reasonable modifications of existing premises,occupied or to be occupied by a handicapped person, if the proposed modificationsmay be necessary to afford the handicapped person full enjoyment of thepremises of a dwelling. In the case of a rental, the landlord may, whereit is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on therenter agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the conditionthat existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted.The landlord may not increase for handicapped persons any customarily requiredsecurity deposit. However, where it is necessary in order to ensure withreasonable certainty that funds will be available to pay for the restorationsat the end of the tenancy, the landlord may negotiate as part of such arestoration agreement a provision requiring that the tenant pay into aninterest bearing escrow account, over a reasonable period, a reasonableamount of money not to exceed the cost of the restorations. The interestin any such account shall accrue to the benefit of the tenant.(b) A landlord may condition permission for a modification on the renterproviding a reasonable description of the proposed modifications as wellas reasonable assurances that the work will be done in a workmanlike mannerand that any required building permits will be obtained.(c) The application of paragraph (a) of this section may be illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1):</T3> A tenant with a handicap asks his or her landlordfor permission to install grab bars in the bathroom at his or her own expense.It is necessary to reinforce the walls with blocking between studs in orderto affix the grab bars. It is unlawful for the landlord to refuse to permitthe tenant, at the tenant's own expense, from making the modificationsnecessary to add the grab bars. However, the landlord may condition permissionfor the modification on the tenant agreeing to restore the bathroom tothe condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear andtear excepted. It would be reasonable for the landlord to require the tenantto remove the grab bars at the end of the tenancy. The landlord may alsoreasonably require that the wall to which the grab bars are to be attachedbe repaired and restored to its original condition, reasonable wear andtear excepted. However, it would be unreasonable for the landlord to requirethe tenant to remove the blocking, since the reinforced walls will notinterfere in any way with the landlord's or the next tenant's use and enjoymentof the premises and may be needed by some future tenant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2):</T3> An applicant for rental housing has a child who usesa wheelchair. The bathroom door in the dwelling unit is too narrow to permitthe wheelchair to pass. The applicant asks the landlord for permissionto widen the doorway at the applicant's own expense. It is unlawful forthe landlord to refuse to permit the applicant to make the modification.Further, the landlord may <T3>not,</T3> in usual circumstances, condition permission for the modificationon the applicant paying for the doorway to be narrowed at the end of thelease because a wider doorway will not interfere with the landlord's orthe next tenant's use and enjoyment of the premises.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.204</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reasonable accommodations.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to refuse to make reasonable accommodationsin rules, policies, practices, or services, when such accommodations maybe necessary to afford a handicapped person equal opportunity to use andenjoy a dwelling unit, including public and common use areas.(b) The application of this section may be illustrated by the followingexamples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1):</T3> A blind applicant for rental housing wants live ina dwelling unit with a seeing eye dog. The building has a ``no pets'' policy.It is a violation of andSection; 100.204 for the owner or manager of theapartment complex to refuse to permit the applicant to live in the apartmentwith a seeing eye dog because, without the seeing eye dog, the blind personwill not have an equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2):</T3> Progress Gardens is a 300 unit apartment complexwith 450 parking spaces which are available to tenants and guests of ProgressGardens on a ``first come first served'' basis. John applies for housingin Progress Gardens. John is mobility impaired and is unable to walk morethan a short distance and therefore requests that a parking space nearhis unit be reserved for him so he will not have to walk very far to getto his apartment. It is a violation of andSection; 100.204 for the owneror manager of Progress Gardens to refuse to make this accommodation. Withouta reserved space, John might be unable to live in Progress Gardens at allor, when he has to park in a space far from his unit, might have greatdifficulty getting from his car to his apartment unit. The accommodationtherefore is necessary to afford John an equal opportunity to use and enjoya dwelling. The accommodation is reasonable because it is feasible andpractical under the circumstances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Design and construction requirements.</ITAG>(a) Covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991shall be designed and constructed to have at least one building entranceon an accessible route unless it is impractical to do so because of theterrain or unusual characteristics of the site. For purposes of this section,a covered multifamily dwelling shall be deemed to be designed and constructedfor first occupancy on or before March 13, 1991 if they are occupied bythat date or if the last building permit or renewal thereof for the coveredmultifamily dwellings is issued by a State, County or local governmenton or before January 13, 1990. The burden of establishing impracticalitybecause of terrain or unusual site characteristics is on the person orpersons who designed or constructed the housing facility.(b) The application of paragraph (a) of this section may be illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1):</T3> A real estate developer plans to construct six coveredmultifamily dwelling units on a site with a hilly terrain. Because of theterrain, it will be necessary to climb a long and steep stairway in orderto enter the dwellings. Since there is no practical way to provide an accessibleroute to any of the dwellings, one need not be provided.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2):</T3> A real estate developer plans to construct a buildingconsisting of 10 units of multifamily housing on a waterfront site thatfloods frequently. Because of this unusual characteristic of the site,the builder plans to construct the building on stilts. It is customaryfor housing in the geographic area where the site is located to be builton stilts. The housing may lawfully be constructed on the proposed siteon stilts even though this means that there will be no practical way toprovide an accessible route to the building entrance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3):</T3> A real estate developer plans to construct a multifamilyhousing facility on a particular site. The developer would like the facilityto be built on the site to contain as many units as possible. Because ofthe configuration and terrain of the site, it is possible to constructa building with 105 units on the site provided the site does not have anaccessible route leading to the building entrance. It is also possibleto construct a building on the site with an accessible route leading tothe building entrance. However, such a building would have no more than100 dwelling units. The building to be constructed on the site must havea building entrance on an accessible route because it is not impracticalto provide such an entrance because of the terrain or unusual characteristicsof the site.</ITAG>(c) All covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13,1991 with a building entrance on an accessible route shall be designedand constructed in such a manner that_(1) The public and common use areas are readily accessible to and usableby handicapped persons;(2) All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premisesare sufficiently wide to allow passage by handicapped persons in wheelchairs;and(3) All premises within covered multifamily dwelling units contain thefollowing features of adaptable design:(i) An accessible route into and through the covered dwelling unit;(ii) Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmentalcontrols in accessible locations;(iii) Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grabbars around the toilet, tub, shower, stall and shower seat, where suchfacilities are provided; and(iv) Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchaircan maneuver about the space.(d) The application of paragraph (c) of this section may be illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1): </T3>A developer plans to construct a 100 unit condominiumapartment building with one elevator. In accordance with paragraph (a),the building has at least one accessible route leading to an accessibleentrance. All 100 units are covered multifamily dwelling units and theyall must be designed and constructed so that they comply with the accessibilityrequirements of paragraph (c) of this section. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2):</T3> A developer plans to construct 30 garden apartmentsin a three story building. The building will not have an elevator. Thebuilding will have one accessible entrance which will be on the first floor.Since the building does not have an elevator, only the ``ground floor''units are covered multifamily units. The ``ground floor'' is the firstfloor because that is the floor that has an accessible entrance. All ofthe dwelling units on the first floor must meet the accessibility requirementsof paragraph (c) of this section and must have access to at least one ofeach type of public or common use area available for residents in the building.</ITAG>(e) Compliance with the appropriate requirements of ANSI A117.1-1986 sufficesto satisfy the requirements of paragraph (c)(3) of this section. (f) Compliance with a duly enacted law of a State or unit of general localgovernment that includes the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (c) ofthis section satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (c) of thissection. (g)(1) It is the policy of HUD to encourage States and units of generallocal government to include, in their existing procedures for the reviewand approval of newly constructed covered multifamily dwellings, determinationsas to whether the design and construction of such dwellings are consistentwith paragraphs (a) and (c) of this section. (2) A State or unit of general local government may review and approvenewly constructed multifamily dwellings for the purpose of making determinationsas to whether the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (c) of this sectionare met. (h) Determinations of compliance or noncompliance by a State or a unitof general local government under paragraph (f) or (g) of this sectionare not conclusive in enforcement proceedings under the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct. (i) This subpart does not invalidate or limit any law of a State or politicalsubdivision of a State that requires dwellings to be designed and constructedin a manner that affords handicapped persons greater access than is requiredby this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Housing for Older Persons</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;100.300 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>The purpose of this subpart is to effectuate the exemption in the FairHousing Amendments Act of 1988 that relates to housing for older persons.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.301 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exemption. </ITAG>(a) The provisions regarding familial status in this part do not applyto housing which satisfies the requirements of andSection;andSection; 100.302,100.303 or andSection; 100.304. (b) Nothing in this part limits the applicability of any reasonable local,State, or Federal restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupantspermitted to occupy a dwelling. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.302 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State and Federal elderly housing programs. </ITAG>The provisions regarding familial status in this part shall not apply tohousing provided under any Federal or State program that the Secretarydetermines is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons,as defined in the State or Federal program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.303 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">62 or over housing. </ITAG>(a) The provisions regarding familial status in this part shall not applyto housing intended for, and solely occupied by, persons 62 years of ageor older. Housing satisfies the requirements of this section even though:(1) There are persons residing in such housing on September 13, 1988 whoare under 62 years of age, provided that all new occupants are persons62 years of age or older;(2) There are unoccupied units, provided that such units are reserved foroccupancy by persons 62 years of age or over; (3) There are units occupied by employees of the housing (and family membersresiding in the same unit) who are under 62 years of age provided theyperform substantial duties directly related to the management or maintenanceof the housing. (b) The following examples illustrate the application of paragraph (a)of this section: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1): </T3>John and Mary apply for housing at the Vista Heightsapartment complex which is an elderly housing complex operated for persons62 years of age or older. John is 62 years of age. Mary is 59 years ofage. If Vista Heights wishes to retain its ``62 or over'' exemption itmust refuse to rent to John and Mary because Mary is under 62 years ofage. However, if Vista Heights does rent to John and Mary, it might qualifyfor the ``55 or over'' exemption in andSection; 100.304. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2): </T3>The Blueberry Hill retirement community has 100 dwellingunits. On September 13, 1988, 15 units were vacant and 35 units were occupiedwith at least one person who is under 62 years of age. The remaining 50units were occupied by persons who were all 62 years of age or older. BlueberryHill can qualify for the ``62 or over'' exemption as long as all unitsthat were occupied after September 13, 1988 are occupied by persons whowere 62 years of age or older. The people under 62 in the 35 units previouslydescribed need not be required to leave for Blueberry Hill to qualify forthe ``62 or over'' exemption. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.304 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">55 or over housing. </ITAG>(a) The provisions regarding familial status shall not apply to housingintended and operated for occupancy by at least one person 55 years ofage or older per unit, <T3>Provided That</T3> the housing satisfies the requirements of andSection;100.304 (b)(1) <T3>or </T3>(b)(2) <T3>and </T3>the requirements of andSection; 100.304(c).(b)(1) The housing facility has significant facilities and services specificallydesigned to meet the physical or social needs of older persons. ``Significantfacilities and services specifically designed to meet the physical or socialneeds of older persons'' include, but are not limited to, social and recreationalprograms, continuing education, information and counseling, recreational,homemaker, outside maintenance and referral services, an accessible physicalenvironment, emergency and preventive health care of programs, congregatedining facilities, transportation to facilitate access to social services,and services designed to encourage and assist residents to use the servicesand facilities available to them (the housing facility need not have allof these features to qualify for the exemption under this subparagraph);or(2) It is not practicable to provide significant facilities and servicesdesigned to meet the physical or social needs of older persons <T3>and </T3>the housing facility is necessary to provide important housingopportunities for older persons. In order to satisfy this paragraph (b)(2)of this section the owner or manager of the housing facility must demonstratethrough credible and objective evidence that the provision of significantfacilities and services designed to meet the physical or social needs ofolder persons would result in depriving older persons in the relevant geographicarea of needed and desired housing. The following factors, among others,are relevant in meeting the requirements of this paragraph (b)(2) of thissection_(i) Whether the owner or manager of the housing facility has endeavoredto provide significant facilities and services designed to meet the physicalor social needs of older persons either by the owner or by some other entity.Demonstrating that such services and facilities are expensive to provideis not alone sufficient to demonstrate that the provision of such servicesis not practicable.(ii) The amount of rent charged, if the dwellings are rented, or the priceof the dwellings, if they are offered for sale.(iii) The income range of the residents of the housing facility.(iv) The demand for housing for older persons in the relevant geographicarea.(v) The range of housing choices for older persons within the relevantgeographic area.(vi) The availability of other similarly priced housing for older personsin the relevant geographic area. If similarly priced housing for olderpersons with significant facilities and services is reasonably availablein the relevant geographic area then the housing facility does not meetthe requirements of this paragraph (b)(2) of this section.(vii) The vacancy rate of the housing facility.(c)(1) At least 80% of the units in the housing facility are occupied byat least one person 55 years of age or older per unit <T3>except that </T3>a newly constructed housing facility for first occupancyafter March 12, 1989 need not comply with this paragraph (c)(1) of thissection until 25% of the units in the facility are occupied; and(2) The owner or manager of a housing facility publishes and adheres topolicies and procedures which demonstrate an intent by the owner or managerto provide housing for persons 55 years of age or older. The followingfactors, among others, are relevant in determining whether the owner ormanager of a housing facility has complied with the requirements of thisparagraph (c)(2) of this section:(i) The manner in which the housing facility is described to prospectiveresidents.(ii) The nature of any advertising designed to attract prospective residents.(iii) Age verification procedures.(iv) Lease provisions.(v) Written rules and regulations.(vi) Actual practices of the owner or manager in enforcing relevant leaseprovisions and relevant rules or regulations.(d) Housing satisfies the requirements of this section even though:(1) On September 13, 1988, under 80% of the occupied units in the housingfacility are occupied by at least one person 55 years of age or older perunit, provided that at least 80% of the units that are occupied by newoccupants after September 13, 1988 are occupied by at least one person55 years of age or older.(2) There are unoccupied units, provided that at least 80% of such unitsare reserved for occupancy by at least one person 55 years of age or over.(3) There are units occupied by employees of the housing (and family membersresiding in the same unit) who are under 55 years of age provided theyperform substantial duties directly related to the management or maintenanceof the housing.(e) The application of this section may be illustrated by the followingexamples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1: </T3>A. John and Mary apply for housing at the Valley Heightsapartment complex which is a 100 unit housing complex that is operatedfor persons 55 years of age or older in accordance with all the requirementsof this section. John is 56 years of age. Mary is 50 years of age. Eighty(80) units are occupied by at least one person who is 55 years of age orolder. Eighteen (18) units are occupied exclusively by persons who areunder 55. Among the units occupied by new occupants after September 13,1988 were 18 units occupied exclusively by persons who are under 55. Two(2) units are vacant. At the time John and Mary apply for housing, ValleyHeights qualifies for the ``55 or over'' exemption because 82% of the occupiedunits (80/98) at Valley Heights are occupied by at least one person 55years old or older. If John and Mary are accepted for occupancy, then 81out of the 99 occupied units (82%) will be occupied by at least one personwho is 55 years of age or older and Valley Heights will continue to qualifyfor the ``55 or over'' exemption.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. If only 78 out of the 98 occupied units had been occupied by atleast one person 55 years of age or older, Valley Heights would still qualifyfor the exemption, but could not rent to John or Mary if they were bothunder 55 without losing the exemption.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2: </T3>Green Meadow is a 1,000 unit retirement community thatprovides significant facilities and services specifically designed to meetthe physical or social needs of older persons. On September 13, 1988, GreenMeadow published and thereafter adhered to policies and procedures demonstratingan intent to provide housing for persons 55 years of age or older. On September13, 1988, 100 units were vacant and 300 units were occupied only by peoplewho were under 55 years old. Consequently, on September 13, 1988 67% ofthe Green Meadow's occupied units (600 out of 900) were occupied by atat least one person 55 years of age or older. Under paragraph (d)(1) ofthis section, Green Meadow qualifies for the ``55 or over'' exemption eventhough, on September 13, 1988, under 80% of the occupied units in the housingfacility were occupied by at least one person 55 years of age or olderper unit, provided that at least 80% of the units that were occupied afterSeptember 13, 1988 are occupied by at least one person 55 years of ageor older. Under paragraph (d) of this section, Green Meadow qualifies forthe ``55 or over'' exemption, even though it has unoccupied units, providedthat at least 80% of its unoccupied units are reserved for occupancy byat least one person 55 years of age or over.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 3: </T3>Waterfront Gardens is a 200 unit housing facility tobe constructed after March 12, 1989. The owner and manager of WaterfrontGardens intends to operate the new facility in accordance with the requirementsof this section. Waterfront Gardens need not comply with the requirementin paragraph (c)(1) of this section that at least 80% of the occupied unitsbe occupied by at least one person 55 years of age or older per unit <T3>until </T3>50 units (25%) are occupied. When the 50th unit is occupied,then 80% of the 50 occupied units (<T3>i.e., </T3>40 units) must be occupied by at least one person who is55 years of age or older for Waterfront Gardens to qualify for the ``55or over'' exemption.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Interference, Coercion or Intimidation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.400 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibited interference, coercion or intimidation. </ITAG>(a) This subpart provides the Department's interpretation of the conductthat is unlawful under section 818 of the Fair Housing Act. (b) It shall be unlawful to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interferewith any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of thatperson having exercised or enjoyed, or on account of that person havingaided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, anyright granted or protected by this part. (c) Conduct made unlawful under this section includes, but is not limitedto, the following: (1) Coercing a person, either orally, in writing, or by other means, todeny or limit the benefits provided that person in connection with thesale or rental of a dwelling or in connection with a residential real estate-relatedtransaction because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin. (2) Threatening, intimidating or interfering with persons in their enjoymentof a dwelling because of the race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin of such persons, or of visitors or associatesof such persons. (3) Threatening an employee or agent with dismissal or an adverse employmentaction, or taking such adverse employment action, for any effort to assista person seeking access to the sale or rental of a dwelling or seekingaccess to any residential real estate-related transaction, because of therace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national originof that person or of any person associated with that person. (4) Intimidating or threatening any person because that person is engagingin activities designed to make other persons aware of, or encouraging suchother persons to exercise, rights granted or protected by this part. (5) Retaliating against any person because that person has made a complaint,testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in a proceeding underthe Fair Housing Act. 4. Part 103 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 103_FAIR HOUSING_COMPLAINT PROCESSING </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.1 Purpose and applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.5 Other civil rights authorities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.9 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Complaints </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.10 Submission of information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.15 Who may file complaints. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.20 Persons against whom complaints may be filed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.25 Where to file complaints. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.30 Form and content of complaint. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.40 Date of filing of complaint. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.42 Amendment of complaint. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.45 Service of notice on aggrieved person. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.50 Notification of respondent; joinder of additional or substituterespondents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.55 Answer to complaint. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Referral of Complaints to State and Local Agencies </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.100 Notification and referral to substantially equivalent Stateor local agencies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.105 Cessation of action on referred complaints. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.110 Reactivation of referred complaints. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.115 Notification upon reactivation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Investigation Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.200 Investigations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.205 Systemic processing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.215 Conduct of investigation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.220 Cooperation of Federal, State and local agencies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.225 Completion of the investigation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.230 Final investigative report. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Conciliation Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.300 Conciliation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.310 Conciliation agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.315 Relief sought for aggrieved persons. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.320 Provisions sought for the public interest. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.325 Termination of conciliation efforts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.330 Prohibitions and requirements with respect to disclosure ofinformation obtained during conciliation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.335 Review of compliance with conciliation agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Issuance of Charge </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.400 Reasonable cause determination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.405 Issuance of charge. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.410 Election of civil action or provision of administrative proceeding.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Prompt Judicial Action</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.500 Prompt judicial action. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart H_Other Action </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.510 Other action by HUD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.515 Action by other agencies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. 3600-3620;section 7(d), Department of HUD Act, 42 U.S.C. 3535(d). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and applicability. </ITAG>(a) This part contains the procedures established by the Department ofHousing and Urban Development for the investigation and conciliation ofcomplaints under section 810 of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3610. (b) This part applies to: (1) Complaints alleging discriminatory housing practices because of race,color, religion, sex or national origin; and(2) Complaints alleging discriminatory housing practices on account ofhandicap or familial status occurring on or after March 12, 1989.(c) Part 104 governs the administrative proceedings before an administrativelaw judge adjudicating charges issued under andSection; 103.405.(d) The Department will reasonably accommodate persons with disabilitieswho are participants in complaint processing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other Civil Rights authorities.</ITAG>In addition to the Fair Housing Act, other civil rights authorities maybe applicable in a particular case. Thus, where a person charged with adiscriminatory housing practice in a complaint filed under section 810of the Fair Housing Act is also prohibited from engaging in similar practicesunder Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. 2000d-2000d-5),section 109 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C.5309), Executive Order 11063 of November 20, 1962, on Equal Opportunityin Housing (27 FR 11527-11530, November 24, 1962), section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794), the Age Discrimination Act (42 U.S.C. 6101)or other applicable law, the person may also be subject to action by HUDor other Federal agencies under the rules, regulations, and proceduresprescribed under Title VI (24 CFR Parts 1 and 2), section 109 (24 CFR 570.602)),Executive Order 11063 (24 CFR Part 107), section 504 (24 CFR Part 8), orother applicable law.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part,<T3>Aggrieved person </T3>includes any person who:(a) Claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice; or(b) Believes that such person will be injured by a discriminatory housingpractice that is about to occur.<T3>Assistant Secretary </T3>means the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housingand Equal Opportunity in HUD.<T3>Attorney General </T3>means the Attorney General of the United States.<T3>Complainant </T3>means the person (including the Assistant Secretary)who files a complaint under this part.<T3>Conciliation </T3>means the attempted resolution of issues raised bya complaint, or by the investigation of a complaint, through informal negotiationsinvolving the aggrieved person, the respondent, and the Assistant Secretary.<T3>Conciliation agreement </T3>means a written agreement setting forththe resolution of the issues in conciliation.<T3>Discriminatory housing practice </T3>means an act that is unlawfulunder section 804, 805, 806 or 818 of the Fair Housing Act, as describedin Part 100.<T3>Dwelling </T3>means any building, structure, or portion thereof whichis occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence byone or more families, or any vacant land which is offered for sale or leasefor the construction or location thereon of any such building, structure,or portion thereof.<T3>Fair Housing Act </T3>means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968,42 U.S.C. 3600-3620.<T3>General Counsel </T3>means the General Counsel of HUD.<T3>HUD </T3>means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.<T3>Person </T3>includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustee in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers andfiduciaries.<T3>Personal service </T3>means handing a copy of the document to the personto be served or leaving a copy of the document with a person of suitableage and discretion at the place of business, residence or usual place ofabode of the person to be served.<T3>Receipt of notice </T3>means the day that personal service is completedby handing or delivering a copy of the document to an appropriate personor the date that a document is delivered by certified mail.<T3>Respondent </T3>means:(a) The person or other entity accused in a complaint of a discriminatoryhousing practice; and(b) Any other person or entity identified in the course of investigationand notified as required under andSection; 103.50.<T3>State </T3>means any of the several States, the District of Columbia,the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any of the territories and possessionsof the United States.<T3>Substantially equivalent State or local agency </T3>means a State orlocal agency certified by HUD under 24 CFR Part 115 (including agenciescertified for interim referrals).<T3>To rent </T3>includes to lease, to sublease, to let, and otherwiseto grant for consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by theoccupant.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Complaints</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission of information.</ITAG>(a) The Assistant Secretary will receive information concerning allegeddiscriminatory housing practices from any person. Where the informationconstitutes a complaint within the meaning of the Fair Housing Act andthis part and is furnished by an aggrieved person, it will be consideredto be filed under andSection; 103.40. Where additional information is requiredfor purposes of perfecting a complaint under the Fair Housing Act, HUDwill advise what additional information is needed and will provide appropriateassistance in the filing of the complaint.(b) HUD may also concurrently initiate compliance reviews under other appropriatecivil rights authorities, such as E.O. 11063 on Equal Opportunity in Housing,Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, section 109 of the Housing andCommunity Development Act of 1974, section 504 of the Rehabilitation Actof 1973 or the Age Discrimination Act (42 U.S.C. 6101). The informationmay also be made available to any other Federal, State or local agencyhaving an interest in the matter. In making available such information,steps will be taken to protect the confidentiality of any informant orcomplainant where desired by the informant or complainant.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Who may file complaints.</ITAG>Any aggrieved person or the Assistant Secretary may file a complaint nolater than one year after an alleged discriminatory housing practice hasoccurred or terminated. The complaint may be filed with the assistanceof an authorized representative of an aggrieved person, including any organizationacting on behalf of an aggrieved person.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Persons against whom complaints may be filed.</ITAG>(a) A complaint may be filed against any person alleged to be engaged,to have engaged, or to be about to engage, in a discriminatory housingpractice.(b) A complaint may also be filed against any person who directs or controls,or has the right to direct or control, the conduct of another person withrespect to any aspect of the sale, rental, advertising or financing ofdwellings or the provision of brokerage services relating to the sale orrental of dwellings if that other person, acting within the scope of hisor her authority as employee or agent of the directing or controlling person,is engaged, has engaged, or is about to engage, in a discriminatory housingpractice.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Where to file complaints.</ITAG>(a)(1) Aggrieved persons may file complaints in person with, or by mailto: Fair Housing, Department of Housing and Urban Development, WashingtonDC 20410, or any HUD Office. A list of Regional Offices (with addressesand areas of jurisdiction) and Field Offices (with addresses) is containedin an appendix to this part.(2) Aggrieved persons may provide information to be contained in a complaintby telephone to any Regional or Field Office of HUD. HUD will reduce informationprovided by telephone to writing on the prescribed complaint form and sendthe form to the aggrieved person to be signed and affirmed as providedin andSection; 103.30(a).(3) Complaints may be filed in person or by mail with any substantiallyequivalent State or local agency. Complaints filed with a substantiallyequivalent State or local agency will be considered to be complaints dualfiled with the agency under its own law, and with HUD under the Fair HousingAct.(b) Generally, complaints will be processed through HUD's Regional Administratorhaving jurisdiction in the State in which the alleged discriminatory housingpractice occurred. However, where a complaint has been identified for systemicprocessing under andSection; 103.205, that complaint may be processed inthe Office of the Assistant Secretary in Washington, DC.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Form and content of complaint.</ITAG>(a) Each complaint must be in writing and must be signed and affirmed bythe aggrieved person filing the complaint or, if the complaint is filedby HUD, by the Assistant Secretary. The signature and affirmation may bemade at any time during the investigation. The affirmation shall state:``I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct.''(b) The Assistant Secretary may require complaints to be made on prescribedforms. Complaint forms will be available in any HUD office or in any substantiallyequivalent State or local agency. Notwithstanding any requirement for useof a prescribed form, HUD will accept any written statement which substantiallysets forth the allegations of a discriminatory housing practice under theFair Housing Act (including any such statement filed with a substantiallyequivalent State or local agency) as a Fair Housing Act complaint. Personnelin these offices will provide appropriate assistance in filling out formsand in filing a complaint.(c) Each complaint must contain substantially the following information:(1) The name and address of the aggrieved person.(2) The name and address of the respondent.(3) A description and the address of the dwelling which is involved, ifappropriate.(4) A concise statement of the facts, including pertinent dates, constitutingthe alleged discriminatory housing practice.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Date of filing of complaint.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, a complaint isfiled when it is received by HUD, or dual filed with HUD through a substantiallyequivalent State or local agency, in a form that reasonably meets the standardsof andSection; 103.30.(b) The Assistant Secretary may determine that a complaint is filed forthe purposes of the one-year period for the filing of complaints, uponthe submission of written information (including information provided bytelephone and reduced to writing by an employee of HUD) identifying theparties and describing generally the alleged discriminatory housing practice.(c) Where a complaint alleges a discriminatory housing practice that iscontinuing, as manifested in a number of incidents of such conduct, thecomplaint will be timely if filed within one year of the last alleged occurrenceof that practice.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.42 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendment of complaint.</ITAG>Complaints may be reasonably and fairly amended at any time. Such amendmentsmay include, but are not limited to: amendments to cure technical defectsor omissions, including failure to sign or affirm a complaint, to clarifyor amplify the allegations in a complaint, or to join additional or substituterespondents. Except for the purposes of notifying respondents under andSection;103.50, amended complaints will be considered as having been made as ofthe original filing date.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Service of notice on aggrieved person.</ITAG>Upon the filing of a complaint, the Assistant Secretary will notify, bycertified mail or personal service, each aggrieved person on whose behalfthe complaint was filed. The notice will:(a) Acknowledge the filing of the complaint and state the date that thecomplaint was accepted for filing.(b) Include a copy of the complaint.(c) Advise the aggrieved person of the time limits applicable to complaintprocessing and of the procedural rights and obligations of the aggrievedperson under this part and Part 104.(d) Advise the aggrieved person of his or her right to commence a civilaction under section 813 of the Fair Housing Act in an appropriate UnitedStates District Court, not later than two years after the occurrence ortermination of the alleged discriminatory housing practice. The noticewill state that the computation of this two-year period excludes any timeduring which a proceeding is pending under this part or Part 104 with respectto a complaint or charge based on the alleged discriminatory housing practice.The notice will also state that the time period includes the time duringwhich an action arising from a breach of a conciliation agreement undersection 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Act is pending.(e) Advise the aggrieved person that retaliation against any person becausehe or she made a complaint or testified, assisted, or participated in aninvestigation or conciliation under this part or an administrative proceedingunder Part 104, is a discriminatory housing practice that is prohibitedunder section 818 of the Fair Housing Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification of respondent; joinder of additional or substitute respondents.</ITAG>(a) Within ten days of the filing of a complaint under andSection; 103.40or the filing of an amended complaint under andSection; 103.42, the AssistantSecretary will serve a notice on each respondent by certified mail or bypersonal service. A person who is not named as a respondent in a complaint,but who is identified in the course of the investigation under SubpartD of this part as a person who is alleged to be engaged, to have engaged,or to be about to engage in the discriminatory housing practice upon whichthe complaint is based may be joined as an additional or substitute respondentby service of a notice on the person under this section within ten daysof the identification.(b)(1) The notice will identify the alleged discriminatory housing practiceupon which the complaint is based, and include a copy of the complaint.(2) The notice will state the date that the complaint was accepted forfiling.(3) The notice will advise the respondent of the time limits applicableto complaint processing under this part and of the procedural rights andobligations of the respondent under this part and Part 104, including theopportunity to submit an answer to the complaint within 10 days of thereceipt of the notice.(4) The notice will advise the respondent of the aggrieved person's rightto commence a civil action under section 813 of the Fair Housing Act inan appropriate United States District Court, not later than two years afterthe occurrence or termination of the alleged discriminatory housing practice.The notice will state that the computation of this two-year period excludesany time during which a proceeding is pending under this part or Part 104with respect to a complaint or charge based on the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice. The notice will also state that the time period includesthe time during which an action arising from a breach of a conciliationagreement under section 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Act is pending.(5) If the person is not named in the complaint, but is being joined asan additional or substitute respondent, the notice will explain the basisfor the Assistant Secretary's belief that the joined person is properlyjoined as a respondent.(6) The notice will advise the respondent that retaliation against anyperson because he or she made a complaint or testified, assisted or participatedin an investigation or conciliation under this part or an administrativeproceeding under Part 104, is a discriminatory housing practice that isprohibited under section 818 of the Fair Housing Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.55 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Answer to complaint.</ITAG>(a) The respondent may file an answer not later than ten days after receiptof the notice described in andSection; 103.50. The respondent may assertany defense that might be available to a defendent in a court of law. Theanswer must be signed and affirmed by the respondent. The affirmation muststate: ``I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is trueand correct.''(b) An answer may be reasonably and fairly amended at any time with theconsent of the Assistant Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Referral of Complaints to State and Local Agencies </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.100 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification and referral to substantially equivalent State or localagencies.</ITAG>(a) Whenever a complaint alleges a discriminatory housing practice thatis within the jurisdiction of a substantially equivalent State or localagency and the agency is certified or may accept interim referrals under24 CFR Part 115 with regard to the alleged discriminatory housing practice,the Assistant Secretary will notify the agency of the filing of the complaintand refer the complaint to the agency for further processing before HUDtakes any action with respect to the complaint. The Assistant Secretarywill notify the State or local agency of the referral by certified mail.(b) The Assistant Secretary will notify the aggrieved person and the respondent,by certified mail or personal service, of the notification and referralunder paragraph (a) of this section. The notice will advise the aggrievedperson and the respondent of the aggrieved person's right to commence acivil action under section 813 of the Fair Housing Act in an appropriateUnited States District Court, not later than two years after the occurrenceor termination of the alleged discriminatory housing practice. The noticewill state that the computation of this two-year period excludes any timeduring which a proceeding is pending under this part or Part 104 with respectto complaint or charge based on the alleged discriminatory housing practice.The notice will also state that the time period includes the time duringwhich an action arising from a breach of a conciliation agreement undersection 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Act is pending.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cessation of action on referred complaints.</ITAG>(a) After a complaint is referred under andSection; 103.100, the AssistantSecretary will take no futher action with respect to the complaint, exceptas provided in andSection; 103.110.(b) A referral under andSection; 103.100 does not prohibit the AssistantSecretary from taking appropriate action to review or investigate mattersin the complaint that raise issues cognizable under other civil rightsauthorities applicable to departmental programs (see andSection; 103.5).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.110 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reactivation of referred complaints.</ITAG>The Assistant Secretary may reactivate a complaint referred under andSection;103.100 for processing by HUD if:(a) The substantially equivalent State or local agency consents or requeststhe reactivation;(b) The Assistant Secretary determines that, with respect to the allegeddiscriminatory housing practice, the agency no longer qualifies for certificationas a substantially equivalent State or local agency and may not acceptinterim referrals; or(c) The substantially equivalent State or local agency has failed to commenceproceedings with respect to the complaint within 30 days of the date thatit received the notification and referral of the complaint; or the agencycommenced proceedings within this 30-day period, but the Assistant Secretarydetermines that the agency has failed to carry the proceedings forwardwith reasonable promptness. HUD will not reactivate a complaint under thisparagraph (c) of this section until the appropriate HUD Regional Officehas conferred with the agency to determine the reason for the delay inprocessing of the complaint. If the Assistant Secretary believes that theagency will proceed expeditiously following the conference, the AssistantSecretary may leave the complaint with the agency for a reasonable time,notwithstanding the expiration of the 30-day period or a previous failureto carry the proceedings forward with reasonable promptness.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.115 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification upon reactivation.</ITAG>(a) Whenever a complaint referred to a State or local fair housing agencyunder andSection; 103.100 is reactivated under andSection; 103.110, the AssistantSecretary will notify the substantially equivalent State or local agency,the aggrieved person and the respondent of HUD's reactivation. The notificationwill be made by certified mail or personal service.(b) The notification to the respondent and the aggrieved person will:(1) Advise the aggrieved person and the respondent of the time limits applicableto complaint processing and the procedural rights and obligations of theaggrieved person and the respondent under this part and Part 104.(2) State that HUD will process the complaint under the Fair Housing Actand that the State or local agency to which the complaint was referredmay continue to process the complaint under State or local law.(3) Advise the aggrieved person and the respondent of the aggrieved person'sright to commence a civil action under section 813 of the Fair HousingAct in an appropriate United States District Court, not later than twoyears after the occurrence or termination of the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice. The notice will state that the computation of this two-yearperiod excludes any time during which a proceeding is pending under thispart or Part 104 with respect to a complaint or charge based on the allegeddiscriminatory housing practice under Part 104. The notices will also statethat the time period includes the time during which an action arising froma breach of conciliation agreement under section 814(b)(2) of the FairHousing Act is pending.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart D_Investigation Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.200</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Investigations.</ITAG>(a) Upon the filing of a complaint under andSection; 103.40, the AssistantSecretary will initiate an investigation. The purpose of an investigationare:(1) To obtain information concerning the events or transactions that relateto the alleged discriminatory housing practice identified in the complaint.(2) To document policies or practices of the respondent involved in thealleged discriminatory housing practice raised in the complaint.(3) To develop factual data necessary for the General Counsel to make adetermination under andSection; 103.400 whether reasonable cause exists tobelieve that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is aboutto occur, and to take other actions provided under this part.(b) Upon the written direction of the Assistant Secretary, HUD may initatean investigation of housing practices to determine whether a complaintshould be filed under Subpart B of this part. Such investigations willbe conducted in accordance with the procedures described under this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Systemic processing.</ITAG>Where the Assistant Secretary determines that the alleged discriminatorypractices contained in a complaint are pervasive or institutional in nature,or that the processing of the complaint will involve complex issues, novelquestions of fact or law, or will affect a large number of persons, theAssistant Secretary may identify the complaint for systemic processing.This determination can be based on the face of the complaint or on informationgathered in connection with an investigation. Systemic investigations mayfocus not only on documenting facts involved in the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice that is the subject of the complaint but also on reviewof other policies and procedures related to matters under investigation,to make sure that they also comply with the nondiscrimination requirementsof the Fair Housing Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.215</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conduct of investigation.</ITAG>(a) In conducting investigations under this part, the Assistant Secretarywill seek the voluntary cooperation of all persons to obtain access topremises, records, documents, individuals, and other possible sources ofinformation; to examine, record, and copy necessary materials; and to takeand record testimony or statements of persons reasonably necessary forthe furtherance of the investigation.(b) The Assistant Secretary and the respondent may conduct discovery inaid of the investigation by the same methods and to the same extent thatparties may conduct discovery in an administrative proceeding under 24CFR Part 104, except that the Assistant Secretary shall have the powerto issue subpoenas described in 24 CFR 104.590 in support of the investigationor at the request of the respondent. Subpoenas issued by the AssistantSecretary must be approved by the General Counsel as to their legalitybefore issuance.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.220</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cooperation of Federal, State and local agencies.</ITAG>The Assistant Secretary, in processing Fair Housing Act complaints, mayseek the cooperation and utilize the services of Federal, State or localagencies, including any agency having regulatory or supervisory authorityover financial institutions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.225</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Completion of investigation.</ITAG>The investigation will remain open until the reasonable cause determinationis made under andSection; 103.400, or a conciliation agreement is executedand approved under andSection; 103.310. Unless it is impracticable to doso, the Assistant Secretary will complete the investigation of the allegeddiscriminatory housing practice within 100 days of the filing of the complaint(or where the Assistant Secretary reactivates the complaint, within 100days after service of the notice of reactivation under andSection; 103.115).If the Assistant Secretary is unable to complete the investigation withinthe 100-day period, the Assistant Secretary will notify the aggrieved personand the respondent, by certified mail or personal service, of the reasonsfor the delay.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.230</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Final investigative report.</ITAG>(a) At the end of each investigation under this part, the Assistant Secretarywill prepare a final investigative report. The investigative report willcontain:(1) The names and dates of contacts with witnesses, except that the reportwill not disclose the names of witnesses that request anonymity. HUD, however,may be required to disclose the names of such witnesses in the course ofan administrative hearing under Part 104 or a civil action under TitleVIII of the Fair Housing Act;(2) A summary and the dates of correspondence and other contacts with theaggrieved person and the respondent;(3) A summary description of other pertinent records;(4) A summary of witness statements; and(5) Answers to interrogatories.(b) A final investigative report may be amended at any time, if additionalevidence is discovered.(c) Notwithstanding the prohibitions and requirements with respect to disclosureof information contained in andSection; 103.330, the Assistant Secretarywill make information derived from an investigation, including the finalinvestigative report, available to the aggrieved person and the respondent.Following the completion of investigation, the Assistant Secretary shallnotify the aggrieved person and the respondent that the final investigationreport is complete and will be provided upon request.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart E_Conciliation Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.300 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conciliation.</ITAG>(a) During the period beginning with the filing of the complaint and endingwith the filing of a charge or the dismissal of the complaint by the GeneralCounsel, the Assistant Secretary will, to the extent feasible, attemptto conciliate the complaint.(b) In conciliating a complaint, HUD will attempt to achieve a just resolutionof the complaint and to obtain assurances that the respondent will satisfactorilyremedy any violations of the rights of the aggrieved person, and take suchaction as will assure the elimination of discriminatory housing practices,or the prevention of their occurrence, in the future.(c) Generally, officers, employees, and agents of HUD engaged in the investigationof a complaint under this part will not participate or advise in the conciliationof the same complaint or in any factually related complaint. Where therights of the aggrieved party and the respondent can be protected and theprohibitions with respect to the disclosure of information can be observed,the investigator may suspend fact finding and engage in efforts to resolvethe complaint by conciliation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.310 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conciliation agreement.</ITAG>(a) The terms of a settlement of a complaint will be reduced to a writtenconciliation agreement. The conciliation agreement shall seek to protectthe interests of the aggrieved person, other persons similarly situated,and the public interest. The types of relief that may be sought for theaggrieved person are described in andSection; 103.315. The provisions thatmay be sought for the vindication of the public interest are describedin andSection; 103.320.(b)(1) The agreement must be executed by the respondent and the complainant.The agreement is subject to the approval of the Assistant Secretary, whowill indicate approval by signing the agreement. The Assistant Secretarywill approve an agreement and, if the Assistant Secretary is the complainant,will execute the agreement, only if:(i) The complainant and the respondent agree to the relief accorded theaggrieved person;(ii) The provisions of the agreement will adequately vindicate the publicinterest; and (iii) If the Assistant Secretary is the complainant, all aggrieved personsnamed in the complaint are satisfied with the relief provided to protecttheir interests.(2) The General Counsel may issue a charge under andSection; 103.405 if theaggrieved person and the respondent have executed a conciliation agreementthat has not been approved by the Assistant Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.315 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relief sought for aggrieved persons.</ITAG>(a) The following types of relief may be sought for aggrieved persons inconciliation:(1) Monetary relief in the form of damages, including damages caused byhumiliation or embarrassment, and attorney fees;(2) Other equitable relief including, but not limited to, access to thedwelling at issue, or to a comparable dwelling, the provision of servicesor facilities in connection with a dwelling, or other specific relief;or(3) Injunctive relief appropriate to the elimination of discriminatoryhousing practices affecting the aggrieved person or other persons.(b) The conciliation agreement may provide for binding arbitration of thedispute arising from the complaint. Arbitration may award appropriate reliefas described in paragraph (a) of this section. The aggrieved person andthe respondent may, in the conciliation agreement, limit the types of reliefthat may be awarded under binding arbitration.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.320 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Provisions sought for the public interest.</ITAG>The following are types of provisions may be sought for the vindicationof the public interest:(a) Elimination of discriminatory housing practices.(b) Prevention of future discriminatory housing practices.(c) Remedial affirmative activities to overcome discriminatory housingpractices.(d) Reporting requirements.(e) Monitoring and enforcement activities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.325 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of conciliation efforts.</ITAG>(a) HUD may terminate its efforts to conciliate the complaint if the respondentfails or refuses to confer with HUD; the aggrieved person or the respondentfail to make a good faith effort to resolve any dispute; or HUD finds,for any reason, that voluntary agreement is not likely to result.(b) Where the aggrieved person has commenced a civil action under an Actof Congress or a State law seeking relief with respect to the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice, and the trial in the action has commenced, HUD will terminateconciliation unless the court specifically requests assistance from theAssistant Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.330 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibitions and requirements with respect to disclosure of informationobtained during conciliation.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section and andSection; 103.230(c),nothing that is said or done in the course of conciliation under this partmay be made public or used as evidence in a subsequent administrative hearingunder Part 104 or in civil actions under Title VIII of the Fair HousingAct, without the written consent of the persons concerned.(b) Conciliation agreements shall be made public, unless the aggrievedperson and respondent request nondisclosure and the Assistant Secretarydetermines that disclosure is not required to further the purposes of theFair Housing Act. Notwithstanding a determination that disclosure of aconciliation agreement is not required, the Assistant Secretary may publishtabulated descriptions of the results of all conciliation efforts.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.335 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of compliance with conciliation agreements.</ITAG>HUD may, from time to time, review compliance with the terms of any conciliationagreement. Whenever HUD has reasonable cause to believe that a respondenthas breached a conciliation agreement, the General Counsel shall referthe matter to the Attorney General with a recommendation for the filingof a civil action under section 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Act for theenforcement of the terms of the conciliation agreement.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart F_Issuance of Charge</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.400 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reasonable cause determination.  </ITAG>(a) If a conciliation agreement under andSection; 103.310 has not been executedby the complainant and the respondent, and approved by the Assistant Secretary,the General Counsel, within the time limits set forth in paragraph (c)of this section, shall determine whether, based on the totality of thefactual circumstances known at the time of the decision, reasonable causeexists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred oris about to occur. The reasonable cause determination will be based solelyon the facts concerning the alleged discriminatory housing practice, providedby complainant and respondent and otherwise, disclosed during the investigation.In making the reasonable cause determination, the General Counsel shallconsider whether the facts concerning the alleged discriminatory housingpractice are sufficient to warrant the initiation of a civil action inFederal court. (1) In all cases not involving the legality of local zoning or land uselaws or ordinances:  (i) If the General Counsel determines that reasonable cause exists, theGeneral Counsel will immediately issue a charge under andSection; 103.405on behalf of the aggrieved person, and shall notify the aggrieved personand the respondent of this determination by certified mail or personalservice. (ii) If the General Counsel determines that no reasonable cause exists,the General Counsel shall: issue a short and plain written statement ofthe facts upon which the General Counsel has based the no reasonable causedetermination; dismiss the complaint; notify the aggrieved person and therespondent of the dismissal (including the written statement of facts)by certified mail or personal service; and make public disclosure of thedismissal. Public disclosure of the dismissal shall be by issuance of apress release, except that the respondent may request that no release bemade. Notwithstanding a respondent's request that no press release be issued,the fact of the dismissal, including the names of the parties, shall bepublic information available on request.  (2) If the General Counsel determines that the matter involves the legalityof local zoning or land use laws or ordinances, the General Counsel, inlieu of making a determination regarding reasonable cause, shall referthe investigative materials to the Attorney General for appropriate actionunder section 814(b)(1) of the Fair Housing Act, and shall notify the aggrievedperson and the respondent of this action by certified mail or personalservice. (b) The General Counsel may not issue a charge under paragraph (a) of thissection regarding an alleged discriminatory housing practice, if an aggrievedperson has commenced a civil action under an Act of Congress or a Statelaw seeking relief with respect to the alleged discriminatory housing practice,and the trial in the action has commenced. If a charge may not be issuedbecause of the commencement of such a trial, the General Counsel will sonotify the aggrieved person and the respondent by certified mail or personalservice. (c)(1) The General Counsel shall make the reasonable cause determinationafter the Assistant Secretary forwards the matter for consideration. TheGeneral Counsel shall make a reasonable cause determination within 100days after filing of the complaint (or where the Assistant Secretary hasreactivated a complaint, within 100 days after service of the notice ofreactivation under andSection; 103.115), unless it is impracticable to doso.   (2) If the General Counsel is unable to make the determination within the100-day period specified in paragraph (c)(1) of this section, the AssistantSecretary will notify the aggrieved person and the respondent, by certifiedmail or personal service, of the reasons for the delay.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.405 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of charge.  </ITAG>(a) A charge:  (1) Shall consist of a short and plain written statement of the facts uponwhich the General Counsel has found reasonable cause to believe that adiscriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur;  (2) Shall be based on the final investigative report; and  (3) Need not be limited to facts or grounds that are alleged in the complaintfiled under Subpart B of this part. If the charge is based on grounds thatare alleged in the complaint, HUD will not issue a charge with regard tothe grounds unless the record of the investigation demonstrates that therespondent has been given notice and an opportunity to respond to the allegation. (b) Within three business days after the issuance of the charge, the GeneralCounsel shall:  (1) Obtain a time and place for hearing from the Chief Docket Clerk ofthe Office of Administrative Law Judges;  (2) File the charge along with the notifications described in andSection;104.410(b) with the Office of Administrative Law Judges;  (3) Serve the charge and notifications in accordance with 24 CFR 104.40;and  (4) Notify the Assistant Secretary of the filing of the charge. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.410 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Election of civil action or provision of administrative proceeding.</ITAG>(a) If a charge is issued under andSection; 103.405, a complainant (includingthe Assistant Secretary, if HUD filed the complaint), a respondent, oran aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint is filed may elect, inlieu of an administrative proceeding under 24 CFR Part 104, to have theclaims asserted in the charge decided in a civil action under section 812(o)of the Fair Housing Act.  (b) The election must be made not later than 20 says after the receiptof service of the charge, or in the case of the Assistant Secretary, notlater than 20 days after service. The notice of the election must be filedwith the Chief Docket Clerk in the Office of Administrative Law Judgesand served on the General Counsel, the Assistant Secretary, the respondent,and the aggrieved persons on whose behalf the complaint was filed. Thenotification will be filed and served in accordance with the proceduresestablished under 24 CFR Part 104.(c) If an election is not made under this section, the General Counselwill maintain an administrative proceeding based on the charge in accordancewith the procedures under 24 CFR Part 104. (d) If an election is made under this section, the General Counsel shallimmediately notify and authorize the Attorney General to commence and maintaina civil action seeking relief under section 812(o) of the Fair HousingAct on behalf of the aggrieved person in an appropriate United States DistrictCourt. Such notification and authorization shall include transmission ofthe file in the case, including a copy of the final investigative reportand the charge, to the Attorney General. (e) The General Counsel shall be available for consultation concerningany legal issues raised by the Attorney General as to how best to proceedin the event that a new court decision or newly discovered evidence isregarded as relevant to the reasonable cause determination. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart G_Prompt Judicial Action </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prompt judicial action. </ITAG>(a) If at any time following the filing of a complaint, the General Counselconcludes that prompt judicial action is necessary to carry out the purposesof this part or 24 CFR Part 104, the General Counsel may authorize theAttorney General to commence a civil action for appropriate temporary orpreliminary relief pending final disposition of the complaint. To ensurethe prompt initiation of the civil action, the General Counsel will consultwith the Assistant Attorney General for the Civil Rights Division beforemaking the determination that prompt judicial action is necessary. Thecommencement of a civil action by the Attorney General under this sectionwill not affect the initiation or continuation of proceedings under thispart or administrative proceedings under Part 104. (b) If the General Counsel has reason to believe that a basis exists forthe commencement of proceedings against the respondent under section 814(a)of the Fair Housing Act (Pattern or Practice Cases), proceedings undersection 814(c) of the Fair Housing Act (Enforcement of Subpoenas), or proceedingsby any governmental licensing or supervisory authorities, the General Counselshall transmit the information upon which that belief is based to the AttorneyGeneral and to other appropriate authorities. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart H_Other Action </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.510</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other action by HUD. </ITAG>In addition to the actions described in andSection; 103.500, HUD may pursueone or more of the following courses of action: (a) Refer the matter to the Attorney General for appropriate action (e.g.,enforcement of criminal penalties under section 811(c) of the Act). (b) Take appropriate steps to initiate proceedings leading to the debarmentof the respondent under 24 CFR Part 24, or initiate other actions leadingto the imposition of administrative sanctions where HUD determines thatsuch actions are necessary to the effective operation and administrationof Federal programs or activities. (c) Take appropriate steps to initiate proceedings under: (1) 24 CFR Part 1, implementing Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964;(2) 24 CFR 570.912, implementing section 109 of the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1974;(3) 24 CFR Part 8, implementing section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of1973; (4) 24 CFR Part 107, implementing Executive Order 11063; or (5) The Age Discrimination Act, 42 U.S.C. 6101. (d) Inform any other Federal, State or local agency with an interest inthe enforcement of respondent's obligations with respect to nondiscriminationin housing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.515</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Action by other agencies. </ITAG>In accordance with section 808 (d) and (e) of the Fair Housing Act andExecutive Order No. 12259, other Federal agencies, including any agencyhaving regulatory or supervisory authority over financial institutions,are responsible for ensuring that their programs and activities relatingto housing and urban development are administered in a manner affirmativelyto further the goal of fair housing, and for cooperating with the AssistantSecretary in furthering the purposes of the Fair Housing Act. 5. A new Part 104 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 104_ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS UNDER SECTION 812 OF THE FAIRHOUSING ACT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart A_General information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.10 Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.20 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.30 Time computations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.40 Service and filing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart B_Administrative Law Judge</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.100 Designation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.110 Authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.120 Disqualification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.130 Ex Parte communications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.140 Separation of functions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart C_Parties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.200 In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.210 Representation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.220 Standards of conduct.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart D_Pleadings and motions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.400 In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.410 The Charge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.420 Answer to charge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.430 Request for intervention.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.440 Amendments and supplemental pleadings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.450 Motions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart E_Discovery</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.500 Discovery.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.510 Depositions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.520 Use of Deposition at hearings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.530 Written interrogatories.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.540 Production of documents and other evidence; entry upon landfor inspection and other purposes; and physical and mental examinations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.550 Admissions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.560 Supplementation of responses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.570 Protective orders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.580 Failure to make or cooperate in discovery.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart F_Subpoenas</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.590 Subpoenas.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart G_Prehearing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.600 Prehearing statements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.610 Prehearing conference.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.620 Settlement negotiations before a settlement judge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart H_Hearing procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.700 Date and place of hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.710 Conduct of hearings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.720 Waiver of right to appear.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.730 Evidence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.740 In camera and protective orders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.750 Exhibits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.760 Authenticity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.770 Stipulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.780 Record of hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.790 Arguments and briefs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.800 End of hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.810 Receipt of evidence following hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart I_Dismissals and Decisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.900 Dismissal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.910 Initial decision of administrative law judge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.920 Service of initial decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.925 Resolution of charge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.930 Final decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.935 Action upon issuance of final decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.940 Attorney's fees and costs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart J_Judicial Review and Enforcement of Final Decision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.950 Judicial Review of Final Decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.955 Enforcement of Final Decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);section 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C.3535(d)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart A_General Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Applicability. </T3>This part contains the rules of practice and procedureestablished by the Department of Housing and Urban Development for administrativeproceedings before an Administrative Law Judge adjudicating the claimsasserted in a charge issued under 24 CFR Part 103, where no party_the complainant,the respondent, or an aggrieved party_elects to have the claims decidedin a civil action under section 812(o) of the Fair Housing Act.(b) <T3>General application of rules. </T3>Hearings under this subpart shallbe conducted as expeditiously and inexpensively as possible, consistentwith the needs and rights of the parties to obtain a fair hearing and acomplete record.(c) <T3>Conduct of proceedings. </T3>The Department will reasonably accommodatepersons with disabilities who are participants in the hearing process orinterested members of the general public.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><T3>Aggrieved person </T3>includes any person who:(a) Claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice; or(b) Believes that such person will be injured by a discriminatory housingpractice that is about to occur.<T3>Attorney General </T3>means the Attorney General of the United States.<T3>Complainant </T3>means the person (including the Assistant Secretaryfor Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity) who filed the complaint under 24CFR Part 103.<T3>Complaint </T3>means a complaint filed under 24 CFR Part 103.<T3>Charge </T3>means the statement of facts issued under 24 CFR 103.405upon which HUD has found reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatoryhousing practice has occurred or is about to occur.<T3>Discriminatory housing practice </T3>means an act that is unlawfulunder section 804, 805, 806 or 818 of the Fair Housing Act.<T3>Fair Housing Act </T3>means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968,42 U.S.C. 3600-3620.<T3>General Counsel </T3>means the General Counsel of HUD.<T3>Hearing </T3>means that part of an administrative proceeding that involvesthe submission of evidence, either by oral presentation or written submission,and includes the submission of briefs and oral arguments on the evidenceand applicable law.<T3>HUD </T3>means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.<T3>Party </T3>means a person or agency named or admitted as a party toa proceeding. Party includes an aggrieved person who intervenes under andSection;104.430.<T3>Person </T3>includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers andfiduciaries.<T3>Personal service </T3>means handing a copy of the document to the personto be served or leaving a copy of the document with a person of suitableage and discretion at the place of business, residence or usual place ofabode of the person to be served.<T3>Prevailing party </T3>has the same meaning as the term has in section722 of the Revised Statutes of the United States (42 U.S.C. 1988).<T3>Respondent </T3>means the person accused in a charge of discriminatoryhousing practice.<T3>State </T3>means any of the several States, the District of Columbia,the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any of the territories and possessionsof the United States.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Time computations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>In computing time under this part, the time periodbegins the day following the act, event, or default and includes the lastday of the period, unless the last day is a Saturday, Sunday, or legalholiday observed by the Federal Government, in which case the time periodincludes the next business day. When the prescribed time period is sevendays or less, intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays shallbe excluded from the computation.(b) <T3>Modification of time periods. </T3>Except for time periods requiredby statute, the administrative law judge may enlarge or reduce any timeperiod required under this part where necessary to avoid prejudicing thepublic interest or the rights of the parties.(c) <T3>Entry of orders. </T3>In computing any time period involving the dateof the issuance of an order or decision by an administrative law judge,the date of issuance is the date the order or decision is served by theChief Docket Clerk.(d) <T3>Computation of time for delivery by mail. </T3>(1) Documents are notfiled until received by the Chief Docket Clerk. However, when documentsare filed by mail, three days shall be added to the prescribed time period.(2) Service is effected at the time of mailing.(3) When a party has the right or is required to take an action withina prescribed period after the service of a document upon the party, andthe document is served by mail, three days shall be added to the prescribedperiod.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service and filing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Generally. </T3>Copies of all filed documents shall be served on allparties of record. All filed documents shall clearly designate the docketnumber, if any, and title of the proceeding. All documents to be filedshall be delivered or mailed to the Chief Docket Clerk, Office of AdministrativeLaw Judges, Room 2158, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410.(b) <T3>By parties. </T3>Parties shall file all documents with the Office ofAdministrative Law Judges with a copy to all other parties of record. Serviceof documents upon any party may be made by personal service or by mailinga copy to the last known address. When a party is represented by an attorney,service shall be made upon the attorney. The person serving the documentshall certify to the manner and date of service.(c) <T3>By the Office of Administrative Law Judges. </T3>The Office of AdministrativeLaw Judges shall serve all notices, orders, decisions and all other documentsby mail to the last known address.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart B_Administrative Law Judge</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Designation.</ITAG>Proceedings under this part shall be presided over by an administrativelaw judge appointed under 5 U.S.C. 3105. The presiding administrative lawjudge shall be designated by the chief administrative law judge at HUD.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.110</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authority.</ITAG>The administrative law judge shall have all powers necessary to the conductof fair and impartial hearings including, but not limited to, the power:(a) To conduct hearings in accordance with this part.(b) To administer oaths and affirmations and examine witnesses.(c) To issue subpoenas in accordance with andSection; 104.590.(d) To rule on offers of proof and receive evidence.(e) To take depositions or have depositions taken when the ends of justicewould be served.(f) To regulate the course of the hearing and the conduct of parties andtheir counsel.(g) To hold conferences for the settlement or simplification of the issuesby consent of the parties.(h) To dispose of motions, procedural requests, and similar matters.(i) To make initial decisions as described under Subpart I of this Part.(j) To exercise such powers vested in the Secretary as are necessary andappropriate for the purpose of the hearing and conduct of the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.120 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disqualification.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Disqualification. </T3>If an administrative law judge finds that thereis a basis for his or her disqualification in a proceeding, the Administrativelaw judge shall withdraw from the proceeding. Withdrawal is accomplishedby entering a notice in the record and by providing a copy of the noticeto the chief administrative law judge.(b) <T3>Motion for recusal. </T3>If a party believes that the presiding administrativelaw judge should be disqualified in a proceeding for any reason, the partymay file a motion to recuse with the administrative law judge. The motionshall be supported by an affidavit setting forth the alleged grounds fordisqualification. The administrative law judge shall rule on the motion.If the administrative law judge denies the motion, the administrative lawjudge shall incorporate a written statement of the reasons for the denialin the record.(c) <T3>Redesignation of administrative law judge. </T3>If an administrativelaw judge is disqualified, the chief administrative law judge shall designateanother administrative law judge to preside over further proceedings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.130 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ex Parte communications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>An ex parte communication is any direct or indirect communicationconcerning the merits of a pending proceeding, made by a party in the absenceof any other party, to the administrative law judge assigned to the proceedingand which was neither on the record nor on reasonable prior notice to allparties. Ex parte communications do not include communications made forthe sole purpose of scheduling hearings, requesting extensions of time,or requesting information on the status of cases.(b) <T3>Prohibition. </T3>Ex parte communications are prohibited.(c) <T3>Procedure upon receipt. </T3>If the administrative law judge receivesan ex parte communication that the administrative law judge knows or hasreason to believe is prohibited, the administrative law judge shall promptlyplace the communication, or a written statement of the substance of thecommunication, in the record and shall furnish copies to all parties. Unauthorizedcommunications shall not be taken into consideration in deciding any matterin issue. Any party making a prohibited ex parte communication may be subjectto sanctions including, but not limited to, exclusion from the proceeding,and adverse ruling on the issue that is the subject of the prohibited communication.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.140 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Separation of functions.</ITAG>No officer, employee, or agent of the Federal Government engaged in theperformance of investigative, conciliatory, or prosecutorial functionsin connection with the proceeding shall, in that proceeding or any factuallyrelated proceeding under this part, participate or advise in the decisionof the administrative law judge, except as a witness or counsel duringthe proceedings.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Parties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.200 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">In general.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Parties. </T3>Parties to the proceeding include:(1) HUD. HUD files the charge under 24 CFR 103.405 seeking appropriaterelief for an aggrieved party and vindication of the public interest.(2) Respondent. A respondent is a person named in the charge issued under24 CFR 103.405 against whom relief is sought.(3) Intervenors. Any aggrieved person may file a request for interventionunder andSection; 104.430. Intervention shall be permitted if the requestis timely and;(i) The intervenor is the aggrieved person on whose behalf the charge isissued; or(ii) The intervenor is an aggrieved person who claims an interest in theproperty or transaction that is the subject of the charge and the dispositionof the charge may as a practical matter impair or impede the aggrievedperson's ability to protect that interest, unless the aggrieved personis adequately represented by the existing parties.(b) <T3>Rights of parties. </T3>Each party may appear in person, be representedby counsel, examine or cross-examine witnesses, introduce documentary orother relevant evidence into the record, and request the issuance of subpoenas.(c) <T3>Amicus Curiae. </T3>Briefs of amicus curiae may be permitted at thediscretion of the administrative law judge. Such participants are not partiesto the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.210 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Representation.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Representation of HUD. </T3>HUD is represented by the General Counsel.(b) <T3>Representation of other parties. </T3>Other parties may be representedas follows:(1) Individuals may appear on their own behalf.(2) A member of a partnership may represent the partnership.(3) An officer of a corporation, trust or association may represent thecorporation, trust or association.(4) An Officer or employee of any governmental unit, agency or authoritymay represent that unit, agency or authority.(5) An attorney admitted to practice before a Federal Court or the highestcourt in any State. The attorney's representation that he or she is ingood standing before any of these courts is sufficient evidence of theattorney's qualifications under this section, unless otherwise orderedby the administrative law judge.(c) <T3>Notice of appearance.</T3> Each attorney or other representative ofa party shall file a notice of appearance. The notice must indicate theparty of whose behalf the appearance is made. Any individual acting ina representative capacity may be required by the administrative law judgeto demonstrate authority to act in that capacity.(d) <T3>Withdrawal. </T3>An attorney or other representative of a party mustfile a written notice of intent before withdrawing from participation inthe proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.220</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standards of conduct.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>All persons appearing in proceedings under this partshall act with integrity and an ethical manner.(b) <T3>Exclusion.</T3> The administrative law judge may exclude parties ortheir representatives for refusal to comply with directions, continueduse of dilatory tactics, refusal to adhere to reasonable standards of orderlyand ethical conduct, failure to act in good faith, or violations of theprohibitions against ex parte communications. If an attorney is suspendedor barred from participation in a proceeding by an administrative law judge,the administrative law judge shall include in the record the reasons forthe action. An attorney that is suspended or barred from participationmay appeal to the chief administrative law judge. The proceeding will notbe delayed or suspended pending disposition on the appeal, except thatthe administrative law judge shall suspend the proceeding for a reasonabletime to enable the party to obtain another attorney.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Pleadings and motions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.00</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">In general.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Form.</T3> Every pleading, motion, brief, or other document shall containa caption setting forth the title of the proceeding, the docket numberassigned by the Office of Administrative Law Judges, and the designationof the type of document (<T3>e.g., </T3>charge, answer or motion to dismiss).(b) <T3>Signature.</T3> Every pleading, motion, brief, or other document filedby a party shall be signed by the party, the party's representative, orthe attorney representing the party, and must include the signer's addressand telephone number. The signature constitutes a certification that thesigner has read the document; that to the best of the signer's knowledge,information and belief there is good ground to support the document; andthat it is not interposed for delay.(c) <T3>Timely filing. </T3>The administrative law judge may refuse to considerany motion or other pleading that is not filed in a timely fashion andin compliance with this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.410</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">The charge.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Filing and service.</T3> Within three days after the issuance of acharge under 24 CFR 103.405, the General Counsel shall file the chargewith the Chief Docket Clerk in the Office of Administrative Law Judgesand serve copies (with the additional information required under paragraph(b) of this section) on the respondent and the aggrieved person on whosebehalf the complaint was filed.(b) <T3>Contents.</T3> The charge shall consist of a short and plain writtenstatement of the facts upon which the General Counsel has found reasonablecause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred oris about to occur. The following notifications shall be served with thecharge:(1) The notice shall state that a complainant (including HUD, if HUD filedthe complaint), a respondent, or an aggrieved person on whose behalf thecomplaint was filed may elect to have the claims asserted in the chargedecided in a civil action under section 812(o) of the Act, in lieu of anadministrative proceeding under this part. The notice shall state thatthe election must be made not later than 20 days after the receipt of theservice of the charge. Where HUD is the complainant, the Assistant Secretarymust make the election not later than 20 days after the service of thecharge. The notice shall state that the notification of the election mustbe served on the Chief Docket Clerk in the Office of Administrative LawJudges, the respondent, the aggrieved party on whose behalf the complaintwas filed, the Assistant Secretary and the General Counsel.(2) The notice shall state that if no person timely elects under paragraph(b)(1) of this section to have the claims asserted in the charge decidedin a civil action under section 812(o) of the Act, an administrative proceedingwill be conducted. The notice shall state that if an administrative hearingis conducted:(i) The parties will have an opportunity for a hearing at a date and placespecified in the notice.(ii) The respondent will have an opportunity to file an answer to the chargewithin 30 days of the date of service of the charge.(iii) The aggrieved person may participate as a party to the administrativeproceeding by filing a timely request for intervention.(iv) All discovery must be concluded 15 days before the date set for hearing.(3) The notice shall state that if at any time following the service ofthe charge on the respondent, the respondent intends to enter into a contract,sale, encumbrance, or lease with any person regarding the property thatis the subject of the charge, the respondent must provide a copy of thecharge to the person before the respondent and the person enter into thecontract, sale, encumbrance or lease.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Answer to charge.</ITAG>Within the 30 days after the service of the charge, a respondent contestingmaterial facts alleged in a charge or contending that the respondent isentitled to judgement as a matter of law shall file an answer to the charge.An answer shall include:(a) A statement that the respondent admits, denies, or does not have andis unable to obtain sufficient information to admit or deny, each allegationmade in the charge. A statement of lack of information shall have the effectof a denial. Any allegation that is not denied shall be deemed to be admitted.(b) A statement of each affirmative defense and a statement of facts supportingeach affirmative defense.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for intervention.</ITAG>Upon timely application, any aggrieved person may file a request for interventionto participate as a party to the proceeding. Requests for interventionsubmitted within 30 days after the filing of the charge shall be consideredto be timely filed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.440</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendments and supplemental pleadings.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Amendments_</T3>(1) By right. HUD may amend its charge once as a matterof right prior to filing of the answer.(2) <T3>By leave. </T3>Upon such conditions as are necessary to avoid prejudicingthe public interest and the rights of the parties, the administrative lawjudge may allow amendments to pleadings upon motion of the party.(3) <T3>Conformance to the evidence. </T3>When issues not raised by the pleadingsare reasonably within the scope of the original charge and have been triedby the express or implied consent of the parties, the issues shall be treatedin all respects as if they had been raised in the pleadings and amendmentsmay be made as necessary to make the pleading conform to evidence. (b) <T3>Supplemental pleadings. </T3>The administrative law judge may, uponreasonable notice, permit supplemental pleadings concerning transactions,occurrences or events that have happened or been discovered since the dateof the pleadings and which are relevant to any of the issues involved.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.450</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Motions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Motions. </T3>Any application for an order or other request shall bemade by a motion which, unless made during an appearance before the administrativelaw judge, shall be made in writing. Motions or requests made during anappearance before the administrative law judge shall be stated orally andmade a part of the transcript. All parties shall be given a reasonableopportunity to respond to written or oral motions or requests. (b) <T3>Answers to written motions. </T3>Within five days after a written motionis served, any party to the proceeding may file an answer in support of,or in opposition to the motion. Unless otherwise ordered by the administrativelaw judge, no further responsive documents may be filed. (c) <T3>Oral argument. </T3>The administrative law judge may order oral argumenton any motion. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Discovery</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discovery.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>This subpart governs discovery in aid of administrativeproceedings under this Part. Except for time periods stated in these rules,to the extent that these rules conflict with discovery procedures in aidof civil actions in the United States District Court for the District inwhich the investigation of the discriminatory housing practice took place,the rules of the United States District Court apply. (b) <T3>Scope. </T3>The parties are encouraged to engage in voluntary discoveryprocedures. Discovery shall be conducted as expeditiously and inexpensivelyas possible, consistent with the needs of all parties to obtain relevantevidence. Unless otherwise ordered by the administrative law judge, theparties may obtain discovery regarding any matter, not privileged, whichis relevant to the subject matter involved in the proceeding, includingthe existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location ofdocuments or persons having knowledge of any discoverable matter. It isnot grounds for objection that information sought will not be admissibleif the information sought appears reasonably calculated to lead to thediscovery of admissible evidence. (c) <T3>Methods. </T3>Parties may obtain discovery by one or more of the followingmethods:(1) Deposition upon oral examination or written questions.(2) Written interrogatories.(3) Requests for the production of documents or other evidence, for inspectionand other purposes, and physical and mental examinations. (4) Requests for admissions.(d) <T3>Frequency and sequence. </T3>Unless otherwise ordered by the administrativelaw judge or restricted by this subpart, the frequency or sequence of thesemethods is not limited. (e) <T3>Completion of discovery. </T3>All discovery shall be completed 15 daysbefore the date scheduled for hearing. (f) <T3>Not intervening aggrieved person. </T3>For the purposes of obtainingdiscovery from a non-intervening aggrieved person, the term ``party'' asused in this subpart includes the aggrieved person on whose behalf thecharge was issued.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.510</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Depositions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Depositions may be taken upon oral examination orupon written interrogatory before any person having the power to administeroaths. (b) <T3>Notice. </T3>Any party desiring to take the deposition of a witnessshall indicate to the witness and to all parties the time and place ofthe deposition, the name and post office address of the person before whomthe deposition is to be taken, the name and address of the witness, andthe subject matter of the testimony of the witness. Notice of the takingof a deposition shall be given not less than five days before the depositionis scheduled. The attendance of a witness may be compelled by subpoenaunder andSection; 104.590.(c) <T3>Procedure at deposition. </T3>Each witness deposed shall be placedunder oath or affirmation, and other parties shall have the right to cross-examine.The questions propounded and all answers and objections made to the propoundedquestions shall be reduced to writing; read by or to, and subscribed by,the witness; and certified by the person before whom the deposition wastaken. (d) <T3>Objections. </T3>During a deposition, a party or deponent may requestsuspension of the deposition on grounds of bad faith in the conduct ofthe examination, oppression of a deponent or party, or improper questioningor conduct. Upon the request for suspension, the deposition will be adjourned.The objecting party or deponent must immediately move the administrativelaw judge for a ruling on the objections. The administrative law judgemay then limit the scope or manner of taking the deposition. (e) <T3>Payment of costs of deposition. </T3>The party requesting the depositionshall bear all costs of the deposition. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.520</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of deposition at hearings.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>At the hearing, any part or all of a deposition, sofar as admissible under the Federal Rules of Evidence, may be used againstany party who was present or represented at the taking of the depositionor who had due notice of the taking of the deposition, in accordance withthe following provisions:(1) Any deposition may be used by any party for the purpose of contradictingor impeaching the testimony of the deponent as a witness. (2) The deposition of expert witnesses, may be used by any party for anypurpose, unless the administrative law judge rules that such use is unfairor a violation of due process. (3) The deposition of a party or of anyone who at the time of the takingof the deposition was an officer, director, or duly authorized agent ofa public or private corporation, partnership, or association that is aparty, may be used by any other party for any purpose. (4) The deposition of a witness, whether or not a party, may be used byany party for any purpose if the administrative law judge finds:(i) That the witness is dead;(ii) That the witness is out of the United States or more than 100 milesfrom the place of hearing, unless it appears that the absence of the witnesswas procured by the party offering the deposition;(iii) That the witness is unable to attend to testify because of age, sickness,infirmity, or imprisonment;(iv) That the party offering the deposition has been unable to procurethe attendance of the witness by subpoena; or(v) Whenever exceptional circumstances exist as to make it desirable, inthe interest of justice and with due regard to the importance of presentingthe testimony of witnesses orally in open hearing, to allow the depositionto be used. (5) If a part of a deposition is offered in evidence by a party, any otherparty may require the party to introduce all of the deposition that isrelevant to the part introduced. Any party may introduce any other partof the deposition.(6) Substitution of parties does not affect the right to use depositionspreviously taken. If a proceeding has been dismissed and another proceedinginvolving the same subject matter is later brought between the same partiesor their representatives or successors in interest, all depositions lawfullytaken in the former proceeding may be used in the latter proceeding. (b) <T3>Objections to admissibility. </T3>Except as provided in this paragraph,objection may be made at the hearing to receiving in evidence any depositionor part of a deposition for any reason that would require the exclusionof the evidence if the witness were present and testifying. (1) Objections to the competency of a witness or to the competency, relevancy,or materiality of testimony are not waived by failure to make them beforeor during the taking of the deposition, unless the basis of the objectionis one which might have been obviated or removed if presented at that time.(2) Errors and irregularities occurring at the oral examination in themanner of taking the deposition, in the form of the questions or answers,in the oath or affirmation, or in the conduct of parties, and errors ofany kind which might be obviated, removed or cured if promptly presented,are waived unless reasonable objection is made at the taking of the deposition.(3) Objections to the form of written interrogatories are waived unlessserved in writing upon the party propounding the interrogatories. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.530</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Written interrogatories.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Written interrogatories to parties. </T3>Any party may serve on anyother party written interrogatories to be answered by the party served.If the party served is a public or private corporation, a partnership,an association, or a governmental agency, the interrogatories may be answeredby any authorized officer or agent who shall furnish such information asmay be available to the party. A party may serve not more than 30 writteninterrogatories on another party without an order of the administrativelaw judge. (b) <T3>Responses to written interrogatories. </T3>Each interrogatory shallbe answered separately and fully in writing under oath or affirmation,unless the party objects to the interrogatory. If a party objects to aninterrogatory, the response shall state the reasons for the objection inlieu of an answer. The answer and objections shall be signed by the personmaking them, except that objections may be signed by the counsel for theparty. The party upon whom the interrogatories were served shall servea copy of the answers and objections upon all parties within 15 days afterservice of the interrogatories. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.540</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Production of documents and other evidence; entry upon land for inspectionand other purposes; and physical and mental examinations. </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Any party may serve on any other party a request to:(1) Produce and permit the party making the request, or a person actingon the party's behalf, to inspect and copy any designated documents, orto inspect and copy, test, or sample any tangible things that are in thepossession, custody, or control of the party upon whom the request is served;(2) Permit entry upon designated land or other property in the possessionor control of the party upon whom the request is served for the purposeof inspection and measuring, photographing, testing, or other purposesstated in paragraph (a)(1) of this section; or (3) Submit to a physical or mental examination by a physician.(b) <T3>Contents of request. </T3>The request shall:(1) Set forth the items to be inspected by individual item or by categoryof items; (2) Describe each item or category with reasonable particularity; (3) Specify a reasonable time, place and manner for making the inspectionand performing the related acts; and (4) Specify the time, place, manner, conditions, and scope of the physicalor mental examination, and the person or persons who will make the examination.A report of the examining physician shall be made in accordance with Rule35(b) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure. (c) <T3>Response to request. </T3>Within 15 days of the service of the request,the party upon whom the request is served shall serve a written responseon the party submitting the request. The response shall state, with regardto each item or category:(1) That inspection and related activities will be permitted as requested;or(2) That objection is made to the request in whole or in part. If an objectionis made, the response must state the reasons for the objection.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.550</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Admissions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Request for admissions. </T3>A party may serve on any other party awritten request for the admission of the genuineness and authenticity ofany relevant document described in or attached to the request, or for theadmission of the truth of any specified relevant matter of fact. (b) <T3>Response to request. </T3>(1) Each matter for which an admission isrequested is admitted unless, within 15 days after service of the request,the party to whom the request is directed serves on the requesting party:(i) A written statement specifically denying the relevant matters for whichan admission is requested; (ii) A written statement setting forth in detail why the party cannot truthfullyadmit or deny the matters; or(iii) Written objections to the request alleging that the matters are privilegedor irrelevant, or that the request is otherwise improper. (2) The party to whom the request is directed may not give lack of informationor knowledge as a reason for failure to admit or deny, unless the partystates that it has made a reasonable inquiry and that the information knownor readily obtainable is insufficient to enable the party to admit or deny.(c) <T3>Sufficiency or response. </T3>The party requesting admissions may movefor a determination of the sufficiency of the answers or objections. Unlessthe administrative law judge determines that an objection is justified,the administrative law judge shall order that an answer be served. If theadministrative law judge determines that an answer does not comply withthe requirements of this section, the administrative law judge may ordereither that the matter is admitted or that an amended answer be served.(d) <T3>Effect of admission. </T3>Any matter admitted under this section isconclusively established unless, upon the motion of a party, the administrativelaw judge permits the withdrawal or amendment of the admission. Any admissionmade under this section is made for the purposes of the pending proceedingonly, is not an admission by the party for any other purpose, and may notbe used against the party in any other proceeding. (e) <T3>Service of requests. </T3>Each request for admission and each writtenresponse must be served on all parties and filed with the Office of administrativelaw judges. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.560</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Supplementation of responses. </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>A party who responded to a request for discovery witha response that was complete when made is under no duty to supplement theresponse to include information acquired after the response was made except:(1) A party is under a duty to timely supplement responses with respectto any question directly addressed to: (i) The identity and location of persons having knowledge of discoverablematters; and (ii) The identity of each person expected to be called as an expert witnessat the hearing, the subject matter on which the expert witness is expectedto testify, and the substance of the testimony. (2) A party is under a duty to timely amend a previous response if theparty later obtains information upon the basis of which: (i) The party knows the response was incorrect when made; or (ii) The party knows the response though correct when made is no longertrue and the circumstances are such that a failure to amend the responseis, in substance, a knowing concealment. (b) <T3>By order or agreement</T3>. A duty to supplement responses may be imposedby order of the administrative law judge or by agreement of the parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;104.570 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protective orders. </ITAG>Upon motion of a party or a person from whom discovery is sought or inaccordance with andSection;104.580(c), the administrative law judge may makeappropriate orders to protect a party or person from annoyance, embarrassment,oppression, or undue burden or expense as a result of the requested discoveryrequest. The order may direct that: (a) The discovery may not be had; (b) The discovery may be had only on specified terms and conditions, includinga designation of time and place for discovery; (c) The discovery may be had by a method of discovery other than that selectedby the party seeking discovery; (d) Certain irrelevant matters may not be the subject of discovery, orthat the scope of discovery be limited to certain matters; (e) Discovery may be conducted with no one present other than persons designatedby the administrative law judge; (f) A trade secret or other confidential research, development or commercialinformation may not be disclosed, or may be disclosed only in a designatedway; or (g) To protect privileged matters, the administrative law judge may takesuch other action permitted under andSection;104.740. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;104.580 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Failure to make or cooperate in discovery. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Motion to compel discovery</T3>. If a deponent fails to answer a questionpropounded, or a party upon whom a request is made under andSection;andSection;104.530through 104.550 fails to respond adequately, objects to a request, or failsto permit inspection as requested, the discovering party may move the administrativelaw judge for an order compelling a response or an inspection in accordancewith the request. The motion shall: (1) State the nature of the request; (2) Set forth the response or objection of the party upon whom the requestwas served; (3) Present arguments supporting the motion; and (4) Attach copies of all relevant discovery requests and responses. (b) <T3>Evasive or incomplete answers</T3>. For the purposes of this section,an evasive or incomplete answer or response will be treated as a failureto answer or respond. (c) <T3>Administrative law judge ruling</T3>. In ruling on a motion under thissection, the administrative law judge may enter an order compelling a responseor an inspection in accordance with the request, may issue sanctions underparagraph (d) of this section, or may enter a protective order under andSection;104.570.(d) <T3>Sanctions.</T3> If a party fails to comply with an order (includingan order for taking a deposition, the production of evidence within theparty's control, a request for admission, or the production of witnesses)the administrative law judge may: (1) Draw an inference in favor of the requesting party with regard to theinformation sought; (2) Prohibit the party failing to comply with the order from introducingevidence concerning, or otherwise relying upon, testimony relating to theinformation sought; (3) Permit the requesting party to introduce secondary evidence concerningthe information sought; (4) Strike any appropriate part of the pleadings or other submissions ofthe party failing to comply with such order; or (5) Take such other action as may be appropriate. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Subpoenas </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;104.590 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subpoenas </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general</T3>. This section governs the issuance of subpoenas inadministrative proceedings under this part. Except for time periods statedin these rules, to the extent that this rule conflicts with proceduresfor the issuance of subpoenas in civil actions in the United States DistrictCourt for the District in which the investigation of the discriminatoryhousing practice took place, the rules of the United States District Courtapply. (b) <T3>Issuance of subpoena</T3>. Upon the written request of a party, thechief administrative law judge or the presiding administrative law judgemay issue a subpoena requiring: (1) The attendance of a witness for the purpose of giving testimony ata deposition; (2) The attendance of a witness for the purpose of giving testimony ata hearing; and (3) The production of relevant books, papers, documents or tangible things.(c) <T3>Time of request</T3>. Requests for subpoenas in aid of discovery mustbe submitted in time to permit the conclusion of discovery 15 days beforethe date scheduled for the hearing. If a request for subpoenas of a witnessfor testimony at a hearing is submitted three days or less before the hearing,the subpoena shall be issued at the discretion of the chief administrativelaw judge or the presiding administrative law judge, as appropriate. (d) <T3>Service</T3>. A subpoena may be served by any person who is not a partyand is not less than 18 years of age. Service on a person shall be madeby delivering a copy of the subpoena to the person and by tendering witnessfees and mileage to that person. When the subpoena is issued on behalfof HUD, witness fees and mileage need not be tendered with the subpoena.(e) <T3>Amount of witness fees and mileage</T3>. A witness summoned by a subpoenaissued under this part is entitled to the same witness and mileage feesas a witness in proceedings in United States District Courts. Fees payableto a witness summoned by a subpoena shall be paid by the party requestingthe issuance of the subpoena, or where the administrative law judge determinesthat a party is unable to pay the fees, the fees shall be paid by the Department.(f) <T3>Motion to quash or limit subpoena</T3>. Upon a motion by the personserved with a subpoena or by a party, made within five days of the serviceof the subpoena (but in any event not less than the time specified in thesubpoena for compliance), the administrative law judge may: (1) quash or modify the subpoena if it is unreasonable and oppressive orfor other good cause shown; or (2) condition denial of the motion upon the advancement, by the party onwhose behalf the subpoena was issued, of the reasonable cost of producingsubpoenaed books, papers or documents. Where the circumstances require,the administrative law judge may act upon such a motion at any time aftera copy of the motion has been served upon the party on whose behalf thesubpoena was isssued.(g) <T3>Failure to comply with subpoena. </T3>If a person fails to comply witha subpoena issued under this section, the party requesting the subpoenamay refer the matter to the Attorney General for enforcement in appropriateproceedings under section 814(c) of the Fair Housing Act.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Prehearing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.600 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prehearing statements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Before the commencement of the hearing, the administrativelaw judge may direct parties to file prehearing statements.(b) <T3>Contents of statement. </T3>The prehearing statement must state thename of the party or parties presenting the statement and, unless otherwisedirected by the administrative law judge, briefly set forth the following:(1) Issues involved in the proceeding.(2) Facts stipulated by the parties and a statement that the parties havemade a good faith effort to stipulate to the greatest extent possible.(3) Facts in dispute.(4) Witnesses (together with a summary of the testimony expected) and exhibitsto be presented at the hearing.(5) A brief statement of applicable law.(6) Conclusions to be drawn.(7) Estimated time required for presentation of the party's case.(8) Such other information as may assist in the disposition of the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.610</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prehearing conference.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Before the commencement or during the course of thehearing, the administrative law judge may direct the parties to participatein a conference to expedite the hearing.(b) <T3>Matters considered. </T3>At the conference, the following matters maybe considered:(1) Simplification and clarification of the issues.(2) Necessary amendments to the pleadings.(3) Stipulations of fact and of the authenticity, accuracy, and admissibilityof documents.(4) Limitations on the number of witnesses.(5) Negotiation, compromise, or settlement of issues.(6) The exchange of proposed exhibits.(7) Matters of which official notice will be requested.(8) A schedule for the completion of actions discussed at the conference.(9) Such other information as may assist in the disposition of the proceeding.(c) <T3>Conduct of conference. </T3>The conference may be conducted by telephone,correspondence or personal attendance. Conferences, however, shall generallybe conducted by a conference call, unless the administrative law judgedetermines that this method is impracticable. The administrative law judgeshall give reasonable notice of the time, place and manner of the conference.(d) <T3>Record of conference. </T3>Unless otherwise derected by the administrativelaw judge, the conference will not be stenographically recorded. The administrativelaw judge will reduce the actions taken at the conference to a writtenorder or, if the conference takes place less than seven days before thebeginning of the hearing, may make a statement on the record summarizingthe actions taken at the conference.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.620 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Settlement negotiations before a settlement judge.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Appointment of settlement judge. </T3>The administrative law judge,upon the motion of a party or upon his or her own motion, may request thechief administrative law judge to appoint another administrative law judgeto conduct settlement negotiations. The order appointing the settlementjudge may confine the scope of settlement negotiations to specified issues.The order shall direct the settlement judge to report to the chief administrativelaw judge within specified time periods.(b) <T3>Duties of settlement judge. </T3>(1) The settlement judge shall conveneand preside over conferences and settlement negotiations between the partiesand assess the practicalities of a potential settlement.(2) The settlement judge shall report to the chief administrative law judgedescribing the status of the settlement negotiations, evaluating settlementprospects, and recommending the termination or continuation of the settlementnegotiations.(c) <T3>Termination of settlement negotiations. </T3>Settlement negotiationsshall terminate upon the order of the chief administrative law judge issuedafter consultation with the settlement judge. The conduct of settlementnegotiations shall not unduly delay the commencement of the hearing.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Hearing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.700 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Date and place of hearing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Date. </T3>The hearing shall commence not later than 120 days followingthe issuance of the charge under andSection; 103.405, unless it is impracticableto do so. If the hearing cannot be commenced within this time period, theadministrative law judge shall notify in writing all parties, the aggrievedpersons on whose behalf the charge was filed, and the Assistant Secretary,of the reasons for the delay.(b) <T3>Place. </T3>The hearing will be conducted at a place in the vicinityin which the discriminatory housing practice is alleged to have occurredor to be about to occur.(c) <T3>Notification of time and place for hearing. </T3>The charge issuedunder 24 CFR 103.405 will specify the time, date and place for the hearing.The administrative law judge may change the time, date or place of thehearing, or may temporarily adjourn or continue a hearing for good causeshown. If such a change is made or the hearing is temporarily adjourned,the administrative law judge shall give the parties at least five daysnotice of the revised time, date and place for the hearing, unless otherwiseagreed by the parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.710 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conduct of hearings.</ITAG>The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative ProcedureAct (5 U.S.C. 551-559).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.720 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waiver of right to appear.</ITAG>If all parties waive their right to appear before the administrative lawjudge or to present evidence and arguments, it is not necessary for theadministrative law judge to conduct an oral hearing. Such waivers shallbe made in writing and filed with the administrative law judge. Where waiversare submitted by all parties, the administrative law judge shall make arecord of the relevant written evidence submitted by the parties and pleadingssubmitted by the parties with respect to the issues in the proceeding.These documents shall constitute the evidence in the proceeding and thedecision shall be based upon this evidence. Such hearings shall be deemedto commence on the first day that written evidence may be submitted forthe record.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.730</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Evidence.</ITAG>The Federal Rules of Evidence apply to the presentation of evidence inhearings under this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.740</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">In camera and protective orders.</ITAG>The administrative law judge may limit discovery or the introduction ofevidence, or may issue such protective or other orders necessary to protectprivileged communications. If the administration law judge determines thatinformation in documents containing privileged matters should be made availableto a party, the administrative law judge may order the preparation of asummary or extract of the nonprivileged matter contained in the original.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.750</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exhibits.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Identification.</T3> All exhibits offered into evidence shall be numberedsequentially and marked with a designation identifying the party offeringthe exhibit.(b) <T3>Exchange of exhibits.</T3> One copy of each exhibit offered into evidencemust be furnished to each of the parties and to the administrative lawjudge. If the administrative law judge does not fix a time for the exchangeof exhibits, the parties shall exchange copies of exhibits at the earliestpracticable time before the commencement of the hearing. Exhibits submittedas rebuttal evidence are not required to be exchanged before the commencementof the hearing if the submission of such evidence could not reasonablybe anticipated at that time.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.760</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authenticity.</ITAG>The authenticity of all documents furnished to the parties as requiredunder andSection; 104.750 and submitted as proposed exhibits in advance ofthe hearing shall be admitted unless a party files a written objectionto the exhibit before the commencement of the hearing. Upon a clear showingof good cause for failure to file such a written objection, the administrativelaw judge may permit the party to challenge the authenticity.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.770</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stipulations.</ITAG>The parties may stipulate to any pertinent facts by oral agreement at thehearing or by written agreement at any time. Stipulations may be submittedinto evidence at any time before the end of the hearing. When receivedinto evidence, the stipulation is binding on the parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.780</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Record of hearing.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Hearing record.</T3> All oral hearings shall be recorded and transcribedby a reporter designated by, and under the supervision of, the administrativelaw judge. The original transcript shall be a part of the record and shallconstitute the sole official transcript. All exhibits introduced as evidenceshall be marked for identification and incorporated as a part of the record.Transcripts may be obtained by the parties and by the public from the officialreporter at rates not to exceed the applicable rates fixed by the contractwith the reporter.(b)<T3> Corrections.</T3> Corrections to the official transcript will be permittedupon motion of a party. Motions for correction must be submitted withinfive days of the receipt of the transcript. Corrections of the officialtranscript will be permitted only where errors of substance are involvedand upon the approval of the administrative law judge.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.790</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Arguments and briefs.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Arguments.</T3> Following the submission of evidence at an oral hearing,the administrative law judge may hear oral arguments at the hearing. Theadministrative law judge may limit the time permitted for such argumentsto avoid unreasonable delay.(b) <T3>Submission of written briefs.</T3> The administrative law judge maypermit the submission of written briefs following the adjournment of theoral hearing. Written briefs shall be simultaneously filed by all partiesand shall be due not later than 30 days following the adjournment of theoral hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.800</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">End of hearing.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Oral hearings.</T3> Where there is an oral hearing, the hearing endson the day of the adjournment of the oral hearing or, where written briefsare permitted, on the date that the written briefs are due.(b) <T3>Hearing on written record.</T3> Where the parties have waived an oralhearing, the hearing ends on the date set by the administrative law judgeas the final date for the receipt of submissions by the parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.810</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Receipt of evidence following hearing.</ITAG>Following the end of the hearing, no additional evidence may be acceptedinto the record, except with the permission of the administrative law judge.The administrative law judge may receive additional evidence upon a determinationthat new and material evidence was not readily available before the endof the hearing, the evidence has been timely submitted, and its acceptancewill not unduly prejudice the rights of the parties. However, the administrativelaw judge shall include in the record any motions for attorney's fees (includingsupporting documentation), and any approved corrections to the transcripts.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart I_Dismissals and Decisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.900</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Dismissal.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Election of judicial determination.</T3> If the complainant, the respondent,or the aggrieved person on whose behalf a complaint was filed makes a timelyelection to have the claims asserted in the charge decided in a civil actionunder section 812(o) of the Act, the administrative law judge shall dismissthe administrative proceeding.(b)<T3> Effect of a civil action on administrative proceeding.</T3> An administrativelaw judge may not continue an administrative proceeding under this partregarding an alleged discriminatory housing practice after the beginningof the trial of a civil action commenced by the aggrieved person underan act of Congress or a State law seeking relief with respect to that discriminatoryhousing practice. If such a trial is commenced, the administrative lawjudge shall dismiss the administrative proceeding. The commencement andmaintenance of a civil action for appropriate temporary or preliminaryrelief under section 810(e) or proceedings for such relief under section813 of the Fair Housing Act does not affect administrative proceedingsunder this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.910</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial decision of administrative law judge.</ITAG>(a)<T3> In general. </T3>Within the time period set forth in paragraph (d)of this section, the administrative law judge shall issue an initial decisionincluding findings of fact and conclusions of law upon each material issueof fact or law presented on the record. The initial decision of the administrativelaw judge shall be based on the record of the proceeding.(b)<T3> Finding against respondent.</T3> If the administrative law judge findsthat a respondent has engaged, or is about to engage, in a discriminatoryhousing practice, the administrative law judge shall issue an initial decisionagainst the respondent and order such relief as may be appropriate. Therelief may include, but is not limited to, the following:(1) The administrative law judge may order the respondent to pay damagesto the aggrieved person (including damages caused by humiliation and embarrassment).(2) The administrative law judge may provide for injunctive or such otherequitable relief as may be appropriate. No such order may affect any contract,sale, encumbrance or lease consummated before the issuance of the initialdecision that involved a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer or tenant withoutactual knowledge of the charge issued under andSection; 104.405.(3) To vindicate the public interest, the administrative law judge mayassess a civil penalty against the respondent.(i) The amount of the civil penalty may not exceed:(A) $10,000, if the respondent has not been adjudged to have committedany prior discriminatory housing practice in any administrative hearingor civil action permitted under the Fair Housing Act or any State or localfair housing law, or in any licensing or regulatory proceeding conductedby a Federal, State or local governmental agency.(B) $25,000, if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed oneother discriminatory housing practice in any administrative hearing orcivil action permitted under the Fair Housing Act, or any State or localfair housing law, or in any licensing or regulatory proceeding conductedby a Federal, State, or local government agency, and the adjudication wasmade during the five-year period preceding the date of filing of the charge.(C) $50,000, if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed twoor more discriminatory housing practices in any administrative hearingsor civil actions permitted under the Fair Housing Act or any State or localfair housing law, or in any licensing or regulatory proceeding conductedby a Federal, State, or local government agency, and the adjudicationswere made during the seven-year period preceding the date of the filingof the charge.(ii) If the acts constituting the discriminatory housing practice thatis the subject of the charge were committed by the same natural personwho has previously been adjudged, in any administrative proceeding or civilaction, to have committed acts constituting a discriminatory housing practice,the time periods set forth in paragraphs (b)(3)(i) (B) and (C) of thissection do not apply.(iii) In a proceeding involving two or more respondents, the administrativelaw judge may assess a civil penalty as provided under paragraph (b) ofthis section against each respondent that the administrative law judgedetermines has been engaged or is about to engage in a discriminatory housingpractice.(c)<T3> Finding in favor of respondent. </T3>If the administrative law judgefinds that a respondent has not engaged, and is not about to engage, ina discriminatory housing practice, the administrative law judge shall makean initial decision dismissing the charge.(d)<T3> Date of issuance.</T3> The administrative law judge shall issue aninitial decision within 60 days after the end of the hearing, unless itis impracticable to do so. If the administrative law judge is unable toissue the initial decision within this time period (or within any succeeding60-day period following the initial 60-day period), the administrativelaw judge shall notify in writing all parties, the aggrieved person onwhose behalf the charge was filed, and the Assistant Secretary, of thereasons for the delay.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.920</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service of initial decision.</ITAG>Simultaneously with the issuance of the initial decision, the administrativelaw judge shall serve the initial decision on all parties, the aggrievedperson on whose behalf the charge was filed, the Assistant Secretary andthe Secretary of HUD. The initial decision will include a notice statingthat the initial decision will become the final decision of the Departmentunless the Secretary issues a final decision under andSection; 104.930 within30 days of the date of issuance of the initial decision.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.925</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Resolution of charge.</ITAG>At any time before the issuance of a final decision under andSection; 104.930,the parties may submit an agreement resolving the charge. The agreementmust be signed by the General Counsel, the respondent, and the aggrievedperson upon whose behalf the charge was issued. The administrative lawjudge shall accept the agreement by issuing an initial decision based onthe agreed findings. The submission of an agreement resolving the chargeconstitutes a waiver of any right to challenge or contest the validityof a decision entered in accordance with the agreement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.930</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Final decision.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Issuance of final decision by Secretary.</T3> The Secretary of HUDmay review any finding of fact, conclusion of law, or order contained inthe initial decision of the administrative law judge and issue a finaldecision in the proceeding. The Secretary may affirm, modify or set aside,in whole or in part, the initial decision or remand the initial decisionfor further proceedings. The Secretary shall serve the final decision onall parties no later than 30 days from the date of issuance of the initialdecision of the administrative law judge. The final decision shall be servedon all parties, the aggrieved person on whose behalf the charge was filed,and the Assistant Secretary.(b)<T3> No final decision by Secretary.</T3> If the Secretary of HUD doesnot serve a final decision within the time period described above, theinitial decision of the administrative law judge will become the finaldecision of the Department. For the purposes of this part, such a finaldecision will be considered to have been issued 30 days following the dateof issuance of the initial decision.(c)<T3> Public disclosure.</T3> HUD shall make public disclosure of each finaldecision.(d)<T3> Decisions on remand.</T3> If the Secretary remands the decision forfurther proceedings, the administrative law judge shall issue an initialdecision on remand within 60 days of the date of issuance of the Secretary'sdecision, unless it is impractical to do so. If the administrative lawjudge is unable to issue the initial decision within this time period (orwithin any succeeding 60-day period following the initial 60-day period),the administrative law judge shall notify in writing the parties, the aggrievedperson on whose behalf the charge was filed, and the Assistant Secretary,of the reasons for the delay.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.935</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Action upon issuance of a final decision.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Licensed or regulated businesses.</T3> (1) If a final decision includesa finding that a respondent has engaged or is about to engage in a discriminatoryhousing practice in the course of a business that is subject to licensingor regulation by a Federal, State or local governmental agency, the AssistantSecretary will notify the governmental agency of the decision by:(i) Sending copies of the findings of fact, conclusions of law and thefinal decision to the governmental agency by certified mail; and(ii) Recommending appropriate disciplinary action to the governmental agency,including, where appropriate, the suspension or revocation of the licenseof the respondent.(2) The Assistant Secretary will notify the appropriate governmental agencieswithin 30 days after the date of issuance of the final decision, unlessa petition for judicial review of the final decision as described in andSection;104.950 has been filed before the issuance of the notification of the agency.If such a petition has been filed, the Assistant Secretary will providethe notification to the governmental agency within 30 days of the datethat the final decision is affirmed upon review. If a petition for judicialreview is timely filed following the notification of the governmental agency,the Assistant Secretary will promptly notify the governmental agency ofthe petition and withdraw his or her recommendation.(b)<T3> Notification to the Attorney General.</T3> If a final decision includesa finding that a respondent has engaged or is about to engage in a discriminatoryhousing practice and another final decision including such a finding wasissued under this part within the five years preceding the date of issuanceof the final decision, the General Counsel will notify the Attorney Generalof the decisions by sending a copy of the final decisions in each administrativeproceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.940</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Attorney's fees and costs.</ITAG>Following the issuance of the final decision under andSection; 104.930, anyprevailing party, except HUD, may apply for attorney's fees and costs.The administrative law judge will issue an initial decision awarding ordenying such fees and costs. The initial decision will become the finaldecision of HUD unless the Secretary reviews the initial decision and issuesa final decision on fees and costs within 30 days. The recovery of reasonableattorney's fees and costs will be permitted as follows:(a) If the respondent is the prevailing party:(1) HUD will be liable for reasonable attorney's fees and costs to theextent provided under the Equal Access to Justice Act (5 U.S.C. 504) andHUD's regulations at 24 CFR Part 14; and(2) An intervenor will be liable for reasonable attorney's fees and costsonly to the extent that the intervenor's participation in the administrativeproceeding was frivolous or vexatious, or was for the purpose of harassment.(b) To the extent that an intervenor is a prevailing party, the respondentwill be liable for reasonable attorney's fees unless special circumstancesmake the recovery of such fees and costs unjust.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Judicial Review and Enforcement of Final Decision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.950</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Judicial review of final decision.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Petition for review.</T3> Any party adversely affected by a final decisionunder andSection; 104.930 may file a petition in the appropriate United StatesCourt of Appeals for review of the decision under section 812(i) of theFair Housing Act. The petition must be filed within 30 days of the dateof issuance of the final decision.(b) <T3>No petition for review.</T3> If no petition for review is filed underparagraph (a) within 45 days from the date of issuance of the final decision,the findings of facts and final decision shall be conclusive in connectionwith any petition for enforcement described under andSection; 104.955(a)filed thereafter by the General Counsel, and in connection with any petitionfor enforcement described under andSection; 104.955(b).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.955</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Enforcement of final decision.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Enforcement by HUD.</T3> Following the issuance of a final decisionunder andSection; 104.930, the General Counsel may petition the appropriateUnited States Court of Appeals for the enforcement of the final decisionand for appropriate temporary relief or restraining order in accordancewith section 812(j) of the Fair Housing Act.(b) <T3>Enforcement by others.</T3> If before the expiration of 60 days fromthe date of issuance of the final decision under andSection; 104.930, nopetition for review of the final decision described under andSection; 104.950has been filed, and the General Counsel has not sought enforcement of thefinal decision as described in paragraph (a) of this section, any personentitled to relief under the final decision may petition the appropriateUnited States Court of Appeals for the enforcement of the final decisionin accordance with section 812(m) of the Fair Housing Act.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 105_FAIR HOUSING</ITAG>6. The appendix to Part 105 is redesignated as the appendix to Part 103and the remainder of Part 105 is removed.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 106_FAIR HOUSING ADMINISTRATIVE MEETINGS UNDER THE FAIR HOUSINGACT</ITAG>7. The title to Part 106 is revised as set forth above.8. The authority citation for Part 106 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>9. Section 106.1 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 106.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this part is to establish procedures for public meetingsor conferences that may be used to assist the Assistant Secretary in achievingthe aims of the Fair Housing Act for the promotion and assurance of equalopportunity in housing with regard to race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin, and, specifically, to carry out thoseresponsibilities delegated to him or her by the Secretary of Housing andUrban Development under sections 808(e) (1), (2), and (3), and 809 of theFair Housing Act.10. Section 106.2 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 106.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part:(a) ``Assistant Secretary'' means the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housingand Equal Opportunity in the Department of Housing and Urban Development.(b) ``Meeting'' means a public meeting or conference held under the authorityof the Fair Housing Act and this part.(c) ``Fair Housing Act'' means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968,as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. 3600-3620.11. Part 109 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 109_FAIR HOUSING ADVERTISING</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">109.5 Policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">109.10 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">109.15 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">109.16 Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">109.20 Use of words, phrases, symbols, and visual aids.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">109.25 Selective use of advertising media or content.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">109.30 Fair housing policy and practices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix I to Part 109_Fair Housing Advertising.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Policy.</ITAG>It is the policy of the United States to provide, within constitutionallimitations, for fair housing throughout the United States. The provisionsof the Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. 3600, <T3>et seq.</T3>) make it unlawful to discriminate in the sale, rental,and financing of housing, and in the provision of brokerage and appraisalservices, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin. Section 804(c) of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3604(c),as amended, makes it unlawful to make, print, or publish, or cause to bemade, printed, or published, any notice, statement, or advertisement, withrespect to the sale or rental of a dwelling, that indicates any preference,limitation, or discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin, or an intention to make any such preference,limitation, or discrimination. However, the prohibitions of the act regardingfamilial status do not apply with respect to ``housing for older persons'',as defined in section 807(b) of the act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this part is to assist all advertising media, advertisingagencies and all other persons who use advertising to make, print, or publish,or cause to be made, printed, or published, advertisements with respectto the sale, rental, or financing of dwellings which are in compliancewith the requirements of the Fair Housing Act. These regulations also describethe matters this Department will review in evaluating compliance with theFair Housing Act in connection with investigations of complaints allegingdiscriminatory housing practices involving advertising.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part:(a) ``Assistant Secretary'' means the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housingand Equal Opportunity.(b) ``General Counsel'' means the General Counsel of the Department ofHousing and Urban Development.(c) ``Dwelling'' means any building, structure, or portion thereof whichis occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence byone or more families, and any vacant land which is offered for sale orlease for the construction or location thereon of any such building, structure,or portion thereof.(d) ``Family'' includes a single individual.(e) ``Person'' includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers,and fiduciaries.(f) ``To rent'' includes to lease, to sublease, to let and otherwise togrant for a consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by theoccupant.(g) ``Discriminatory housing practice'' means an act that is unlawful undersection 804, 805, 806, or 818 of the Fair Housing Act.(h) ``Handicap'' means, with respect to a person_(1) A physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or moreof such person's major life activities,(2) A record of having such an impairment, or(3) Being regarded as having such an impairment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">This term does not include current, illegal use of or addiction toa controlled substance (as defined in section 102 of the Controlled SubstancesAct (21 U.S.C. 802)). For purposes of this part, an individual shall notbe considered to have a handicap solely because that individual is a transvestite.(i) ``Familial status'' means one or more individuals (who have not attainedthe age of 18 years) being domiciled with_(1) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individualor individuals; or(2) The designee of such parent or other person having such custody, withthe written permission of such parent or other person. The protectionsafforded against discrimination on the basis of familial status shall applyto any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custodyof any individual who has not attained the age of 18 years.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> This part describes the matters the Department will reviewin evaluating compliance with the Fair Housing Act in connection with investigationsof complaints alleging discriminatory housing practices involving advertising.Use of these criteria will be considered by the General Counsel in makingdeterminations as to whether there is reasonable cause to believe thata discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur.(1) <T3>Advertising media.</T3> This part provides criteria for use by advertisingmedia in determining whether to accept and publish advertising regardingsales or rental transactions. Use of these criteria will be consideredby the General Counsel in making determinations as to whether there isreasonable cause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice hasoccurred or is about to occur.(2) <T3>Persons placing advertisements.</T3> A failure by persons placing advertisementsto use the criteria contained in this part, when found in connection withthe investigation of a complaint alleging the making or use of discriminatoryadvertisements, will be considered by the General Counsel in making a determinationof reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice hasoccurred or is about to occur.(b) <T3>Affirmative advertising efforts.</T3> Nothing in this part shall beconstrued to restrict advertising efforts designed to attract persons todwellings who would not ordinarily be expected to apply, when such effortsare pursuant to an affirmative marketing program or undertaken to remedythe effects of prior discrimination in connection with the advertisingor marketing of dwellings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of words, phrases, symbols, and visual aids.</ITAG>The following words, phrases, symbols, and forms typify those most oftenused in residential real estate advertising to convey either overt or tacitdiscriminatory preferences or limitations. In considering a complaint underthe Fair Housing Act, the Department will normally consider the use ofthese and comparable words, phrases, symbols, and forms to indicate a possibleviolation of the act and to establish a need for further proceedings onthe complaint, if it is apparent from the context of the usage that discriminationwithin the meaning of the act is likely to result.(a) <T3>Words descriptive of dwelling, landlord, and tenants.</T3> White privatehome, Colored home, Jewish home, Hispanic residence, adult building.(b) <T3>Words indicative of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin</T3>_(1) <T3>Race</T3>_Negro, Black, Caucasian, Oriental, American Indian.(2) <T3>Color</T3>_White, Black, Colored.(3) <T3>Religion</T3>_Protestant, Christian, Catholic, Jew.(4) <T3>National origin</T3>_Mexican American, Puerto Rican, Philippine, Polish,Hungarian, Irish, Italian, Chicano, African, Hispanic, Chinese, Indian,Latino.(5) <T3>Sex</T3>_the exclusive use of words in advertisements, including thoseinvolving the rental of separate units in a single or multi-family dwelling,stating or tending to imply that the housing being advertised is availableto persons of only one sex and not the other, except where the sharingof living areas is involved. Nothing in this part restricts advertisementsof dwellings used exclusively for dormitory facilities by educational institutions.(6) <T3>Handicap</T3>_crippled, blind, deaf, mentally ill, retarded, impaired,handicapped, physically fit. Nothing in this part restricts the inclusionof information about the availability of accessible housing in advertisingof dwellings.(7) <T3>Familial status</T3>_adults, children, singles, mature persons. Nothingin this part restricts advertisements of dwellings which are intended andoperated for occupancy by older persons and which constitute ``housingfor older persons'' as defined in Part 100 of this title.(8) <T3>Catch words</T3>_Words and phrases used in a discriminatory contextshould be avoided, e.g., ``restricted'', ``exclusive'', ``private'', ``integrated'',``traditional'', ``board approval'' or ``membership approval''.(c) <T3>Symbols or logotypes.</T3> Symbols or logotypes which imply or suggestrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(d) <T3>Colloquialisms</T3>. Words or phrases used regionally or locally whichimply or suggest race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin.(e) <T3>Directions to real estate for sale or rent (use of maps or writteninstructions)</T3>. Directions can imply a discriminatory preference, limitation,or exclusion. For example, references to real estate location made in termsof racial or national origin significant landmarks, such as an existingblack development (signal to blacks) or an existing development known forits exclusion of minorities (signal to whites). Specific directions whichmake reference to a racial or national origin significant area may indicatea preference. References to a synagogue, congregation or parish may alsoindicate a religious preference.(f) <T3>Area (location) description</T3>. Names of facilities which cater toa particular racial, national origin or religious group, such as countryclub or private school designations, or names of facilities which are usedexclusively by one sex may indicate a preference.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selective use of advertising media or content.</ITAG>The selective use of advertising media or content when particular combinationsthereof are used exclusively with respect to various housing developmentsor sites can lead to discriminatory results and may indicate a violationof the Fair Housing Act. For example, the use of English language mediaalone or the exclusive use of media catering to the majority populationin an area, when, in such area, there are also available non-English languageor other minority media, may have discriminatory impact. Similarly, theselective use of human models in advertisements may have discriminatoryimpact. The following are examples of the selective use of advertisementswhich may be discriminatory:(a) <T3>Selective geographic advertisements</T3>. Such selective use may involvethe strategic placement of billboards; brochure advertisements distributedwithin a limited geographic area by hand or in the mail; advertising inparticular geographic coverage editions of major metropolitan newspapersor in newspapers of limited circulation which are mainly advertising vehiclesfor reaching a particular segment of the community; or displays or announcementsavailable only in selected sales offices.(b) <T3>Selective use of equal opportunity slogan or logo</T3>. When placingadvertisements, such selective use may involve placing the equal housingopportunity slogan or logo in advertising reaching some geographic areas,but not others, or with respect to some properties but not others.(c) <T3>Selective use of human models when conducting an advertising campaign</T3>.Selective advertising may involve an advertising campaign using human modelsprimarily in media that cater to one racial or national origin segmentof the population without a complementary advertising campaign that isdirected at other groups. Another example may involve use of racially mixedmodels by a developer to advertise one development and not others. Similarcare must be exercised in advertising in publications or other media directedat one particular sex, or at persons without children. Such selective advertisingmay involve the use of human models of members of only one sex, or of adultsonly, in displays, photographs or drawings to indicate preferences forone sex or the other, or for adults to the exclusion of children.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fair housing policy and practices.</ITAG>In the investigation of complaints, the Assistant Secretary will considerthe implementation of fair housing policies and practices provided in thissection as evidence of compliance with the prohibitions against discriminationin advertising under the Fair Housing Act.(a) <T3>Use of Equal Housing Opportunity logotype, statement, or slogan</T3>.All advertising of residential real estate for sale, rent, or financingshould contain an equal housing opportunity logotype, statement, or sloganas a means of educating the homeseeking public that the property is availableto all persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin. The choice of logotype, statement or sloganwill depend on the type of media used (visual or auditory) and, in spaceadvertising, on the size of the advertisement. Table I (see Appendix I)indicates suggested use of the logotype, statement, or slogan and sizeof logotype. Table II (see Appendix I) contains copies of the suggestedEqual Housing Opportunity logotype, statement and slogan.(b) <T3>Use of human models</T3>. Human models in photographs, drawings, orother graphic techniques may not be used to indicate exclusiveness becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.If models are used in display advertising campaigns, the models shouldbe clearly definable as reasonably representing majority and minority groupsin the metropolitan area, both sexes, and, when appropriate, families withchildren. Models, if used, should portray persons in an equal social settingand indicate to the general public that the housing is open to all withoutregard to race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin, and is not for the exclusive use of one such group.(c) <T3>Coverage of local laws</T3>. Where the Equal Housing Opportunity statementis used, the advertisement may also include a statement regarding the coverageof any local fair housing or human rights ordinance prohibiting discriminationin the sale, rental or financing of dwellings.(d) <T3>Notification of fair housing policy</T3>_(1) <T3>Employees.</T3> All publishers of advertisements, advertising agencies,and firms engaged in the sale, rental or financing of real estate shouldprovide a printed copy of their nondiscrimination policy to each employeeand officer.(2) <T3>Clients</T3>. All publishers or advertisements and advertising agenciesshould post a copy of their nondiscrimination policy in a conspicuous locationwherever persons place advertising and should have copies available forall firms and persons using their advertising services.(3) <T3>Publishers' notice. </T3>All publishers should publish at the beginningof the real estate advertising section a notice such as that appearingin Table III (see Appendix I). The notice may include a statement regardingthe coverage of any local fair housing or human rights ordinance prohibitingdiscrimination in the sale, rental or financing of dwellings.<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix I to Part 109_Fair Housing Advertising</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following three tables may serve as a guide for the use of theEqual Housing Opportunity logotype, statement, slogan, and publisher'snotice for advertising:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Table I</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A simple formula can guide the real estate advertiser in using theEqual Housing Opportunity logotype, statement, or slogan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In all space advertising (advertising in regularly printed media suchas newspapers or magazines) the following standards should be used:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8</C> <H1>Size of advertisement </H1><H1>Size of logotype in inches</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">\1/2\ page or larger <D>2andmultiply;2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">\1/8\ page up to \1/2\ page <D>1andmultiply;1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 column inches to \1/8\ page <D>\1/2\andmultiply;\1/2\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Less than 4 column inches <D>(\1\)</D><F>\1\ Do not use.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In any other advertisements, if other logotypes are used in the advertisement,then the Equal Housing Opportunity logo should be of a size at least equalto the largest of the other logotypes; if no other logotypes are used,then the type should be bold display face which is clearly visible. Alternatively,when no other logotypes are used, 3 to 5 percent of an advertisement maybe devoted to a statement of the equal housing opportunity policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In space advertising which is less than 4 column inches (one column4 inches long or two columns 2 inches long) of a page in size, the EqualHousing Opportunity slogan should be used. Such advertisements may be groupedwith other advertisements under a caption which states that the housingis available to all without regard to race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Table II</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Illustrations of Logotype, Statement, and Slogan. Equal Housing OpportunityLogotype:<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">insert illus. 439A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="92"/><ITAG tagnum="21">Equal Housing Opportunity Statement: We are pledged to the letterand spirit of U.S. policy for the achievement of equal housing opportunitythroughout the Nation. We encourage and support an affirmative advertisingand marketing program in which there are no barriers to obtaining housingbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Equal Housing Opportunity Slogan: ``Equal Housing Opportunity.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Table III</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Illustration of Media Notice_Publisher's notice: All real estate advertisedherein is subject to the Federal Fair Housing Act, which makes it illegalto advertise ``any preference, limitation, or discrimination because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin,or intention to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">We will not knowingly accept any advertising for real estate whichis in violation of the law. All persons are hereby informed that all dwellingsadvertised are available on an equal opportunity basis.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 110_FAIR HOUSING POSTER</ITAG>12. The authority citation for Part 110 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>13. Section 110.1 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The regulations set forth in this part contain the procedures establishedby the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development with respect to the displayof a fair housing poster by persons subject to sections 804 through 806of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3604-3606.14. In andSection; 110.5, paragraphs (b), (e), (g) and (h) are revised toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) ``Discriminatory housing practice'' means an act that is unlawful undersection 804, 805, 806, or 818 of the Act. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) ``Person'' includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers andfiduciaries. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) ``Fair housing poster'' means the poster prescribed by the Secretaryfor display by persons subject to sections 804-806 of the Act.(h) ``The Act'' means the Fair Housing Act (The Civil Rights Act of 1968,as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988), 42 U.S.C. 3600,<T3>et seq.</T3><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>15. In andSection; 110.10, paragraph (a) introductory text and paragraph(c) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Persons subject. </ITAG>(a) Except to the extent that paragraph (b) of this section applies, allpersons subject to section 804 of the Act, Discrimination in the Sale orRental of Housing and Other Prohibited Practices, shall post and maintaina fair housing poster as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) All persons subject to section 805 of the Act, Discrimination In ResidentialReal Estate-Related Transactions shall post and maintain a fair housingposter at all their places of business which participate in the coveredactivities. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>16. Section 110.15 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Location of posters. </ITAG>All fair housing posters shall be prominently displayed so as to be readilyapparent to all persons seeking housing accommodations or seeking to engagein residential real estate-related transactions or brokerage services ascontemplated by sections 804 through 806 of the Act. 17. In andSection; 110.25, paragraph (a) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Description of posters </ITAG>(a) The fair housing poster shall be 11 inches by 14 inches and shall bearthe following legend: <G/><ITAG tagnum="91">insert illus. 443A </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="92"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">EQUAL HOUSING OPPORTUNITY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">We do Business in Accordance With the Fair Housing Act </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(The Civil Rights Act of 1968, as amended by the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of 1988) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">IT IS ILLEGAL TO DISCRIMINATE AGAINST </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">ANY PERSON BECAUSE OF RACE, COLOR, RELIGION, SEX, HANDICAP, FAMILIALSTATUS (HAVING ONE OR MORE CHILDREN), OR NATIONAL ORIGIN </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the sale or rental of housing or residential lots. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In advertising the sale or rental of housing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the financing of housing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the appraisal of housing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the provision of real estate brokerage services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Blockbusting is also illegal. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Anyone who feels he or she has been discriminated against should senda complaint to: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, Assistant Secretaryfor Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity, Washington, DC 20410 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">  or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">HUD Region or [Area Office stamp] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>18. Part 115 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 115_CERTIFICATION OF SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT AGENCIES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.1 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.2 Basis of determination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.3 Criteria for adequacy of law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.3a Criteria for adequacy of law_discrimination because of handicap.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.4 Performance standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.5 Request for certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.6 Procedure for certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.7 Denial of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.8 Withdrawal of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.9 Conferences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.10 Consequences of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.11 Interim referrals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority</T4>: Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act, 42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>(a) Section 810(f) of the Fair Housing Act, (The Civil Rights Act of 1968,as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (the Act)) providesthat: whenever a complaint alleges a discriminatory housing practice withinthe jurisdiction of a State or local public agency that has been certifiedby the Secretary as substantially equivalent, the Secretary shall referthe complaint to that certified agency before taking any action with respectto the complaint. Except with the consent of the certified agency, theSecretary, after referral is made, shall take no further action with respectto the complaint unless:(1) The certified agency has failed to commence proceedings with respectto the complaint before the end of the 30th day after the date of referral;(2) The certified agency, having commenced proceedings, fails to carryforward proceedings with reasonable promptness; or(3) The Secretary determines that the certified agency no longer qualifiesfor certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The Secretary has delegated the exercise of functions and duties undersection 810(f) of the Act to the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housing andEqual Opportunity (the Assistant Secretary).(b) The purpose of this part is to set forth:(1) The basis for agency certification. (2) The procedure by which a determination to certify is made by the AssistantSecretary.(3) The basis and procedure for withdrawal of certification.(4) The consequences of certification.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis of determination.</ITAG>A determination to certify an agency as substantially equivalent involvesa two-phase procedure. The determination requires examination and an affirmativeconclusion by the Assistant Secretary on two separate inquiries:(a) Whether the law, administered by the agency, on its face, providesthat:(1) The substantive rights protected by the agency in the jurisdictionwith respect to which certification is to be made;(2) The procedures followed by the agency;(3) The remedies available to the agency; and(4) The availability of judicial review of the agency's actions;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Are Substantially substantively equivalent to those created by andunder the act; and(b) Whether the current practices and past performance of the agency demonstratethat, in operation, the law in fact provides rights and remedies whichare substantially equivalent to those provided in the Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for adequacy of law.</ITAG>(a) In order for a determination to be made that a State or local fairhousing agency administers a law which, on its face, provides rights andremedies for alleged discriminatory housing practices that are substantiallyequivalent to those provided in the Act, the law or ordinance must:(1) Provide for an administrative enforcement body to receive and processcomplaints and provide that:(i) Complaints must be in writing;(ii) Upon the filing of a complaint the agency shall serve notice uponthe complainant acknowledging the filing and advising the complainant ofthe time limits and choice of forums provided under the law;(iii) Upon the filing of a complaint the agency shall promptly serve noticeon the respondent or person charged with the commission of a discriminatoryhousing practice advising of his or her procedural rights and obligationsunder the law or ordinance together with a copy of the complaint;(iv) A respondent may file an answer to a complaint.(2) Delegate to the administrative enforcement body comprehensive authority,including subpoena power, to investigate the allegations of complaints,and power to conciliate complaint matters, and require that:(i) The agency commence proceedings with respect to the complaint beforethe end of the 30th day after receipt of the complaint;(ii) The agency investigate the allegations of the complaint and completethe investigation in no more than 100 days after receipt of the complaint,unless it is impracticable.(iii) If the agency is unable to complete the investigation within 100days it shall notify the complainant and respondent in writing of the reasonsfor not doing so;(iv) The agency make final administrative disposition of a complaint withinone year of the date of receipt of a complaint, unless it is impracticableto do so. If the agency is unable to do so it shall notify the complaintantand respondent, in writing, of the reasons for not doing so;(v) Any conciliation agreement arising out of conciliation efforts by theagency shall be an agreement between the respondent and the complainantand shall be subject to the approval of the agency;(vi) Each conciliation agreement shall be made public unless the complainantand respondent otherwise agree and the agency determines that disclosureis not required to further the purposes of the law or ordinance.(3) Not place any excessive burdens on the complainant that might discouragethe filing of complaints, such as:(i) A provision that a complaint must be filed within any period of timeless than 180 days after an alleged discriminatory housing practice hasoccurred or terminated;(ii) Anti-testing provisions;(iii) Provisions that could subject a complainant to costs, criminal penaltiesor fees in connection with filing of complaints.(4) Not contain exemptions that substantially reduce the coverage of housingaccommodations as compared to Section 803 of the Act (which provides coveragewith respect to all dwellings except, under certain circumstances, singlefamily homes sold or rented by the owner and units in owner-occupied dwellingscontaining living quarters for no more than four families).(5) Be sufficiently comprehensive in its prohibitions to be an effectiveinstrument in carrying out and achieving the intent and purposes of theAct, <T3>i.e.,</T3> prohibit the following acts:(i) Refusal to sell or rent based on discrimination because of race, color,religion, sex, familial status, or national origin;(ii) Refusal to negotiate for a sale or rental based on discriminationbecause of race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin;(iii) Otherwise making unavailable or denying a dwelling based on discriminationbecause of race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin;(iv) Discriminating in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale orrental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities inconnection therewith, based on discrimination because of race, color, religion,sex, familial status, or national origin; (v) Advertising in a manner that indicates any preference, limitation,or discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status,or national origin;(vi) Falsely representing that a dwelling is not available for inspection,sale, or rental because of discrimination because of race, color, religion,sex, familial status, or national origin;(vii) Coercion, intimidation, threats, or interference with any personin the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of his or her having exercisedor enjoyed, or on account of his or her having aided or encouraged anyother person in the exercise of enjoyment of any right granted or protectedby section 803, 804, 805, or 806 of the Act;(viii) Blockbusting based on representations regarding the entry or prospectiveentry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race,color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin;(ix) Discrimination in residential real estate-related transactions byproviding that: It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whosebusiness includes engaging in residential real estate-related transactionsto discriminate against any person in making available such a transaction,or in the terms or conditions of such a transaction, because of race, color,religion, sex, familial status, or national origin. Such transactions include:(A) The making or purchasing of loans or the provision of other financialassistance for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaininga dwelling; or the making or purchasing of loans or the provision of otherfinancial assistance secured by residential real estate; or(B) The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property;(x) Denying a person access to, or membership or participation in, a multiplelisting service, real estate brokers' organization, or other service becauseof race, color, religion, sex, familial status or national origin.(b) In addition to the factors described in paragraph (a) of this section,the provisions of the State or local law must afford administrative andjudicial protection and enforcement of the rights embodied in the law.(1) The agency must have authority to:(i) Seek prompt judicial action for appropriate temporary or preliminaryrelief pending final disposition of a complaint if the agency concludesthat such action is necessary to carry out the purposes of the law or ordinance;(ii) Issue subpoenas;(iii) Grant actual damages or arrange to have adjudicated in court at agencyexpense the award of actual damages to an aggrieved person; (iv) Grant injunctive or other equitable relief, or be specifically authorizedto seek such relief in a court of competent jurisdiction.(v) Assess a civil penalty against the respondent, or arrange to have adjudicatedin court at agency expense the award of punitive damages against the respondent.(2) Agency actions must be subject to judicial review upon applicationby any party aggrieved by a final agency order.(3) Judicial review of a final agency order must be in a court with authorityto grant to the petitioner, or to any other party, such temporary relief,restraining order, or other order as the court determines is just and proper;affirm, modify, or set aside, in whole or in part, the order, or remandthe order for further proceedings; and enforce the order to the extentthat the order is affirmed or modified.(c) The requirement that the State or local law prohibit discriminationon the basis of familial status does not require that the State or locallaw limit the applicability of any reasonable local. State or Federal restrictionsregarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling.(d) The State or local law may assure that no prohibition based on discriminationbecause of familial status applies to housing for older persons substantiallyas described in Part 100, Subpart E.(e) A detemination of the adequancy of a State or local fair housing law``on its face'' is intended to focus on the meaning and intent of the textof the law, as distinguished from the effectiveness of its administration.Accordingly, this determination is not limited to an analysis of the literaltext of the law but must take into account all relevant maters of Stateor local law, <T3>e.g.,</T3> regulations, directives and rules of procedure, or interpretationsof the fair housing law by competent authorities, as may be necessary.(f) A law will be held to be not adequate ``on its face'' if it permitsany of the agency's decision making authority to be contracted out or delegatedto a non-governmental authority. For the purposes of this paragraph, ``decisionmaking authority'' shall include:(1) acceptance of the complaint;(2) Approval of the concilitation agreement;(3) Dismissal of a complaint;(4) Any action specified in Section 115.3(a)(2)(iv) or 115.3(b)(1).(g) The State or local law must provide for civil enforcement of the lawor ordinance by an aggrieved person by the commencement of an action inan appropriate court not less than 1 year after the occurrence or terminationof an alleged discriminatory housing practice. The court should be empoweredto:(1) Award the plaintiff actual and punitive damages;(2) Grant as relief, as it deems appropriate, any temporary or permanentinjunction, temporary restraining order or other order;(3) Allow reasonable attorney's fees and costs.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.3a </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for adequacy of law_discrimination because of handicap.</ITAG>(a) In addition to the provisions of andSection; 115.3, in order for a determinationto be made that a State or local fair housing agency administers a lawwhich, on its face, provides rights and remedies for alleged discriminatoryhousing practices, based on handicap, that are substantially equivalentto those provided in the Act, the law or ordinance must be sufficientlycomprehensive in its prohibitions to be an effective instrument in carryingout and achieving the intent and purposes of the Act, <T3>i.e.</T3>, it must prohibit the following acts:(1) Advertising in a manner that indicates any preference, limitation,or discrimination because of handicap;(2) Falsely representing that a dwelling is not available for inspection,sale, or rental based on discrimination because of handicap;(3) Blockbusting, based on representations regarding the entry or prospectiveentry into the neighborhood of a person or persons with a particular handicap;(4) Discrimination in residential real estate-related transactions by providingthat: It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose businessincludes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminateagainst any person in making available such a transaction, or in the termsand conditions of such a transaction, because of handicap. Residentialand real estate-related transactions include:(i) The making or purchasing of loans or the provision of other financialassistance for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaininga dwelling; or the making or purchasing of loans or the provision of otherfinancial assistance secured by residential real estate; or(ii) The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property;(5) Denying a person access to, or membership or participation in, multiplelisting services, real estate brokers' organizations, or other servicesbecause of handicap;(6) Discrimination in the sale or rental, or otherwise making unavailableor denying, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a handicap ofthat buyer or renter, or of a person residing in or intending to residein that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available, or of anyperson associated with the buyer or renter;(7) Discrimination against any person in the terms, conditions, or privilegesof sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilitiesin connection with the dwelling, because of a handicap of that person,of a person residing in or intending to reside in the dwelling after itis sold, rented, or made available, or of any person associated with thatperson.(b) For purposes of this section, discrimination includes_(1) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the handicapped person, reasonablemodifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by the handicappedperson, if the modifications may be necessary to afford the handicappedperson full enjoyment of the premises, except that, in the case of a rental,the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permissionfor a modification on the renter's agreeing to restore the interior ofthe premises to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonablewear and tear excepted;(2) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices,or services, when such accommodations may be necessary to afford a handicappedperson equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or(3) In connection with the design and construction of covered multifamilydwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to designand construct dwellings in such a manner that_(i) The dwellings have at least one building entrance on an accessibleroute, unless it is impractical to do so because of the terrain or unusualcharacteristics of the site;(ii) With respect to dwellings with a building entrance on an accessibleroute_(A) The public use and common use portions of the dwellings are readilyaccessible to and usable by handicapped persons;(B) All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premisesare sufficiently wide to allow passage by handicapped persons in wheelchairs;and(C) All premises within covered multifamily dwelling units contain an accessibleroute into and through the dwelling; light switches, electrical outlets,thermostats, and other environmental controls are in accessible locations;there are reinforcements in the bathroom walls to allow later installationof grab bars; and there are usable kitchens and bathrooms such that anindividual in a wheelchair can maneuver about the space.(c) The law or ordinance administered by the State or local fair housingagency may provide that compliance with the appropriate requirements ofthe American National Standard for buildings and facilities providing accessibilityand usability for physically handicapped people (commonly cited as ``ANSIA117.1-1986'') suffices to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (b)(3)(ii)(C)of this section.(d) As used in this section, the term ``covered multifamily dwellings''means buildings consisting of four or more units if such buildings haveone or more elevators and ground floor units in other buildings consistingof four or more units.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;115.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Performance standards.</ITAG>(a) The initial and continued certification that a State or local fairhousing law provides rights and remedies substantially equivalent to thoseprovided in the Act will be dependent upon an assessment of the currentpractices and past performance of the appropriate State or local agencycharged with administration and enforcement of the law to determine that,in operation, the law is in fact providing substantially equivalent rightsand remedies. The performance standards set forth in paragraph (b) of thissection will be used in making this assessment.(b) A State or local agency must:(1) Engage in comprehensive and thorough investigative activities; and(2) Commence proceedings with respect to a complaint before the end ofthe 30th day after the receipt of the complaint, carry forward proceedingswith reasonable promptness, and in accordance with the memorandum of understandingdescribed in section 115.6 of this part, make final administrative dispositionof a complaint within one year of the date of receipt of the complaintand, within 100 days of receipt of the complaint, complete the followingproceedings:(i) Investigation, including the preparation of a final investigative reportcontaining_(A) The names and dates of contacts with witnesses;(B) A summary and dates of correspondence and other contacts with the aggrievedperson and the respondent;(C) A summary description of other pertinent records;(D) A summary of witness statements; and(E) Answers to interrogatories.(ii) Conciliation activity.(3) Conduct compliance reviews of all settlements, conciliation agreementsand orders issued by or entered into to resolve discriminatory housingpractices.(4) Consistently and affirmatively seek and obtain the type of relief designedto prevent recurrences of such practices;(5) Consistently and affirmatively seek the elimination of all prohibitedpractices under its fair housing law;(c) Where the State or local agency has duties and responsibilities inaddition to administration of the fair housing law, the Assistant Secretarymay consider such matters as the relative priority given to fair housingadministration, as compared to such other duties and responsibilities,and the compatibility or potential conflict of fair housing objectiveswith the agency's other duties and responsibilities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;115.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for certification.</ITAG>(a) A request for certification under this part may be filed with the AssistantSecretary by the State or local official having principal responsibilityfor administration of the State or local fair housing law. The requestshall be supported by the following materials and information:(1) The text of the jurisdiction's fair housing law, the law creating andempowering the agency, any regulations and directives issued under thelaw, and any formal opinions of the State Attorney General or the chieflegal officer of the jurisdiction that pertain to the jurisdiction's fairhousing law.(2) Organization of the agency responsible for administering and enforcingthe law.(3) Funding and personnel made available to the agency for administrationand enforcement of the fair housing law during the current operating year,and not less than the preceding three operating years (or such lesser numberduring which the law was in effect).(4) Data demonstrating that the agency's current practices and past performancecomply with the performance standards described in andSection;115.4.(5) Any additional information which the submitting official may wish tobe considered.(b) The request and supporting materials shall be filed with the AssistantSecretary for Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity, Department of Housingand Urban Development, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410. Acopy of the request and supporting materials will be kept available forpublic examination and copying at:(1) The office of the Assistant Secretary, and(2) the HUD Regional Office in whose jurisdiction the State or local jurisdictionseeking recognition is located, and (3) the office of the State or local agency charged with administrationand enforcement of the State or local law.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;115.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedure for certification.</ITAG>(a) Upon receipt of a request for certification filed under andSection;115.5,the Assistant Secretary may request further information that he or sheconsiders relevant to the determinations required to be made under thispart.(b) If the Assistant Secretary determines, after application of the criteriaset forth in andSection;andSection; 115.3 and 115.3a, that the State or localfair housing law, on its face, provides rights and remedies for allegeddiscriminatory housing practices which are substantially equivalent tothe rights and remedies provided in the Act, the Assistant Secretary shallinform the submitting State or local official in writing of that determination.Except under circumstances where the Assistant Secretary determines thatinterim referrals or other utilization of services under andSection; 115.11is appropriate, the Assistant Secretary shall publish a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> which advises the public of the determinationthat the law, on its face, is substantially equivalent, and shall inviteinterested persons and organizations, during a period of not less than30 days following publication of the notice, to file written comments relevantto the determination whether the current practices and past performanceof the State or local agency charged with administration and enforcementof such law demonstrates that, in operation, the State or local law infact provides rights and remedies which are substantially equivalent tothose provided in the Act. The <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice shall also invite comments on the Department'sdetermination as to the adequacy of the law on its face.(c) If the Assistant Secretary determines, on the basis of the standardsspecified in andSection; 115.4 and after considering the materials and informationsubmitted pursuant to andSection; 115.5, additional material obtained underparagraph (a) of this section, and any written comments filed under paragraph(b) of this section, that, in operation, a State or local fair housinglaw in fact provides rights and remedies which are substantially equivalentto those provided in the Act, the Assistant Secretary shall offer to enterinto a written agreement with the appropriate State or local agency providingfor referral of complaints to the agency and for procedures for communicationbetween the agency and HUD that are adequate to permit the Assistant Secretaryto monitor the continuing substantial equivalency of the State or locallaw. The written agreement may, but need not, be incorporated in a Memorandumof Understanding as described in 24 CFR 111.104(a)(2). Upon execution ofa satisfactory agreement, the Assistant Secretary shall publish noticeof certification under this part in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> (d) During the period which begins on September 13, 1988 and ends January13, 1992, each State or locality recognized as substantially equivalentunder 24 CFR Part 115 (including any State or locality which had enteredinto an agreement for interim referrals under andSection; 115.11, unlessthe State or locality is subsequently denied recognition under 24 CFR 115.7)for the purposes of the Fair Housing Act before September 13, 1988 shall,for the purposes of this paragraph, be considered certified under thispart with respect to those matters for which the agency was previouslyrecognized. If the Secretary determines in an individual case that a Stateor locality has not been able to meet the certification requirements withinthis 40-month period because of exceptional circumstances (such as theinfrequency of legislative sessions in that jurisdiction), the Secretarymay extend the period of temporary certification to no later than September13, 1992.(1) No State, locality or agency thereof shall be considered certifiedunder this paragraph for the purpose of processing complaints alleging_(i) Discrimination based on familial status;(ii) Discrimination based on handicap; or(iii) Coercion, intimidation or threats as described in andSection; 115.3(a)(5)(vii).(2) Certification under this paragraph is not a determination that theadministrative or judicial remedies provided by the State or locality issubstantially equivalent to those provided by the Act.(e) Certification of a State or local fair housing agency under this partshall remain in effect until withdrawn under andSection; 115.8.(f) Not less frequently than annually, the Assistant Secretary will causeto be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a notice which sets forth:(1) An updated, consolidated list of all certified agencies;(2) A list of all agencies whose certification under this part has beenwithdrawn since publication of the previous notice;(3) A list of agencies with respect to which notice of denial of certificationhas been published under andSection; 115.7(c) since issuance of the previousnotice; (4) A list of agencies with respect to which a notice for comment has beenpublished under paragraph (b) of this section whose request for certificationremains pending; (5) A list of agencies for which notice of proposed withdrawal of certificationhas been published under andSection; 115.8(c) whose proposed withdrawal remainspending; and (6) A list of agencies with which an agreement for interim referrals orother utilization of services has been entered under andSection; 115.11 andremains in effect. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Denial of certification. </ITAG>(a) If the Assistant Secretary determines, after application of the criteriaset forth in andSection;andSection; 115.3 and 115.3a, that a State or localfair housing law, on its face, fails to provide rights and remedies foralleged discriminatory housing practices which are substantially equivalentto the rights and remedies provided in the Act, the Assistant Secretaryshall inform the submitting State or local official in writing of the reasonsfor that determination. The Assistant Secretary's advice may include specificationof the manner in which the State or local law could be amended in orderto provide substantially equivalent rights and remedies. The AssistantSecretary shall extend to the State or local official an opportunity tosubmit data, views, and arguments in opposition to the Assistant Secretary'sdetermination and to request an opportunity for a conference in accordancewith andSection; 115.9. If no submission or request is made, no further actionshall be required to be taken by the Assistant Secretary. If the Stateor local official submits materials but does not request a conference,the Assistant Secretary shall evaluate any arguments in opposition or othermaterials received from the State or local agency. If, after that evaluation,the Assistant Secretary is still of the opinion that the law, on its face,fails to provide rights and remedies for alleged discriminatory housingpractices that are substantially equivalent to the rights and remediesprovided in the Act, the Assistant Secretary shall inform the submittingState or local official in writing that certification is denied. (b) If the Assistant Secretary determines, after considering the materialsand information submitted under andSection; 115.5, any additional informationobtained under andSection; 115.6(a), an assessment of the current practicesand past peformance of the agency in meeting the standards of andSection;115.4(b), and any written comments received under andSection; 115.6(b), thatit has not been demonstrated that, in operation, a State or local fairhousing agency in fact provides rights and remedies for alleged discriminatoryhousing practices which are substantially equivalent to those providedin the Act, the Assistant Secretary shall communicate this determinationin writing to the State or local agency and shall allow the agency notless than 15 days to submit data, views, and arguments in opposition andto request an opportunity for a conference in accordance with andSection;115.9. If a request for a conference is not received within the time provided,the Assistant Secretary shall evaluate any arguments in opposition or othermaterials received from the State or local agency and, if after that evaluationthe Assistant Secretary is still of the opinion that certification shouldbe denied, the Assistant Secretary shall inform the submitting State orlocal official in writing that certification is denied. (c) Where comment on a request for certification was invited in accordancewith andSection; 115.6(b), notice of denial of certification under this sectionshall be published in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Withdrawal of certification. </ITAG>(a) Not less frequently than every 5 years, the Assistant Secretary shalldetermine whether each agency certified under this part continues to qualifyfor certification. The Assistant Secretary shall take appropriate actionwith respect to any agency not so qualifying. (b) The Assistant Secretary shall periodically review the administrationof fair housing laws recognized under this part. If the Assistant Secretaryfinds, as a result of a periodic review, upon the petition of an interestedperson or organization, or otherwise, that taken as a whole, the agency'sadministration of its fair housing law or the law, on its face, no longermeets the requirements of this part, the Assistant Secretary shall proposeto withdraw the certification previously granted. (c) The Assistant Secretary shall propose withdrawal of certification unlessreview establishes that the current fair housing law administered by thecertified agency meets the criteria of andSection; 115.3 and that currentpractices and past performance of the agency meet the standards of andSection;115.4. (d) Before the Assistant Secretary publishes notice of a proposed withdrawalof certification, the Assistant Secretary shall inform the State or localagency in writing of his or her intention to withdraw certification. Thecommunication shall state the reasons for the proposed withdrawal and providethe agency not less than 15 days to submit data, views, and arguments inopposition and to request an opportunity for a conference in accordancewith andSection; 115.9. (e) Notice of a proposed withdrawal shall be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The notice shall allow the State or local agencyand other interested persons and organizations not less than 30 days inwhich to file written comments on the proposal. (f) If a request for a conference in accordance with andSection; 115.9 isnot received within the time provided, the Assistant Secretary shall evaluateany arguments in opposition or other materials received from the Stateor local agency and other interested persons or organizations, and if afterthat evaluation the Assistant Secretary is still of the opinion that certificationshould be withdrawn, the Assistant Secretary shall withdraw certificationand shall publish notice of the withdrawal in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conferences. </ITAG>(a) Whenever an opportunity for a conference is timely requested by a Stateor local agency in accordance with andSection; 115.7 or andSection; 115.8,the Assistant Secretary shall issue an order designating an officer whoshall preside at the conference. The order shall indicate the issues tobe resolved and any initial procedural instructions that might be appropriatefor a particular conference. It shall fix the date, time and place of theconference. The date shall not be less than 20 days after the date of theorder. The date and place shall be subject to change for good cause. (b) A copy of the order shall be served on the State or local agency and:(1) In the case of a denial of certification, on any person or organizationthat files a written comment in accordance with andSection; 115.6(b); or(2) in the case of a withdrawal of certification, on any person or organizationthat files a petition in accordance with andSection; 115.8(a) or writtencomment in accordance with andSection; 115.8(c). The agency and all suchpersons and organizations shall be considered to be participants in theconference. After service of the order designating the conference officer,and until the officer submits a recommended determination, all communicationsrelating to the subject matter of the conference shall be addressed tothat officer. (c) The conference officer shall have full authority to regulate the courseand conduct of the conference. A transcript shall be made of the proceedingsat the conference. The transcript and all comments and petitions relatingto the proceedings shall be made available for inspection by interestedpersons. (d) The conference officer shall prepare proposed findings and a recommendeddetermination, a copy of which shall be served on each participant. Within20 days after service, any participant may file written exceptions. Afterthe expiration of the period for filing exceptions, the conference officershall certify the entire record, including the proposed findings and recommendeddetermination, and any exceptions to the findings and recommendations,to the Assistant Secretary, who shall review the record and issue a finaldetermination within 30 days. Where applicable, this determination shallbe published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consequences of certification. </ITAG>(a) Where all alleged violations of the Act contained in a complaint receivedby the Assistant Secretary appear to constitute violations of a State orlocal fair housing law administered by an agency that has been certifiedas substantially equivalent, the complaint shall be referred promptly tothe appropriate State or local agency, and no further action shall be takenby the Assistant Secretary with respect to such complaint, except as providedfor by the Act, this Part, and by andSection;andSection; 103.100 through 103.115or andSection; 105.20 through 105.22 of this chapter. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this section, no complaint based inwhole or in part on allegations of discrimination on the basis of familialstatus or handicap shall be referred to any State, locality or agency thereofwhose certification was granted in accordance with andSection;115.6(d) orsection 810(f)(4) of the Act, without regard to whether the fair housinglaw administered by such certified agency appears to prohibit discriminationbased on familial status or handicap.(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this section, whenever the Secretaryhas reason to believe that a complaint shows a basis may exist for thecommencement of proceedings against any respondent under section 814(a)of the Act, or for proceedings by any governmental licensing or supervisoryauthorities, the Secretary shall transmit the information upon which thatbelief is based to the Attorney General, or to appropriate governmentallicensing or supervisory authorities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;115.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Interim referrals.</ITAG>If the Assistant Secretary determines after application of the criteriaset forth in andSection;115.3, that a State or local fair housing law onits face provides rights and remedies for alleged discriminatory housingpractices which are substantially equivalent to those provided in the Act,but that the law has not been in effect, or the appropriate State or localagency in operation, for a sufficient time to permit a demonstration ofcompliance with the performance standards described in andSection;115.4,the Assistant Secretary may enter into a written agreement with the Stateor local agency providing for referral of complaints to the agency on suchterms and conditions as the Assistant Secretary shall prescribe, or providingfor other utilization of the services of the State or local agency andits employees upon agreed terms, and providing further for procedures forcommunications between the agency and HUD that are adequate to permit theAssistant Secretary to monitor the agency's administration and enforcementof its law and to assist the Assistant Secretary in making the determinationrequired in andSection;115.2(b). The agreement may provide for reactivationof referred complaints by the Assistant Secretary without regard to thelimitations described in andSection;115.10. If such an agreement for interimreferrals or other utilization of services is entered, the Assistant Secretarymay defer final determination under andSection; 115.6 or andSection; 115.7for a reasonable period determined by the Assistant Secretary to be necessaryin order to permit a fair assessment of the agency's performance. In noevent shall this period extend more than two years beyond the date of entryinto the agreement for interim referrals or other utilization of services.This two-year limitation does not apply to agencies certified in accordancewith andSection;115.6(d). However, an agreement under this section shallnot be extended beyond the date of certification under andSection;115.6 ordenial of recognition under andSection;115.7. Notice of entry into an agreementunder this section shall be published in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>19. Part 121 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">PART 121_COLLECTION OF DATA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">121.1 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">121.2 Furnishing of data by program participants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);E.O. 11063, 27 FR 11527; sec. 602, Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C.2000d-1); sec. 562, Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (42 U.S.C.3608a); sec. 2, National Housing Act, 12 U.S.C. 1703; sec. 7(d), Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act, 42 U.S.C. 3535(d).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;121.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this part is to enable the Secretary of Housing and UrbanDevelopment to carry out his or her responsibilities under the Fair HousingAct, Executive Order 11063, dated November 20, 1962, Title VI of the CivilRights Act of 1964, and section 562 of the Housing and Community DevelopmentAct of 1987. These authorities prohibit discrimination in housing and inprograms receiving financial assistance from the Department of Housingand Urban Development, and they direct the Secretary to administer theDepartment's housing and urban development programs and activities in amanner affirmatively to further these policies and to collect certain datato assess the extent of compliance with these policies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;121.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Furnishing of data by program participants.</ITAG>Participants in the programs administered by the Department shall furnishto the Department such data concerning the race, color, religion, sex,national origin, age, handicap, and family characteristics of persons andhouseholds who are applicants for, participants in, or beneficiaries orpotential beneficiaries of, those programs as the Secretary may determineto be necessary or appropriate to enable him or her to carry out his orher responsibilities under the authorities referred to in andSection;121.1.20. The text of the preamble to this rule beginning at the heading ``BACKGROUND''and ending before the heading ``<T3>Legislative review issues</T3>,'' is added as Appendix I to SubchapterA of Chapter I as follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix I to Subchapter A_Preamble to Final Rule Implementing FairHousing Amendments Act of 1988 (Published January 19, 1989)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: January 12, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Samuel R. Pierce, Jr.,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-1211 Filed 1-19-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4210-32-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>